 PREFACE. IN one of my frequent visits to Dr. Hosack , for the
purpose of obtaiing from him various kinds of
information, to aid me in completing a work I was
then engaged in editing-the proper acknowledg-
ments for his learned and valuable assistance, I have
made in another place-he suggested to me that he
had some time since gathered materials for writing
the life of a distinguished philanthropist, the late
THOMAS EDDY ; but that numerous circumstances
had prevented him from carrying his intentions into
effect, and that he could not, at this time, sit down
to the work. After some farther conversation, he
 placed the papers in my hand, and I found them very
interesting, much more so than I could have antici-
pated, from the quiet life of a modest citizen. Among
 them I discovered a correspondence with some of the
first men in Europe and the United States, upon the
great objects of reform in prisons, hospitals, penal
 codes, schools, and almost every other topic, which
the best minds of the civilized world are now dis-
cussing. I readily agreed to put those papers in
 order, connected with a few remarks of my own, to
 the end that the public might have some idea of Mr.
 Eddy as a man, and of the great objects of his useful
 life. To show me the estimation in which Mr. Eddy 
 was held by the wise and good, which had known
 him well, Dr. Hosack put into my hands the follow-
ing letters, from men whose sincerity is above all
 doubt, and whose opinions have a commanding
weight in society. EDITOR. INTRODUCTION. New York, April 9th, 1833. DEAR SIR, I have thought it due to the memory of the late Thomas Eddy ,
 whose life has been very much devoted to deeds of benevolence,
 and the improvement of the numerous public institutions with
 which he has been connected, to communicate to the public some
 account of his labours, and the services he has rendered to this
 city and state. For this purpose, I have placed the materials which I had col-
lected on this subject, into the hands of our friend, Colonel Knapp ,
 who has kindly undertaken to embody them into a volume, that
 cannot fail to be gladly received by the community. Knowing that you were one of the friends of Mr. Eddy , and
 of his associates, the late General Schuyler , Governors George 
 and Dewitt Clinton , Governor Jay , and others with whom he
 co-operated in various public measures, I will be obliged by any
 reminiscenses you may possess, that will give an interest to the
 contemplated publication of Colonel Knapp . I am, dear Sir, with great respect and esteem, yours, DAVID HOSACK . 
To the Hon. JAMES KENT . New York, May 11, 1833. DEAR SIR, I was happy to learn, by your letter of the 9th ult., that you
 had made arrangements for an historical account of the life and
 services of your late excellent relative, Thomas Eddy , by con-
fiding the materials in your possession, concerning him, to the
 industry, skill, judgment, and taste of Colonel Knapp . I am
 satisfied that a biographical sketch of the actions and character 
of so distinguished a philanthropist, will be interesting to the
 cause of humanity, and acceptable to the public. It was my 
good fortune to be numbered among the intimate friends of Mr. 
Eddy, from the year 1795 down to the period of his death; and
I am no stranger to the beneficial influence which he so long and
 so successfully exerted over the several public institutions with
which he was connected. You are pleased to say, that you
would be obliged by any reminiscences I may posess, that
will give an interest to the contemplated publication. This
request you have recently repeated, and if I was in possession of
any facts that were important, and which are not already matter
of record, I would most cheerfully communicate them. The
 quiet and unostentatious private life of Thomas Eddy , afforded,
however, very few materials of the kind you allude to, and it is
solely from a desire to gratify your wishes, and to show my
affection for his memory, that I have ventured (though not with-
out hesitation and reluctance) to submit a few notices respecting
 my personal knowledge of his character. When I first became acquainted with Mr. Eddy , about the
year 1795, I was struck with the simplicity of his manners, and
the reasonableness and benevolence of his views. I soon found
uncommon zeal for the promotion of all kinds of public improve-
ment. His object and unshaken purpose seemed to be, to diffuse,
by every possible and reasonable effort on his part, a liberal,
enlightened, humane, active, and Christian public spirit. He pos-
sessed, far beyond the race of ordinary men, the philanthropy of
Howard ; and under the influence of so illustrious an example,
he appeared to be willing to devote himself to survey the man-
sions of sorrow and pain, and to mitigate human misery, in
whatever form it might meet the eye or awaken sympathy. It was among his earliest and most animating objects, to
endeavour to work a reformation in our penal code, and disarm
it of its enormous abuses and uncompromising severity. His
efforts in the year 1794, 1795, and 1796, to arouse public attention
to the subject; and to promote the establishment of a state or peni-
tentiary prison, as a substitute for the profligate goals and san-
guinary punishments, are a matter of fact, which it is not my pro-
vince to detail; I would merely observe, that in 1797 I became
 one of the persons charged ex officio with the execution of the
penal laws, and this was concurrently in point of time with the
melioration of the criminal code to which I have alluded, and it
naturally led me to perceive and feel in full force, the inestimable
value of the change. My friendly connexion with Mr. Eddy 
kept gradually increasing, and his ardent and disinterested
efforts for the credit and success of the penitentiary system, were
constantly passing under my eye and observation. He continued
an inspector of the state prison in this city, from its first erection
in 1796, to the year 1803, and it is a fact well worthy of notice,
that the last year in which he had an agency in the management
of the prison,the profits of the labour of the convicts equalled
the annual expense of the establishment. The prison for that
 year, and that year only, maintained itself. But though Eddy 
had retired from the post, he never ceased to be anxious to
improve and recommend the system. So late as the year 1823,
he addressed a letter to the mayor of this city, suggesting some
judicious reforms in the prison discipline; and which have since
been essentially adopted. He never placed much reliance on
the influence of fear and severity, and he was of opinion that
the reformation of the convicts was to be regarded as an indis-
pensable object of the system. Mr. Eddy was in the habit of recommending to my notice
those publications which appeared from time to time to strike
his mind with particular force; and those that he alluded to, or
presented to me, uniformly related to charitable, benevolent, or
religious objects. I recal the recollection of such acts with
 much pleasure, because they give us an insight into his real
character, and afford incontestable evidence of the goodness of
his heart, and of his constant and affectionate solicitude for the
happiness of his friends. He appeared to possess a firm Chris-
tian faith, without a particle of bigotry or fanaticism, and it was
softened or recommended by the spirit of charity. He was the
determined enemy of every species of doctrine that was lax in
 morals, or led to licentiousness in practice; and the anecdote
which I am about to relate, is strikingly characteristic of the
firm purpose with which he met and resisted the false philoso-
phy and profane speculations that were zealously propagated
towards the conclusion of the last century. Having purchased
Godwin's "Enquiry concerning Political Justice," which obtained
a transient celebrity in the year 1795, his moral sense was so
much offended by the abominable doctrines contained in the lat-
ter part of the second volume, (and which doctrines Mr. Godwin
 afterwards exemplified in his own case,) that he took at once a
 decisive step to clear himself of the folly, or the guilt, of encour-
aging and circulating the work. He rose one evening at his
 own fireside, from the perusal of the book, and silently, and with
 gravity, opened the embers in the fire place, and carefully laid 
down and buried the two volumes in the fire. His wife, who was
 sitting by, astonished at the act, and ignorant of the cause, started
 up and exclaimed, Thomas, art thou crazy? He was one of the governors of the New York Hospital in
 1797, and I believe, had been one for some previous time; and I
 considered myself as principally indebted to him for my intro-
duction in that year to the same trust. He acted as one of the
 guardians of the hospital down to the spring of 1827; and the
 value of his services must have been inestimable. The duties
 which in that place were cast upon him, were congenial with his
 disposition and character; and that great establishment is deserv-
edly classed among the most comprehensive, practical, and bene-
ficent of all the charitable institutions of this country. I know 
of none that affords more prompt and effectual relief to the mise-
ries of the poorer and forsaken part of mankind. He was for
 several years vice president, and at the period of his resignation,
 president of the board. He came to me in the spring of 1827,
 (being a few months before his death,) and told me that his declin-
ing health would not permit him to continue in the trust, and he
 earnestly requested my consent to serve, if I should be chosen
 one of the governors. Moved by his application, I did consent,
 and faithful to my promise to him, I bore my portion of my bur-
den of the trust, for the three succeeding years ; and while in
 that place, I could trace the influence and effects of that excellent
 man, in every branch of the institution. Mr. Eddy was deeply
 impressed with the account of the Retreat, an asylum near
the city of York, in England, erected for insane persons, and
 which was much indebted for its success to the early and steady
 efforts of Lindley Murray , a name familiar to the friends of let-
ters and humanity. In 1815, he suggested the propriety of efforts
 to erect and establish a similar institution on this island; and one
 that should adopt the same course of moral treatment of the luna-
tic patients. He presented to me at the time, a description of the
Retreat, written by Samuel Tuke , and he always appeared to be
 anxious to enlist my humble voice and influence in favour of his
 plans of public benevolence. Provisions for such an establish-
ment was made by law in 1816, and it was opened in 1820, under
 very favourable auspices. In 1819, he read before the governors of the hospital, a Memoir
 of John Murray, Jr. , of this city, and brother to Lindley Mur-
ray. This he presented to me, with the grateful remark that it
 came from my affectionate friend. He delineates a character
 of the most distinguished benevolence, and of remarkable purity.
 He and Eddy were scholars in the same grammar school at
Philadelphia, in or about the year 1770, and their subsequent
 lives were devoted to charitable objects, with a steadiness of pur-
pose, and an ardour of zeal, that were peculiar, and at the same
time tempered with reason and discretion. It would appear to
 me to be very difficult in the annals of mere mortals, to find a
 higher and brighter example of active and unobtrusive charity,
 goodness, and piety, than the one afforded by the life of Murray ,
 as sketched by the faithful pencil of his fellow labourer in the
 cause of humanity. Mr. Eddy was an official agent in many other public institu-
tions of a charitable kind, and he was engaged for a length of
 years in some that were more comprehensive in their operation,
 and related to the great commercial and political interests of the
 state. He took an early and active part in the cause of internal
 navigation and improvement. His good sense, striking probity,
 and public spirit, were known and highly appreciated by Gene-
ral Schuyler, Governor Jay , and other eminent statesmen of
 their time; and he became a cherished advocate and assistant in
 all schemes of a liberal kind, and connected with the public wel-
fare. He was early made a director in the Western Inland Lock
 Navigation Company, which was established in the year 1792,
 and he continued a Director and Treasurer of that Company,
 down to its final termination in 1820. He explored the western
 country with a view to the introduction of inland navigation in
 1796, and his distinguished merits as one of the original authors
 and promotors of the western canal navigation have been clearly
 stated and illustrated in your interesting "Memoir of Dewitt Clin-
ton," and I forbear to dwell on the subject. It is well known
 that he executed the laborious and very responsible duties of one
of the canal commissioners with his customary ardour and pre-
cision, between the year 1810 and 1817; and he is justly entitled,
 as jou have already shown, to share in the glory attendant on the
 auspicious results of that magnificent project. But Mr. Eddy's mind was equally and unremittingly engaged
 in useful schemes of much more humble pretensions. Whenever
 there was an institution within the reach of his power and
 influence, created for any benevolent object, we are almost sure
 to meet on its records and in its effects, his name and his blessing.
 I was not associated with him, and I had not therefore any direct
 personal acquaintance with his services, in many of the public
 charities in which he was concerned. It ought to be left to his
 thoroughly informed biographer, to speak of him as a corres-
ponding member of the New York Manumission Society; as
 one of the founders and trustees of the Free School Society in
 New York; as one of the founders and directors of the Ameri-
can Bible Society; as one of the first trustees of the Savings
 Bank in New York; and as one of the first managers of the
 Society for the Reformation of Juvenile Delinquents. I have
endeavoured to confine myself in my remarks to matters of which
 I had some personal knowledge, or was necessarily led to notice
 during the course of the transactions. As the life of Governor Jay , as well as his own, was drawing
 to a close, Mr. Eddy appeared to be anxious to pay to that great
 man a parting visit, and he invited me to accompany him. This
 was in the summer of 1826, and it was one of the most delight-
ful little excursions I ever had. We left New York on the
 morning of the 26th of July. The day was bright and beautiful,
 and having landed at Sing Sing, we placed ourselves under the
guidance of Captain Lyndes , and visited the new state prison
 establishment, which was then quite unfinished. We found one
 hundred and thirty convicts engaged in quarrying and working
 marble for the building; and they were mostly out under a meri-
dian sun, pouring its fierce blaze upon the white marble blocks
 around them, with an ardour almost sufficient to blind the eyes.
 Mr. Eddy seemed to be at home in all the details of the concern.
 His zeal for the improvement of penitentiary discipline had not
 diminished in intensity. He was thorough in his inspection, and 
inquisitive in his examination. We continued our journey that
 afternoon to the residence of Governor Jay , at Bedford, and we 
found that illustrious statesman and christian sage, sitting on the
 piazza under the lengthened shadows of the sun, with a long
 pipe by his side, in full view of the simple and solid rural
 improvements of the place; and in the attitude of one at peace
 with himself, and with all around him. I was painfully struck
 with the ravages of time upon him, and the change that had taken
 place in his visage and appearance, since I last had the satisfac-
tion of seeing him some years before. At first, he did not appear
 to recollect me; and this was the only instance that I perceived
 of any direct decay of his mental faculties. He conversed that
 evening and the next morning cheerfully and correctly, and
 seemed to be much interested in Mr. Eddy's conversation, and to
 sympathise with him in his feelings and concerns. Those two
 venerable men (the one then being in his seventy-sixth year, and
 the other in his eighty-first year) had been intimate friends; with
 correspondent principles in all matters of personal duty, and of
 good will to men, from a period which commenced soon after the
 conclusion of the American war. We returned to town the next
 day, and Mr. Eddy, in the course of this tour, interested me
 exceedingly with anecdotes and occurrences connected with his
 early life, in this city, during the revolutionary war, and down to
 the period of our first acquaintance. I have only to add, that
 while upon this last visit, his cheerful, free, varied, and instructive
 conversation, gave me additional cause to love and admire him. I am, dear sir, with great respect and esteem,
 Your friend and obedient servant, JAMES KENT . 
 To DOCTOR HOSACK . New York, March 1Oth, 1833. DEAR SIR, The Life of the late Thomas Eddy is about to be published by
Colonel Knapp of this city, into whose hands I have placed the
 materials I had collected for that purpose. Knowing that upon
 the subject of prisons, and other objects of benevolence, he was
 long in correspondence with you as a fellow labourer in the same
 cause; it occurs to me that you may have some of his communi-
cations which are calculated to give interest to the publication in 
view, and may from your personal knowledge of Mr. Eddy , and
 of his pursuits, contribute some materials to the volume, that will
prove useful and gratifying to the community. If so, I shall
 feel much obliged by any information you may give me, or by
 the use of any papers you may possess, relative to this object. I am, dear sir, respectfully yours, DAVID HOSACK. 
To ROBERT VAUX , ESQ. Philadelphia, 3mo. 11, 1833. DEAR DOCTOR, It gave me much pleasure to learn by thy letter of yesterday,
 that a memoir of the life of the late Thomas Eddy was about to be
 published. His long, various, and highly valuable services, enti-
tle him to biographical honour; and the story of his benevolent
 career will not fail to encourage others, to go and do likewise.
 Although much his junior, he kindly presented me with several
 of his printed essays; occasionally favoured me with a letter, and 
when we met, freely conversed on topics which were favourite
 with us both; but on the examination of his correspondence, and
 recalling to mind our interviews, I do not discover any material,
 which would be useful to the gentleman who is to prepare the
 work. I regret that it is not in my power to do more toward the illus-
tration of the character of our estimable friend, than to bear my
 humble testimony to his great worth, in all the relations in which
 it was my privilege to know him. Accept the assurance of my
 respect, and friendship, ROBERT S. VAUX. 
To DAVID HOSACK, M. D. &c. &c. New York, April, 1833. MY DEAR SIR, I some time since determined to prepare a sketch of the life of
 the late Thomas Eddy , who, like another Howard , has devoted
 himself to the cause of humanity and benevolence. For this
 purpose I have collected many valuable materials; these I have
 placed in the hands of my friend. Colonel Knapp , who will give
 them to the public. Knowing that you have been many years
 associated with Mr. Eddy in the various institutions of our city
 which have been benefitted by your united services, I will feel much
 obliged by any reminiscences you may possess on this subject. In the reformation of our penal code, in the establishment of
 the Lunatic Asylum, in the improvement of the New York Hos-
pital, in the public schools of our city, in the establishment of the
 House of Refuge, in the Manumission Society, and other bene-
volent institutions, I know you have long been fellow labourers;
 you will, therefore, be enabled to furnish me with many interest
ing memorandums of Mr. Eddy , that cannot fail to prove accept-
able to the community. Your early attention to this subject, will
 greatly oblige me. Dear sir, your friend and humble servant, DAVID HOSACK . 
To the Hon. CADWALLADER D. COLDEN. June 23, 1833. MY DEAR SIR, It gives me great pleasure to learn that the biography of
 Thomas Eddy is to be written by so able a hand as Mr. Knapp. 
 I should be very happy to give him any information in my power,
 which might tend to rescue from oblivion the merits and many
 virtues of our deceased friend. All I can say might be comprised
 in these few words:—That I knew him, and was very much asso-
ciated with him during the last thirty years of his life ; and that
 there is no benevolent or charitable institution founded in that time,
 of which he was not the zealous promoter, if the project for its
 establishment did not originate with him. I would be more par-
ticular, but my memory does not serve me as to dates, and I have
 no documents to which I can refer. I will nevertheless attempt
 to give the general recollections of my associations with Mr. Eddy .
 If it should be important to ascertain the dates connected with
 the circumstances I shall mention; it may be done by resorting
 to the public records, or the records of institutions of which he
 was a member. So far as I recollect, my first acquaintance with Mr. Eddy com-
menced, from our having had the same views as to what has been
 called the amelioration of our criminal code. I mean the criminal
 code of the state of New York; and you must understand me
 throughout as writing as if I were in New York; I was then quite
 a young man, and I am not certain that my mind did not receive
 the strong bias it had in favour of the abolition of the punishment
 of death, from Mr. Eddy ; though I, at that time, differed from 
 him as to the extent of this abolition : he desiring that life should
 not be taken in any case; and I believing that this highest
 punishment should be reserved for the highest crimes. After-
wards, in the year 1825, I think, when Mr. Allen , Mr. Tibbits ,
 and Mr. Hopkins , were making some investigations relative to
 the state prison, they circulated a number of queries, and addressed
 copies of them to Mr. Eddy and myself. We each wrote answers.
 They came so late, that they are not printed with the report of
 the commissioners; but Mr. Eddy being unwilling that they
 should be lost, obtained from me a copy of my answers to the
commissioners, and published his and mine in a small pamphlet 
at his expense. This is evidence of Mr. Eddy 's liberality, not
 only as to pecuniary consideration, but as to his toleration of prin-
ciples which differed from his own; for while his letters to the
 commissioners, zealously maintained that imprisonment was suf-
ficient punishment for any crime ; I expressed the opinion that
 I at that time continued to entertain, that the most atrocious
 guilt, such as wilful and deliberate murder, should be punished
 with death. Before I pursue this subject farther, I will mention
 a circumstance which made a strong impression on my mind, and
 convinced me, that however adverse the Society of Friends were
 to the punishment of death, they had rather that it should be
 inflicted in some cases, than that the guilty should escape with
 impunity. A female belonging to the Society, or who was at
 least professedly a Friend, was found a corpse, under circumstan-
ces that left no doubt of her having been murdered. I was then
 assistant attorney general. The first information I had of this
 crime, was from Mr. Eddy , Robert Browne , and several others of the
 same high standing in the Society of Friends, who called on me to
 institute a prosecution against the person suspected; and through the
 whole progress of the prosecution they were active and zealous in
 their efforts to furnish me with the means of developing the truth. It is well known that the laws for establishing our state prison,
 owed their origin more to the part taken by the Society of Friends,
 than to any exertions in their favour by any other class in the com-
munity. And among these, Mr. Eddy , as he was in every thing
 in which he engaged, the most active and the most zealous, in
 this matter, as in others, in which the public good was concerned,
 be devoted himself to its success, with all the industry and earnest-
ness, that he could have done if his own interest had been his
 object; and I am convinced that he would not have felt the same
 gratification from obtaining any private advantage, that he did,
 from the adoption of those laws by the legislature, which he had
 long and ardently advocated, and which he considered as setting
 an example which would meliorate the condition of mankind.
 The members of the first board of governors of the state prison
 were mostly taken from the society of Friends. Mr. Eddy held
 the principal office, under the title, I think, of superintendent. The assistant attorney general was, ex-officio, connected with
 the administration of the prison, and this gave me an oppor-
tunity of observing its management and government. The
 good order, comfort, cleanliness, industry, and devotion which
 prevailed, as long as the Friends had the management of the
 institution, were very remarkable. But in 1800, when there
 was a great revolution in political power, those who had effected
 the change thought their influence should be felt every where;
 and though there was no emolument annexed to the office of
 governor of the prison, there were those of the dominant party,
 whose ambition was to be gratified by being put in the place of
 the Friends who were managers of the institution. The differ-
ence between the government of those who took the office merely
 from motives of philanthropy, and who devoted themselves to the
 discharge of its duties, and those who held it as an honorary dis-
tinction, that deserved but little sacrifice of their private business,
 was soon perceived. The new management was so bad, that it
 had very nearly occasioned the failure of this great experiment;
 and nothing was more common than to hear it said, even by
 many of its original advocates, that it had done so, and that there
 was no resource but to the former sanguinary penal code. I have
 often heard Mr. Eddy lament this state of things; but he never
 abandoned the hope of seeing a system, of which he very justly
 considered himself as one of the founders, established; and he
 lost no opportunity of inviting the public attention to means by
 which he thought the objections to the new code might be obviated.
 He proposed that county or district prisons or penitentiaries should
 be erected. That the prison of the state should be reserved for
 offenders of the highest grade, while those of a lower degree
 should be punished in the former. I am convinced that among 
his manuscripts will be found many pieces that he has written
 on this subject. It is very possible that my connexion with the Manumission
 Society, brought me acquainted with him as a member of that
 institution, previously to my having had intercourse with him as
 an advocate of the amelioration of our penal code. It is known
 how much that society is, and always has been, in the hands of
 members of the society of Friends, and how far the act abo-
lishing slavery, is owing to their exertions. In this, Mr. Eddy 
 took a leading part. I well remember, however, that he was
 adverse to the colonization society; and he discouraged the first
 attempts which were made to establish a branch of the society
 in New York. He thought it was a scheme of the slave holders
 to perpetuate slavery, rather than intended as a means of eman-
cipation. Their design, in his opinion, was to make the society
instrumental in ridding them of their old or worthless slaves, and
 thereby enable them to perpetuate the bondage of the young and
 valuable; whereas, if the slave holding states were obliged to
 bear the burthen of those the society would take off their hands,
 he thought these states would the sooner be compelled to adopt
 measures that would give freedom to the blacks. Mr. Eddy's rea-
soning on this subject, induced me to adopt his sentiments. But if
 he had lived to have had a better view of the objects of the Society,
 and to witness their extraordinary success, I cannot doubt but that
 he would have yielded, as I have done, his prejudices against this
 valuable institution. I am the more induced to think that this
 would have been the case, from considering the very active part
 which Mr. Eddy afterwards took in a project which was set on
 foot, I think, in the year 1825, and to which, if it had succeeded,
 there would have been the same objections which there were in
 his mind to colonization societies. About the time I have men-
tioned, the President of Hayti sent a Mr. Grandville , a coloured
 gentleman, as an ambassador to New York. His object was to
 induce black people to emigrate to that island, at the expense of
 its government, with an offer of land and means of living when
 they arrived there. Mr. Eddy was indefatigable in his exertions
 to promote the views of Mr. Grandville . He formed a society for
 this purpose. Considerable funds were raised, and the Haytian
 emissary returned to his government with a cargo of emigrants.
 They were accompanied by an agent of the society, who managed
 to quarrel with the government of the island. The emigrants
 were disappointed. They alleged that the promises made to
 them were not fulfilled, and the whole thing ended in a heavy
 expense to the members of the Society. There was nothing in which Mr. Eddy took a deeper or more
 active interest, than in the establishment of our free schools. But
 I had no particular connexion with that institution. I can there-
fore only say, that I have often visited them with him, and been
 witness of the zeal he manifested for their prosperity. Go-
vernor Clinton was the great patron of this and other benevolent
 establishments, in which Mr Eddy was concerned; and I believe
 we owe the assistance they have derived from Mr. Clinton 's great
 talents and influence, more to Mr. Eddy than to any other man.
 The history of the New York canals will show how large a
 share Mr. Eddy had in directing Governor Clinton 's attention to
 these great projects. I found Mr. Eddy a governor of the New York Hospital, (of
 which he died president) when I was elected to that office about
 the year 1812. I believe he had been in that station from a very
 early date. There, as elsewhere, he was one of the most efficient
 and useful members of the institution to which he belonged. In
 the year 1816, I think the legislature made a very liberal grant
 of an increased revenue to the hospital. This was obtained
 entirely by the exertions and address of Mr. Eddy , who spent
 the greater part of a winter at Albany, to obtain the grant. Per-
haps the institution is more indebted to the good management of
 Mr. Eddy , than to the liberality of the legislature. For it has
 been said, and I believe, not without foundation, that the members
 of the legislature were not aware of the extent of their endow-
ment. The duration of annuity which is granted, depends on
 the duration of a previous grant, which, it is said, it was supposed
was more limited, than upon examination is found to be the case.
 But this ample provision induced the governors of the hospital
 to turn their attention to a separate establishment for the insane,
 for whom the accommodations afforded by the city buildings were
 very inconvenient. In making a new provision for this class of
 patients, Mr. Eddy engaged with his accustomed energy, and
 from his exertions, and the co-operation of those associated with
him, grew the magnificent Lunatic Asylum at Bloomingdale,
 He was chairman of the committee of Governors of the Hospi-
tal under whose superintendence the buildings were erected, and
 who had the management of the concern till the patients were
 removed to it; and till long after a system was arranged for the 
government of the house and the treatment of the subjects. In
 all this, no one had so large a part as Mr. Eddy , and no one
 devoted so much time and attention to the establishment. As any thing I may write, can only serve as memoranda, which
 will direct the attention of Mr. Eddy 's biographer to the history
 or records of the institutions with which he was connected, I
 may mention that I was a long time associated with him as a
 member of the Humane Society. This was an association, which
 had its origin long before I knew any thing of it. The objects
 of this association, were to provide food for the destitute, and,
 particularly, to supply the debtors in prison with some of the
 necessaries of life. At that time these objects of charity made
 an irresistible appeal to the attention of the benevolent. For it
 is strange that the laws which shut a person up within the walls
 of a prison, because he did not, and in most cases could not, pay
 his debt, made no provision for supplying him either with fire,
 food, or raiment. As you well know, the first soup house that was
 ever opened in New York, was established by this society, and it
 should not be forgotten, that the fears of the members that their funds
 were not equal to this enterprise, were overcome by your liberal
 engagement to defray from out your own purse all that might be
 required, beyond the means the friends of the society could afford. The views which were presented to many members of this
 society, of the condition of the poor in the city of New York, led
 to the formation, in the year 1816, of a society for the prevention
of pauperism; in the establishment of which, and in its action,
 Mr. Eddy took a more active part than any other man. This
 society was merged in the Society for the Reformation of Juve-
nile Delinquents, or House of Refuge, which was incorporated in
 the year 1824. This institution, after it had been in operation
 two years, Mr. Clinton described in his annual message to the
 legislature of 1826, as perhaps the best penitentiary institution
 which has ever been devised by the wit, and established by the
beneficence of man. I had a more intimate association with
Mr. Eddy in this charity from its origin to his death, than in any
 of the others of which we were members. Though there were
 many who participated with him in this humane enterprise, yet
 I do not think it is going too far to say that its foundation and
 success was in a great measure owing to him; at least it may
 be questioned whether, without his indefatigable exertions, this
 important measure for the prevention of crimes, would have been
 adopted so soon. He devoted so much of his time to this esta-
blishment, and occupied himself so much with its concerns for
 several years, that he seemed to have no business of a public or
private nature which he thought so important, or so deserving
 his attention, It may be worthy of remark, that though there
 had been penitentiaries or asylums for infant criminals in Europe,
 previously to the establishment of the House of Refuge, yet
 there had not been any institution for the reformation of juvenile
 delinquents. This differed from all others that before existed in
 this important feature. That the laws subjected to its discipline
 persons under age, previously to their having committed any
 crime, when they are without parents, or abandoned by them,
 and are left without guardian or protection, and are found pur-
suing vicious courses, they may be committed to the House of
 Refuge, where they are withdrawn from the power of their
 parents even, till such provisions is made for them as the law
 prescribes. The idea of giving this very enlarged power to
 magistrates and managers of the House of Refuge, I believe,
 originated with Mr. Eddy . If the society for the reformation of
 juvenile delinquents was deprived of this power, it would lose the
 greater part of its usefulness. Another of our most important
 and benevolent institutions, owes its origin to the members of the
 society for the prevention of pauperism; I refer to the Savings
Bank. To this Mr. Eddy devoted himself with his usual zeal
 and energy, and remained one of its most efficient and active
 managers while he lived. To this list of the numerous benevolent societies of which Mr.
 Eddy was a member, I must add another establishment, of which
 he was a founder, and continued a manager, until he thought
 its successful operation was secured. This was a society to pro-
vide fuel for the poor. Those who had not the means of laying
 up a store, were to deposit their money with the society; who
were to lay it out on wood or coal, at the proper season when
 these articles are cheapest; and to let the depositor draw to the
 amount of his deposit when it was most needed, for the cost at
 which it had been purchased by the society. But Mr. Eddy's 
other avocations obliged him, after some time, to withdraw from
 this institution; and for the want of that zeal with which he
 devoted himself to all affairs of this kind in which he engaged,
 or from some other cause, this very benevolent attempt to relieve
 the distress which so often results from cold and poverty, after
 one or two seasons, was neglected or relinquished. Notwith-
standing Mr. Eddy was so successful and useful in the many
 humane institutions I have enumerated, his active and benevolent
 mind was engaged in other projects for the advantage or relief
 of the distressed; among these he had much at heart an asylum
 for convicts who had expiated their crime, by having suffered the
 punishment of imprisonment. He saw with all the sympathy of
 his character, the forlorn condition of those who, without money,
 without friends, and without character, were turned from the walls
 of a prison, to provide for themselves means of subsistence, and
 to whom there seems to be left the only alternative of committing
 a new crime, or of perishing. He proposed to establish for such
 objects a House of Refuge, where employment of some profit
 should be provided for them, until by their good conduct they
 could retrieve their character, and by their industry provide some
 means of support, till they could begin the world anew. I have not referred to Mr. Eddy 's connexion with our literary
 and scientific institutions, of all of which I believe we were
 members. Of his usefulness as an associate with us in these
 establishments, you will be much more able to speak of him than
 I am. And after all, my dear sir, I can not but perceive how
 little more I have done than if I had given a list of our benevo-
lent and charitable institutions, and said that Mr. Eddy was a zea-
lous and efficient member of each of them. But then I should
 have lost the opportunity of saying how sincerely I respected his
 character, and of manifesting the desire that I have, that the
 memory of his great benevolence, his devotion to the welfare of
 mankind, and his many virtues, should be preserved; and that he
 may he pointed out to posterity, as an example of how much good
 may be done by an individual who will devote his time and talents
to its accomplishment. And had I not complied with your
 request, I should also have lost the pleasure which I have, my
 dear sir, in assuring you of the sincere respect with which I am your friend and obedient CADWALLADER D. COLDEN. 
To DAVID HOSACK , LL. D., F. R. S. and E. New York, April 20, 1833. DEAR SIR, Knowing the intimacy which once existed between you and
 the late Thomas Eddy , whose memoirs I have undertaken to pre-
pare for the public, from papers in my possession, and from such
 other sources as may be afforded me, I take the liberty to request
 you to favour me with any passage of his life which may be fresh
 in your memory, accompanied with such remarks as you may
 think proper to make.I am aware of the value of your time,
 to yourself and to others ; but I will not offer you any idle apo-
logy for taxing you, as I believe you will agree with me in opinion,
 that if it be a duty, as we are in the habit of thinking it to be, to
 attend the funereal rites of a departed friend, that it is a higher
 duty, and of more importance to the living, to assist in giving
 currency to his virtues. Most respectfully, your friend and humble servant, SAMUEL L. KNAPP. 
To Professor JOHN W. FRANCIS , M. D. New York, May 1, 1833. DEAR SIR, A personal acquaintance of more than twenty years with the
 late Mr. Thomas Eddy , might justify me in answering at some
 length your several interrogatories concerning his life and public
 services; but I have deemed it most judicious to restrict this com-
munication to a few particulars, inasmuch as you are so amply
 furnished with authentic materials for your contemplated biogra-
phy. Mr. Eddy was so intimately and for so long a period asso-
ciated with the men and measure of most of our humane, bene-
volent, and literary institutions, that his career is in no small
 degree connected with the history of those establishments, and
 demonstrates that a cardinal object of his pursuit, was to melio-
rate the condition of human society. Were I to select the especial objects which, amidst the great
 variety that demanded his services, more particularly absorbed
 his attention, and occupied his deepest consideration, I might
 dwell upon his close devotion to the interests of the African; the
 promotion of the leading measures of the Manumission Society;
 and the enactment of laws for the final abolition of slavery in the
 state of New York. The education of the blacks, and the esta-
blishment of African free schools, were also among the objects of
 his solicitude. The bettering the condition of the poor, the
 organization of the Lancasterian free schools, and an improved
 code of prison discipline, were subjects which engrossed most
 of his time for many years; and I think you will find many
 documents among his papers, which evince his successful efforts
to further these benevolent purposes. The claims of Mr. Eddy to a lasting consideration will, how-
ever, I think, rest mainly on the early begun and long continued
 zeal and abilities which he exhibited on the subject of insanity,
 and the unfortunate beings afflicted with that calamity. At a
 comparatively youthful period of his life, he was appointed to the
 duties of hospital direction; and he seems at nearly the same
 period to have turned his attention to the treatment and hospital
 discipline of those afflicted with mental derangement. Our esta-
blishments for the better medical government of lunacy were
 then very few and imperfect. Pennsylvania had indeed done
 something—New York nothing. The public spirited governors
 of the New York Hospital, were induced from urgent represent¬
ations made them, to erect a separate edifice on the hospital-
 grounds for the exclusive benefit of lunatics ; and this institution,
 which opened its doors in 1808, under the professional direction
 of the late Dr. Bruce , for a while seemed to answer the benevo-
lent intentions of the board of governors. It was, however, ere
 long, apparent that this city asylum was of too limited a capacity
 for the accommodation of its numerous applicants; nor was the
 receptacle itself of the character demanded for the afflicted and
 valuable beings of all ranks of society who became the inmates
 of it. Mr. Eddy had read much, and thought much on the sub-
jects of mental derangement, on prison and penitentiary discipline,
 on the structure and economy of mad-houses, and on the domestic
 and sanative treatment of the insane. His correspondence with
several distinguished characters abroad, favoured the accuracy
 and accumulation of his knowledge on these engrossing topics:
 his intimate and free verbal disquisitions on all these several
 matters with that excellent man and eminent philanthropist, the
 late John Murray, jun. strengthened his views : he compared the
 facts thus derived from these several sources, with his personal
 experience at the city asylum of the New York Hospital, where
 he was almost daily engaged: the result was a firmer conviction
 in him, that much improvement might be made in the govern-
ment and remedial treatment of mental derangement. The writings and reports of Howard , of Ferriar, of Haygarth,
 and of Lind, on prisons, fever hospitals, and houses of recovery,
 were the principal sources, whence, at that time, information was
 derived touching these momentous subjects; and few looked fur-
ther for knowledge on the diseases of the mind than to the pages
 of Crighton, Haslam, Pinel, and Rush. It was therefore with
 no ordinary solicitude that the friends of humanity in America
 heard of the success which crowned the benevolent exertions of
 the Society of Friends, near York, in England, who had esta-
blished a Retreat for the Insane, for the express purpose of insti-
tuting a milder system of management than had previously been
 employed. Some account of the Retreat was published by Mr. 
Tuke in 1813. Mr. Eddy entered into a correspondence with
 that gentleman, in order to obtain more ample and precise infor
mation than Mr. Tuke 's work afforded. Shortly subsequent to
 this date, the important parliamentary investigations on the
 management of the mad-houses of Great Britain were instituted;
 and the elaborate reports which soon followed, embodied such a
 mass of facts, of indubitable authenticity and vital consideration,
 as left not a doubt in the minds of the most sceptical, that perni-
cious errors widely prevailed on the nature of insanity; that
 gross evils and enormous barbarities were inflicted on the unfor-
tunate victims of madness, as salutary and requisite principles of
 medical treatment; that in several of these institutions, to the
 miseries inseparable to a loss of reason, were added the horrors
 and atrocities of brutalized ignorance, refined, if I may so say,
 by the absurdest therapeutical doctrines which the sophistry of
 man ever invented. Happily, at the same time, these investiga-
tions and inquiries, while they gave multiplied proofs of frightful 
abuses, demonstrated that in numerous cases mental alienation,
 like many physical infirmities, strictly so considered, was often
 remediable; that to pronounce a condemnation of the insane to
 total incapability of medical relief in all after life, was a decision
 at variance with the strongest evidence of a contrary character,
 deduced from the results of the practice, not only at the Retreat
 at York, but of the Asylums at Nottingham, Glasgow, and other
 places ; in short, that individuals who had lost health and reason,
 might be restored to both, by the judicious use of medicine, and
 a mild moral management. Fortified with such testimony, Mr. Eddy 's zeal was quickened;
 he united with several eminent citizens among us, of whom I
 may particularly notice the late Mr. John Murray, jun. , the late
 General Clarkson , and the late Thomas Franklin , in an applica-
tion to our legislature for efficient means to enable the gover-
nors of the New York Hospital, to erect a suitable establishment
 for the insane, on a scite appropriate to such an object. The
 result, was the ample grant by the state of New York, and the
 delightful grounds and improvements connected therewith. The
 whole is a proud trophy of Mr. Eddy 's laudable perseverance;
 while the act by which it was secured, will ever remain conspi-
cuous among the many which characterized the administration
 of Governor De Witt Clinton. Mr. Eddy , in common with many other benevolent individuals,
 was at first disposed to place a more entire reliance on the moral
 management of insanity, to the exclusion of all medical treat-
ment, than, I think, the facts in the case warrant. This belief I
 know, he for some time cherished; but the enlarged experience
 and personal observation which for many years he afterwards
 enjoyed at the noble institution which his own efforts so power-
fully contributed to organize, led him to qualify his views on the
 curative means in lunacy. Having, while in Europe, at the time
 when the management and treatment of the insane constituted a
 prominent subject of discussion, visited most of the lunatic insti-
tutions of Great Britain, France, and Holland, I became fully
 convinced that those asylums in which a prompt and judicious
 medical practice was adopted, afforded the largest favourable
 results of the tractable nature of many forms of diseased mani-
festations of mind: that such indeed was the case even at the 
Retreat at York, where the number of recoveries was greater
 when well directed medical discipline was united to moral means
 of relief; at the asylum at Glasgow, and at La Sal Petrierie,
 Charanton, France, under the direction of M. Pinel , the first
 among the moderns for adopting the moral system; while, on the
 other hand, in Holland, where through a mistaken belief that
 the maniac is unsusceptible of mental enjoyment, and that insanity
 is deemed an intractable disorder, no curative measures were
 employed, and of consequence, recovery was protracted and
 indeed rarely took place.*
Some of the abuses which I witnessed in Holland, in the treatment of the
 insane, were scarcely inferior in their enormity, to those of the metropolitan
 Bethlehem Hospital, as brought to light by parliamentary investigation. I hardly
 know whether the memorable case of William Norris surpassed in cruelty an
 example which presented itself to me of an aged male adult, who had been
 manacled and confined for some twelve years, under circumstances of suffer-
ings, privations, and tortures, a parallel to which Mr. Haslam alone could pro-
bably supply. Other cases of a like character I might detail as specimens of
 the practice of that country. Doubtless, the treatment of insanity has been
 more humanely regarded in Holland, as well as elsewhere, within the past fif-
teen or sixteen years. The evidence deduced from truths of this nature, and the con-
stantly accumulating proofs in behalf of medical treatment which
 modern experience supplied, doubtless had their influence in caus-
ing Mr. Eddy several years before his death, to adopt the opinion
 that the proper administration of medicinal agents, was favoura-
ble to the treatment of insanity; nay, oftentimes indispensable. There is another circumstance I can hardly allow to be passed
 over on this occasion without a remark, and which I think has
 been a concurring cause of the too hasty and too general adop-
tion of moral management, as of itself alone the essential means of
 cure of maniacal subjects. The delirium of inebriety, and the
 more advanced forms of diseased action denominated delirium
 tremens, have inadvertently been confounded with idiopathic
 mania; and inasmuch as the right use of reason is for the most
 part, in those cases, soon restored by mere abstraction from noxious
 potation, which is effectually secured by confinement, moral
 management, without other aid, has been allowed an undue
 weight in the curative process of genuine mania. I am aware
 that permanent cerebral disorganization may arise from intem-
perance in drink, as dissection has repeatedly shown; but the
 neglect of a distinct pathognomonic difference between the
 ravings of inebriety, or delirium tremens, and mental derange
ment, strictly so considered, have led to gross miscalculations in
 our prognosis. As alcoholic insanity is engendered in every
 country where drunkenness prevails, it is perhaps more fre-
quently seen in our mixed population, than in that of Europe.
 Hence we have sometimes been led to pronounce hastily and
 erroneously that our success in the management of lunacy is
 greater than that of other nations. We, however, must be sup-
plied with more extensive and more accurate tabular views of the
 comparative results of practice, in different institutions abroad and
 at home, before we can come to a satisfactory conclusion on this
 contested head. It is cheering to the feelings of the philanthro-
pist to know, that by remedial measures, much more is accom-
plished at the present day, than was at a former time imagined
 practicable; and Mr. Eddy 's convictions in after life, that the
 treatment of derangements of the mind, like that of disorders of
 the body, would ere long bear signal triumphs of professional skill
 in the healing art, seem likely to be experienced at no very remote
 period. Mr. Eddy 's name is associated with those of Fulton, Colden ,
 Morris, Van Rensselaer, Hawley, and others, in projecting the
 canal system of New York. Years before the commencement
 of the Erie and Hudson Canal, he entertained enlarged views,
 founded on extensive personal knowledge of the country, of the
 expediency and practicability of inland communication by water.
 A paper on the subject, written by himself, may be seen in Dr.
 Hosack's memoir of De Witt Clinton . He was a member of the Board appointed by the Legislature,
 in 1810, to explore the route of an inland navigation from the
\Hudson river to Lake Ontario and Lake Erie; and he accom-
panied the commissioners on that tour of public duty. A copy
 of the first published report on this subject, dated February,
 1811, may be seen in the American Medical and Philosophical
 Register. In common with Clinton , Morris, Pintard, and other
 advocates, for the general organization of the canal policy at
 that early stage of this great undertaking, odious imputations
 were freely bestowed upon him and his compatriots, and with 
them he was assailed with the weapons of ridicule, by an opposi-
tion thinly scattered throughout the state, but strongly confede-
rated in this city. It was absurdly proclaimed that New York
 would be utterly ruined by carrying into effect the projected canal
 measures. Notwithstanding the provocations were many and
 strong, he betrayed no evidences of irritability or disquietude,
 but, like primitive Barclay , sustained himself with an unshaken
 indifference, feeling assured that ignorance could not long retain
 its usurped powers, and that rancour, the offspring of party hatred
 and disappointed ambition, would in due time exhaust itself by
 the force of its own venom. Little need be said touching the scholastic acquisitions of Mr.
 Eddy . All I believe he ever received at school, was embraced in an
 English elementary education. He, however, deeply studied the
 human character: as opportunities occurred, he read on general
 subjects of life and letters. He was versed in profane and eccle-
siastical story, and might be deemed an adept in Quaker annals,
 from the History of Sewall down to Sarah Grub's Journal.
 Knowledge being higher prized for defence than ornament, he
 turned his information in these matters to an advantageous dex-
terity, when he encountered, in his journey, that marvellous im-
postor of the Shakers, Jemima Wilkinson , the elect lady, during
 his tour of observation as canal commissioner in 1810. He often
 spoke of this incident with peculiar pleasure. His researches
 in polemical disquisitions made him often deprecate the folly and
 injurious tendency of sectarian controversy on religious matters;
 and confirmed him in the excellence of the more salutary influ-
ence of the unsophisticated or orthodox doctrines, as he termed
 them, of the Society of Friends. Though these were his views,
 he felt that the intellectual culture of the Quakers was behind
 that of many other religious communities; and I am persuaded
 his desire to promote knowledge, made him often regret, that
 while the society to which he belonged had every reason to
 boast of its morality, philanthropy, and benevolence; it neglected
 too much the important advantages arising from the support of
 a literary order of men for the better education of its youth.
 Sound knowledge, he would say, subdues idleness, and prevents
 vacuity; and a disciplined mind enables the possessor to conduct
 himself with greater safety in the right way. It will readily be
allowed, that the ethics of Quakerism, while they lead to the rejec-
tion of speculative principles, tend to the acquisition of practical
 facts ; and, however prone the mind may be to theorize, it is some-
what hard for theory to usurp an undue influence over a Quaker
 judgment. Mr. Eddy might he fairly cited as an example, in
 illustration of what is now advanced. Hence I account for his
 indifference to works of fancy; poetry and prose were alike
 perused by him for the solid instruction they imparted; and he
 read Dr. Mitchill's translation of the piscatory stanzas of Sanna-
zarius, and the lofty strains of Dryden, with similar emotions. No book of modern times stood so high in his estimation, as
 the Letters on the Christian Religion, by Dr. Olinthus Gregory,
 and he exerted his influence in the diffusion of that admirable
 work. As his efforts in behalf of new plans, or modified pro-
jects, generally quadrated with the usefulness to be derived from
 contemplated measures, he was in the constant habit of urging
 the economical precepts and moral sayings of Franklin, which
 he often embodied, as the soundest advice, in his confidential let-
ters to those of his young friends, for whom he cherished a par-
ticular regard. The intellectuality of Madame De Stael yielded
 him less gratification than the expositions of Hannah More;
 and a higher glow of feeling was enkindled in his breast by
 Rumford on Cookery and Stoves, than by Burke on the Sublime
 and Beautiful. It is almost superfluous to add, that you may re-
gard him as a decided utilitarian. Of the various societies with which he was associated, he was
 fairly considered an operative member. Aware that business
 might be well debated, and yet badly managed; he rarely spoke
 in a public body, and when his opinions were demanded, he deli-
vered his remarks with plainness, brevity, and pertinency. In the
 social circle, his conversation was more animated: as he had
 mixed largely with different classes of mankind, and abounded
 in lively anecdotes, it was often highly interesting. On occa-
sions, he evinced a wholesome intrepidity and an enlarged cha-
rity; yet he wished every thing congenerous with the practical,
 and he saw with little satisfaction the diffusion of philippics
 against luxurious living among a people subsisting mainly on
 the precarious tenure of the chase, and tractates on extravagance
 in dress among those whose chief vesture was a blanket. I need not enlarge. I think you may safely assent to the con-
clusion, that the subject of your biography appropriated the best
 years of a long life to the best purposes of man; that he may be
 justly deemed enlightened, among a people whose frugal views
 occasion perhaps too partial and too low an estimation of intellec-
tual acquirements; that he was eminently conspicuous in a
 society deservedly regarded as excelling all others in works of 
charity and philanthropy. I am acquainted with but one striking instance in his whole life
 in which the integrity of his judgment was seriously impugned:
 he was unwittingly captivated by the enthusiasm which prevailed
 concerning the metallic tractors, and was led to confide in the
 remedial efficacy of Perkinism, by experiments instituted at the 
New York Hospital, where that practice was countenanced for a
 short while by certain of the physicians of that charity. But
 little censure can rest with him on this particular account: he
 was not educated a physician ; and this extraordinary deception 
received the support of many eminent professional characters, both
 in Europe and America, and indeed was not completely exploded
 as an unwarrantable hypothesis until subjected to the clinical acu-
men of Dr. Haygarth . A word or two on your inquiry relative to his son John Eddy .
 I refer you to a short memoir of him printed in the American
 Monthly Magazine; more might have been said of his know-
ledge of the physical branches of science, than is there recorded.
 He was a good zoologist, an excellent mineralogist, and a minute
 botanist. His acquisitions in this last named department were
 very remarkable. He was a member of the botanical class when
 I attended Columbia College in 1809-10. But it was requisite,
 on account of his being a deaf-mute, that his studies should be
 prosecuted privately by the intervention of signs and the manual
 alphabet. He found a friend willing to give him the necessary
 direction and aid, in his relative, the professor of Botany, Dr.
 Hosack. By visible signs, instead of accentible sounds, he mas-
tered the Linnean system, and subsequently became a practical
 botanist. He formed an herbarium of some extent, of our indi-
genous plants. The greater acuteness of the surviving senses
 when one or more are destroyed, was verified in the case of John
Eddy. His industry was unintermitting, and his attainments 
seemed incredible to those who are unaware what intellectual
 power and activity are occasionally displayed by persons to whom
 one sense is shut out. The blind Rumphius, of Holland, is still
recognized as conspicuous among erudite botanical investigators;
 and John Eddy , had his life been protracted, and he given an
 exclusive attention to the same kind of studies, might have
 secured to himself a permanent place in the catalogue of Ame-
rican botanists. Make such use of this imperfect letter as you may think fit. With due consideration, I remain, very respectfully, JOHN W. FRANCIS . 
To Colonel S. L. KNAPP. LIFE OF THOMAS EDDY . But these were merciful men, whose righteousness hath not been forgotten. Their bodies are buried in peace, but their name liveth for evermore. AT no period in the history of nations has the mind
 of man been more active in the great business of
 ameliorating his condition, than that which has elap-
sed since the close of the American revolution. Inven-
tion, industry, and enterprise, have been abroad, and
 multiplied conveniences, comforts, and even elegan-
cies, beyond enumeration. Nor has this been all:
 Those charitable institutions, which are, at the same
 time, the medicine for natural and moral evils, and the
 noble ornaments of civil society, have every where been
 built up, but especially in this country; and it
 is not too much to say, that, in many instances, our
 institutions have become patterns for other nations,
 even those of the old world, from which, in other
 things, we have taken so much in organizing societies
 amongst ourselves. These institutions although of
 the first importance to the public welfare, seem to lie
 out of the path of the general historian, who contents
 himself with some cursory remarks upon them as
 domestic matters, and goes on to battles, treaties,
 and political occurrences, as making up all that is worthy 
the attention of the reader, or proper for his pen;
 and, it is singular, that the writers of biography should
 have so seldom taken up the lives of philanthropists.
 Almost every grade of society, and every adventurer,
 has been described, while those who laboured for the
 good of mankind have been, with some few excep-
tions, neglected. The reading world have been sup-
plied with countless volumes written upon the deeds
 of warriors, who have desolated nations, and marked
 their footsteps with blood. In the opinion of men,
 they had conquered their fame:
 They were the mighty of the world,
 The demi-gods of earth;
 Their breath—the flag of blood unfurled 
And gave the battle birth.
 They lived—to trample on mankind,
 And in their ravage leave behind
 The impress of their worth.
 And wizzard rhyme, and hoary song,
 Hallowed their deeds, and hymned their wrong.
The statesmen and orators, as well as warriors, have
 had their Plinys and their Plutarchs to hand them
 down to posterity in a blaze of glory; and even the
 poets who were neglected while living, have had their
 Cibbers and Johnsons to tell the world how they suf-
fered and how they sung; while the philanthropist,
 whose deeds have an influence on the moral world,
 as the dews of heaven have upon the natural, has
 hardly found a poet or historian. Not even a name
 has been left on record for the good Samaritan. In
 a few instances, it is true, genius and feeling have
 burst out into a sweet strain of honest eulogy of the
 benevolent, such as will never be forgotten. Pope's
 tuneful tribute to the Man of Ross, and Burke's
 eloquent description of Howard , can never be lost.
 Some, in modern times, have sketched the lives of a
 few philanthropists, but frequently in so tame a man-
ner, that one would think that there was a canon
 against showing the slightest enthusiasm in com-
memorating the good. Some few have broken through
 their shackles, and dared to assign them a place in the
history of man, and to say to these doers of good in
 a spirit of prophecy,
 Thine was an empire o'er distress;
 Thy triumph—of the mind;
 To burst the bonds of wretchedness,
 The friend of human kind:
 Thy name—through every future age,
 By bard, philanthropist, and sage,
 In glory shall be shrined. 
But these honest chroniclers have as yet had no chance
 with the delineators of warriors and statesmen, who
 had astonished, awed, and charmed mankind. It is
 believed that a day of better taste is dawning upon
 us, and that men will take as much pleasure in tra-
cing the rise and progress of an asylum for the chil-
dren of poverty and disease, as in recounting a battle 
in which thousands were made miserable, and which
 created many orphans at a blow. Promiscuous charity has been practised by the
 kind-hearted and the wealthy in every age and nation.
 The benevolent have poured the oil and wine into
 the wounds of the unfortunate, to assuage their
 anguish, if they could not heal them; they have fed
 the hungry and clothed the naked, and in so doing
 have received their reward in the blessings of the
 just. The Saviour of the world declared that, inas-
much as this was done to one of the children of
 misfortune, it was done unto himself. But notwith-
standing this generous current of philanthropy has
 been flowing in the hearts of the virtuous, in all
 nations, since the birth of man, yet it was left for a
 late age to collect facts relative to human misery, and
 from these to form a system for permanent relief.
 In former times, charity seemed to pour out her heart
 like water, but never to consult reason upon the true
 means of preventing the evils she mourned. In this
 age she has called in industry, sagacity, perseverance,
 and the highest order of invention, to assist her in
 her great undertakings. Prisons, in every age and nation, have been viewed 
 with horror by the great mass of the people; their
 bars and gates and chains have been so intimately
 associated with crime and infamy, that the blood
 curdled at the very thought of them, and the shortest
 confinement was a lasting disgrace; and no wonder,
 for within the four walls, and frequently in the same
 room, the murderer, the thief, the insane, and the
 honest debtor, mingled their wailings, and breathed
 the same tainted atmosphere. It seemed as if the
 powerful and the benevolent were paralyzed in con-
templating these evils, and thought the slightest
 remedy was beyond all hope. They could do some-
thing to soften the miseries of the individual, but dared
 not combat the prejudices of the age, nor attempt to
 form a general system to reach a class of cases. About the middle of the last century, a philanthro-
pist arose in England, who gave a new direction to
 the alms of individuals, to the sympathy of communi-
ties, and to the charity of nations. This philanthro-
pist was John Howard .* * See Appendix. He was a man of strict
 habits, of daring courage, both natural and moral.
 He began, as it was then considered, a crusade of
 charity. He examined the state of all the prisons in
 England and Wales, and then extended his researches
 through the continent. He made known his disco-
veries to the grand inquest of the British nation, the
 House of Commons. This august body heard the
 relation with surprise, and set about turning the infor-
mation they had gained to alleviating miseries, which
 until then had appeared as among legendary tales
 or incurable evils. Howard was still indefatigable
 in his new pathway of glory, and at last fell a martyr
 to his zeal in the cause, on the banks of the Euxine.
 His exertions, however, were so bold and novel, as to
 excite general attention, and to give a new impulse
 to the charitable dispositions of the human mind.
 He was indeed born for the universe, and the effects of
 his exertions are pervading the whole of Christendom. America has been so intimately connected with
 England in science and letters, that all that has been
 done in that country, was soon known in this, and
 has generally been imitated, when found to be good;
 at first, by small beginnings, which were, from time
 to time, increased and improved, as information and
 wealth advanced. The privations and sufferings of
 a new people, taught them to be kind to one another,
 and gave them the habits as well as the spirit of
 benevolence. It might, of course, have been expected
 by the patriot and philosopher, that Howard would
 have a school in America. This school has been
 established. One of the most distinguished disciples of this
 university of charity, was Thomas Eddy , a merchant
 of the city of New York. He was born about the
 period that Howard began to mark out his course of
 action. Eddy not only made this great philanthro-
pist his pattern, but he carried his reasonings farther
 than Howard had an opportunity to do. Seizing the
 facts and reasonings which Howard had furnished,
 he added others, truly his own, and set about to
 influence his fellow citizens to make practical efforts
 to test the correctness of his views, and the sound-
ness of his principles; and such was his success, that
 he, by general consent, received the appellation of
 the HOWARD OF AMERICA. Some notice of the life,
 writings, and deeds of such a man, it is believed, will
 not only be acceptable, but useful to the public, as
 an incentive to like efforts, and as a satisfactory proof
 of what can be done among men by one individual
 of intelligence, virtue, and moral courage. If, in later life, it is difficult for a man to speak of
 himself and his deeds, particularly, if he has been
 called to take a conspicuous part on the stage of
action; still, that autobiography of such a man which 
recounts the deeds and trials of childhood and youth,
and so far into manhood as to come up to the time
 when distinction commences, is always the best, when 
it can be obtained. Fortunately, a plain, modest,
 and well written account of the early days of Thomas
 Eddy, has been left from his own hand. It was only
 intended for the eye of his family and particular
 friends, but the narrative is so happy, that it would
 be over fastidious indeed to hesitate to use it on this
 occasion. It is almost impossible for a biographer,
even with every aid before him, to describe the true
 growth and development of a mind, from the cradle to
 maturity. The individual himself can alone approx-
imate to the truth. In childhood and youth, when
 the imagination wanders at will, none but the per-
son himself can tell all the avenues and directions of
 thought, nor precisely when passion was commingled
 with judgment, or by what food and exercise the
 mind obtained its stature. I shall, as the best thing
 that can be done for my readers, introduce an extract,
 in Mr. Eddy's own words, giving an account of him-
self up to the time he began his effectual efforts as
 a philanthropist:— I can only trace my ancestors as far back as my
 grandfather, John Edie , (by a letter I have seen from
 him to my father, he so spelled his name,) who lived in
 Belfast, in Ireland, but he probably came from Aberdeen,
 in Scotland. He was much respected and esteemed
 as a remarkably upright honest man—he was in low
 circumstances, and only able to give my father a small
 portion of school learning. My father, James Eddy ,
 was born in Belfast, 1712; he served an apprenticeship
 to William Sinclair , a respectable merchant in Dublin.
 My mother's name was Mary Darragh ; she was born
 in Dublin about l724; she was of a respectable and good
 family. My parents were married in Dublin about the
 year 1742. She had a fortune of about £1000 sterling.
 I believe soon after their marriage, they removed to
 Belfast, and there my father pursued mercantile busi-
ness. They had both been educated Presbyterians,
 but during their residence in that city, he became
 acquainted with Robert Bradshaw , a Friend, of consi
derable estate, who resided at Newtonards, about seven
 miles from Belfast, and was highly respected and
 much beloved. He was not a minister, but a meeting
 was held at his house, which was occasionally attend-
ed by some of his tenants. He lent my father some
 Friend's books, who in this way became acquainted
 with their principles, and was received as a member
 in the society. My mother was warmly attached to the
 Presbyterians, and much prejudiced against the doc-
trines and principles of Friends; however, she after-
wards became convinced of their rectitude, and was
 received into membership. She was a pious and valua-
ble woman. About the year 1753, they embarked for
 America, and landed and settled at Philadelphia. My
 father pursued mercantile business, mostly in shipping,
 till about 1766, when he went into the ironmongery
 business. He died in 9th month. My mother had six-
teen children, of whom none are now living, but my
 sister, Mary Hosack , and myself. She was only a few
 months old at the time of our father's decease. I was
 born in Philadelphia, 5th of 9th month, 1758. My
 mother carried on the hardware business extensively
 after my father's death, till the year 1796, when she
 removed to Buckingham, in Bucks county. She was
 induced to quit the city on account of the bitter spi-
rit of persecution of the Whigs (the advocates of
 American independence) against the Tories, (so call-
ed on account of their attachment to the mother
 country;) and our family being of the latter descrip-
tion, we suffered considerably from the opposite par-
ty. Schools were then badly conducted, and many
 of them broken up, on account of the teachers being
 Tories, so that I had but a poor chance of getting an
 education. All the learning I acquired was reading,
 writing, and arithmetic, as far as vulgar fractions.
 As to grammar, I could repeat some of its definitions
 by rote, but was totally ignorant of its principles.
 About the year 1771, my mother placed me as an ap-
prentice with John Hoskins , of Burlington, to learn
the tanning business, but owing to some misunder-
standing about my learning the currying trade, I
 did not continue with him more than two years.
 Public affairs were in a very unsettled state, and
 a great deal of bitterness and ill-will subsisted
 amongst the people, which produced much division
 and strife between families and near connexions,
 who had heretofore lived in perfect peace and har-
mony. The science of government was little under-
stood, yet every bustling politician was a great man.
 Many of the most respectable citizens were opposed
 to a separation from Great Britain, yet all acknow-
ledged that the claims of the British Parliament
 were severe and unjust. Those opposed to indepen-
dence conceived that more ought to have been done
to obtain redress of grievances in a peaceable way,
 without having recourse to the shedding of blood.
 Every one seemed to take a decided and warm part,
 and was attached, and marked as belonging to one
 or other of the two parties. It now appears very
 clearly to my mind, that it would have been more
 wise and consistent with the principles of Friends, if
 they had more carefully avoided the intemperate
 political zeal, then manifested by all parties. The
 advice of George Fox, was for Friends to keep out
 of all civil commotions, &c., as they are mostly car-
ried on in a temper very opposite to the meek and
 quiet spirit of the Gospel. From the age of 16 to 20
 years, my most particular and intimate friends were
 Charles Mifflin and William Savary , with whom I
 daily associated. The former was well educated
 and of a fine understanding, with sound principles
 and a marked integrity. The latter was a most
 valuable character, and a highly pleasing and enter-
taining companion. We were all fond of such sub-
jects and pursuits as were most likely to promote
 mirth and pleasantry, yet the wise and excellent
 sentiments communicated to us by Charles Mifflin 
 were one means of preserving us from much harm;
and happy would it have been for me, if I had,
 through life, more imitated his excellent character.
 He possessed fine literary talents, and as a poet was
 pleasing and instructive. His family connexions
 were wealthy, and generally fashionable. He, more
 particularly, during the latter part of his life, was a
 truly religious and good man. Of William Savary ,
 it would be difficult for me to say too much. No
 two persons could entertain a more near and tender
 regard and affection for each other, than always
 subsisted between us. He was a man of uncommon-
ly strong mind, and good understanding. When
 about 25 years of age, he became a minister, and per-
haps there never was one more highly esteemed and
 beloved. He was admired by all classes, and openly
 opposed to every thing in the least marked with
 bigotry or superstition. As a preacher, he was in
 the first rank. His manner of delivery was pleasing
 and solemn, his mind was cultivated and improved,
 and he was uncommonly liberal in his sentiments
 towards those of other societies. I have often thought
 there never was so nearly perfect a character, within
 my knowledge, in our society, and none that more
 extensively inculcated and effectually diffused, true,
 practical, Christian principles. I could do no less
 than pay this brief tribute to the memory of these
 two excellent men, who were the friends of my
 youth, and who early instilled into my mind, opi-
nions and sentiments, that have been instructive and
 useful to me through life. In 1777, the British troops took possession of Phila-
delphia, and soon after their entering the city, the
 American army attacked them at Germantown. I
 rode out with William Savary to that place, before
 the battle was entirely over, and had a view, a mourn-
ful view, of the killed and wounded on the ground.
 When we arrived, the Americans had retreated, and
 the British army had advanced as far as Chesnut
 Hill. About a month previous to the arrival of the 
British in Philadelphia, a number of Friends, amongst
 whom was my elder brother Charles , were arrested by
 a general warrant, by order of the Executive Council
 of Pennsylvania, and without being admitted to a
 hearing, were unjustly banished to Winchester, in
 Virginia. Of this number, I recollect the names of
 Israel , John , and James Pemberton , Edward Pening-
ton, Thomas , Samuel , and Myers Fisher , Thomas
 Gilpin, and others. The alleged charge against them
 was, that they were unfriendly to the independence
 of America. They were absent several months, and
 were allowed to return, during the time the British
 occupied the city. The British army evacuated
 Philadelphia in 6th month, 1778. Soon after, several
 persons were arrested, under a charge of aiding the
 British, and were tried for treason. As is common
 in all civil wars, the minds of people were extremely
 irritated against each other, and those who were
 attached to the British government, were often very
 bitterly persecuted by the opposite party. Amongst 
those citizens of Philadelphia charged with treason,
 were John Roberts and Abraham Carlisle . They
 were both Friends of good reputation, and very
 respectable men. The former was a miller, and resi-
ded near Merion meeting house, about six miles from
 Philadelphia. The latter was a board merchant,
 near Vine street. The charge against Roberts was,
 that when the British troops were on their march to
 take possession of Philadelphia, and had advanced
 near Swedes Ford, on the Schuylkill, 17 miles from
 the city, he sent word to General Howe , who com-
manded the British, that the Friends, who, as afore-
mentioned, had been banished to Virginia, were then
 proceeding on the road to Reading, and suggested to
 the General that he should send a detachment of the
 army to fall in with them, in order that they might
 return to their families. After the British took pos-
session of the city, a line of fortifications was com-
pleted from the Schuylkill to the Delaware, and
gates were placed at different parts of this line. At
 one of these gates, Abraham Carlisle was stationed by
 direction of General Howe , in order to examine all
 who went out of the city, or came into it, and it was
 made his duty to stop any suspicious persons. This
 constituted the charge exhibited against him. They
 were both tried by Judge McKean , condemned to be
 hanged, and were accordingly executed. John
 Robert's funeral was at Merion, on which occasion
 a meeting was held, which was very large. He was
 extensively known, and much beloved. Nicholas
 Waln, and others, preached, and I attended, as did a
 large number from the city. Abraham Carlisle was
 interred in Friend's burial ground in Fourth street;
 his funeral, also, was very large. When the British
 troops evacuated Philadelphia, my brother Charles 
 removed to New York, and in 4th month, 1779, 1 also
 left my native city and came by land to New York.
 At this period it was very dangerous travelling with-
out a passport. I was put over to Staten Island (pos-
sessed by the British troops) at night, and next day
 reached New York. My brother Charles had, some
 time before, sailed for England. I had sold my
 horse at Rahway, and had only ninety-six dollars on
 my reaching New-York, where I was totally a stran-
ger, and as to a knowledge of any kind of business,
 entirely ignorant. My school learning, as I have be-
fore mentioned, was very limited, so that, of course,
 I had to encounter many difficulties, and laboured
 under great disadvantage in my attempts to acquire
 a sufficiency to defray my expenses. I took board
 with William Backhouse , in the house now occupied
 by Daniel McCormick in Wall street, at the rate of
eight dollars per week, besides having to pay one
 dollar weekly for washing; Samuel Elain , late of
 Newport, deceased, John I. Glover , and two or three
 other respectable merchants, boarded at the same
 house; becoming acquainted with them was highly
 useful to me, as it was the first opportunity I had
ever had of acquiring a knowledge of commerce,
 and the course of mercantile dealing. I knew that
 it was out of my power to support myself with what
 I then possessed, and that I must soon come to want,
 unless I could succeed in business. The first thing
 to which my attention was turned, was daily to
 attend auctions at the Coffee House, and being sen-
sible of my own ignorance, I endeavoured by every
 means in my power to acquire information—care-
fully inquiring of others the names of articles ex-
posed for public sale, as it often happened that I was
 not even acquainted with the names of many of
 them, I then inquired their value, and advised with
 some persons previous to purchasing; sometimes on
 noticing an article intended to be sold by auction, I
 would procure a sample, and call on some dealer in
 the article, and get them to offer me a fixed price on
 my furnishing it: in this way, by first ascertaining
 where I could dispose of the goods, I would purchase,
 provided the price would afford me a profit. On this
plan I have found a purchaser for goods, bought and
 delivered them, and received the money which ena-
bled me to pay the auctioneer the cost of them, with-
out my advancing one shilling. I was obliged to
live by my wits, and this necessity was of great use
 to me afterwards. Some months after my arrival at
 New York, my brother Charles arrived from Ireland,
 and brought with him, on account of merchants there,
 provisions, linens, &c. shipped from Dublin, Cork,
 Belfast, and other ports. He returned to Europe in
 1780, previous to which we formed a copartnership
 with Benjamin Sykes , under the firm of Eddy, Sykes, & Co. This firm prosecuted business mostly in consign-
ments from England and Ireland, and some shipping
 business. My partner was a good natured honest
 Englishman, but not possessed of a very intelligent,
 active mind; in consequence of this, the management
 and contrivance of the business fell to my lot, and, 
though very young, and without experience, I had
 to write all the letters, and carry on every kind of
correspondence, besides mostly making all the pur-
chases and sales. By every packet we had to write
 twenty or thirty letters to England and Ireland, and
 to accomplish this, had frequently to sit writing till
 12 or 1 o'clock in the morning. I was sedulously
 and actively employed in business, and in this way
 acquired considerable knowledge of commercial af-
fairs. Our concerns were extensive, and were prose-
cuted with tolerable success, respectability, and repu-
tation. My brother George was, at this time, in
 Philadelphia, about 18 years of age. He possessed a
 remarkably sensible and comprehensive mind. Al-
though he had no knowledge of business, he was
 full of enterprise. By him, in Philadelphia, and by
 Eddy, Sykes & Co. in New York, an arrangement
 was made, with the consent of General Washington ,
 to supply the British and foreign troops with money,
 who were taken with Lord Cornwallis at York
 Town. The money was raised by my brother at
 Philadelphia, drawing on us at New York, and the
monies thus raised were paid to the Paymaster of
 the British and foreign troops, prisoners at Lancas-
ter, Pennsylvania , for which he received and sent to
 Eddy, Sykes & Co. that Paymaster's drafts on the
 Paymaster General at New York. By an agreement
 made with Sir Henry Clinton , the British commander,
 we were paid six per cent. commission. The whole
 amount paid amounted to a very large sum, and
 proved a profitable contract. After being some time in business, I kept house in
 John street. My most intimate friends, at this time,
 were Richard and Lawrence Hartshorne . I had
 formed some acquaintance with Lawrence Harts-
horne's sister previous to my coming to New York,
 and then experienced a tender and warm attachment
 towards her, and about a year after my coming to
 New York, I went down to Sandy Hook in company 
with Lawrence Hartshorne , whose object in attempt-
ing this dangerous enterprise was to visit his parents,
 whilst mine was to obtain an interview with his
 sister. In the evening, we immediately ventured on
 shore, and went to his father's, who resided on his
 farm at Black Point. The family were all in bed,
 and we were thus disappointed in seeing any of
 them. Lawrence was advised by his father to return
 immediately to Sandy Hook, as there was reason to
 suspect that parties of the militia were then near the
 premises. We accordingly went to the river side,
 and taking a small canoe, pushed off in hopes of
 getting safe to the Hook; it was moonlight, and as
 we kept off some distance from the shore, we did
 not apprehend danger till we should reach the Gut
 (as it was called) which separated Sandy Hook from
 the Highlands. This was very narrow, so that we 
were obliged to pass within a little distance of the
 Jersey shore. There were stationed about thirty of
 the Jersey militia, and a number of them fired on us.
 We laid ourselves on our backs in the bottom of the
 canoe, and some of the balls went through the sides,
 immediately over our bodies. Finding we could not
 escape, we rowed to the shore, and surrendered our-
selves prisoners. At first, they treated us harshly,
 searched us, and took from us some articles of small
 value. In the morning they marched us to Middle-
town, and then to Monmouth Court-house, where we
 were taken before Judge Symmes (the father of 
Capt. Symmes ) and committed to prison. We were
 put in a small room, about six or seven feet square,
 in which we found four or five prisoners, some of 
whom had been confined there some time. We were
 much crowded, and had nothing to lie on but ex-
tremely dirty straw, which I believe had not been
 changed since the other prisoners had occupied the
 room. On first entering this miserable dungeon, the
 stench occasioned by foul and noxious air exceedingly
 alarmed me, and it was strongly fixed on my mind
that it would put an end to my life in less than half
 an hour. However, in time, it did not feel so very
 offensive, and becoming habituated to it, I was able
 to eat my meals with a good appetite. Elisha Boudinot (now President of the American
 Bible Society) was then commissary of prisoners;
 I consulted with him, and he behaved very friendly
 towards me. One day, it was reported that a woman
had offered to swear that she had seen me, a short
 time before this, at New Brunswick. This was false,
 as I had not been out of New York for more than a
 year. It was said, if she would swear I was there,
 it would enable them to prove me a spy. This served,
 of course, to alarm me extremely; however, in a little
 time, no more was said about it. We remained in
 this loathsome place about eight or ten days, and
 were then removed to Springfield, six miles from
 Elizabethtown. At Springfield, we had the liberty
of a mile round the village, and in about a month,
 were exchanged for, I believe, two soldiers of the
 militia, and returned safe to our friends in New York.
 Soon after this, Hannah Hartshorne came to the city
 on a visit to her brother, which afforded me frequent
 opportunities of being in her company, and resulted
 in our forming an affectionate and lasting attach-
ment towards each other. We were married on the
twentieth of 3d month, 1782, at the old Meeting
 House in Liberty street. I continued in business till
 peace was concluded in 1783, and in the 11th month
 of that year, the British troops evacuated the city.
 This was a trying period to myself, and others, who
 had taken refuge in New York, as all persons of our
 description had thereby incurred the ill-will of those
 of the opposite party, and we much feared that we
 should be exceedingly persecuted by them. Great
 numbers went to Nova Scotia, and amongst others,
 my brother in law, Lawrence Hartshorne , and his
 family. I could not reconcile leaving my mother and
 near connexions in Philadelphia, and this considera- 
tion prevented my removing to Halifax. It may now
 appear strange, that persons born in America, should
 have been opposed to American independence. It is,
 however, not surprising, that among the great body of
 the people, who were all born and educated British
 subjects, that many deep-rooted prejudices should
 exist, tending to excite an attachment to that govern-
ment, and an aversion to republicanism. These were sensible of the unjust and tyrannical
 conduct of Great Britain towards this country, but
 they conceived redress of grievances might be ob-
tained without a separation. This, as events proved, was a vain expectation. In
 truth, the science of government was not then so well
 understood as at present, and great numbers, having
 the knowledge they now possess, would then have
 adopted very different political sentiments. This
 would certainly have been the fact as regards myself.
 Before the Americans entered the city, I removed to
 New Jersey, and soon after to Philadelphia. My
 brother Charles was married and in business in Lon-
don, and I formed a connexion in Philadelphia, un-
der the firm of Thomas and George Eddy . In the
 first month of 1784, I went to Virginia for the pur-
pose of purchasing and making shipments of tobacco.
 It was a most remarkably severe winter, and I recol-
lect when riding near Port-Royal on the Rappahanock
 river, that the snow along the fences (drifted) was
 six feet deep. The winter in 1st month, 1780, was,
 however, much more severe. All the bay of New
 York was then frozen, for some weeks, as far as San-
dy Hook. Horses and sleighs passed from the city
 to Staten Island. I remember seeing a number of
 large cannon, 42 pounders, taken on the ice from
 Paulus' Hook or New York to Staten Island. Great
 numbers of people were daily skating on the bay. I
 went on skates to Governor's Island, Bedlow's Island,
 and Paulus' Hook. During the revolutionary war, tobacco, in Europe, 
sold at a very extravagant price, in consequence of
 which considerable quantities were shipped within
 a year after the peace, so that the market was over-
stocked, and the price so reduced, that much money
 was lost by the shippers; my brother and myself lost
 considerable. When peace took place, there were
 scarce any European goods on hand, which occasion-
ed large importations to be made by our merchants.
 The ill effects of this began to be severely felt in
 1786 to 1788, which ruined many in America and
London. Almost the whole of the American trade
 was then confined to London, and very little com-
mercial intercourse with any other port in England.
 My brother Charles had shipped considerably on credit
 to Thomas and George Eddy , and many others, who,
 owing to the country being inundated with every sort
 of goods, were unable to remit to England. Thomas
 and George Eddy, had supplied imprudently an indi-
vidual residing at Fredericksburg, Virginia, with
 goods to a large amount. He died, and left his affairs
 in a very unsettled state. On this account I removed
 with my family to Fredericksburg, and kept a large
 retail store in the name of Thomas and George Eddy,
 my brother George remaining in Philadelphia. This
Virginia business turned out badly, and my being
 much exposed to extravagant and dissipated company
 was a great injury to me in every respect. In 1788,
 I returned to Philadelphia, and as my brother in Lon-
don had failed, it became necessary for Thomas and
 George Eddy to make a settlement with their cre-
ditors. We were discharged under a general act of bank-
ruptcy for the State of Pennsylvania. Since then,
 the debts due from them have been mostly paid.
 Some were not legal demands, and it was thought
 not right to pay them. I now had an opportunity of learning in the school
 of adversity some useful lessons, that have been of
 advantage to me. 1 have often looked back to this 
period, and recollected how much 1 lamented my mis-
fortune, as it is generally termed, but which, indeed,
 was a blessing in disguise, for, not succeeding in
 business in Virginia, obliged me to remove, whereas,
 had I succeeded, I probably should have remained
 there, and, considering my weakness, how apt to
 unite in company in every respect improper and hurt-
ful to my best interests, moral and religious, there is
 every reason to suppose that I should have partaken
 of all the evils produced in such a profligate and
 irreligious state of society, as did then exist in Virgi-
nia. I seldom reflect on the circumstances which
 forced me to leave that place, without feeling my
 mind warmed with a sense of gratitude to the All-
 Wise Disposer of human events, that he was gracious-
ly pleased so to extend his providential care over me,
 as to cause my removal from a state of society that
 might, by my remaining in it, have proved destruc-
tive to my family, and ruinous to myself. I omitted to mention, that on the 4th of 6th month,
1785, I embarked for England in the English ship
 Mildred, bound for London. I remained in England
 only about three months, and returned the latter part
 of 11th month, being absent near six months. This
 voyage was not productive of much advantage to me. In the year 1790,1 went with my family to Black
 Point, and in the following year removed to New
 York. On my return to this city, all 1 had was fifty
 pounds, supplied me by my father-in-law, but owing
 to the kind attention of Robert Bowne , and others, I
 soon got into some little business. At this period,
 and for some years afterwards, there were no Insu-
rance offices in New York, and being encouraged by
 my friends, I commenced the business of an Insurance
 broker. I pursued this with success for three or four
 years. About 1792, the public debt of the United
 States was founded; this afforded an opportunity for
people to speculate in the public funds. In this busi-
ness I made a good deal of money. I declined acting 
as an Insurance broker, and did considerable business
 as an underwriter, in which 1 was successful. In 1793, or 1794, I was elected a Director in the
 Mutual Insurance Company, and soon after a Director
 in the Western Inland Lock Navigation Company, and
 in 1797, was appointed Treasurer of that Company.
 From early life, all improvement of a public nature,
 that tended to benefit the country, or in any shape
 promote the happiness and welfare of mankind, were
 considered by me as highly important, and claimed
 my attention. I have been connected with a num-
ber of public institutions, and have providentially
 been the means of their being established. Mr. Eddy , at this time, being in easy circumstances,
 had leisure to turn his attention to some of those
 charities that are of permanent benefit to mankind.
 He had read the human mind with great sagacity
 and attention, and had analyzed the spirit of society
 in his own country. He found, as every wise man
 will, that if there are inevitable evils in the world,
 yet much may be done by way of softening them,
 or preparing the mind to bear them. One of the first objects of his exertions was that
 of establishing a penitentiary in the State of New
 York, for he believed that many who had been al-
lured to the paths of vice might be recalled, if proper
 methods were taken to instruct them in trades, to give
 them industrious habits, and to keep them from the 
pollution of those hardened in iniquity. He was
 well acquainted with the general plan and economy
 of the penitentiary establishment in Philadelphia, 
which had been got up by the influence of the Soci-
ety of Friends, but he thought even this system was
 susceptible of improvement. No other state had then
 followed the example of Pennsylvania, nor had its
 fame reached the leading philanthropists of New
 York. The penal code in most of the States still has
 the sanguinary spirit and hard features of the English
 penal code, which, with all their boasted love of 
liberty, was written in blood. The tears of the sym-
pathetic, and the voice of the benevolent, had made
 but slow progress against the apathy of the great
 mass of mankind, and the vindictive spirit of a few,
 who believe, or profess to believe, that the world
 should be governed by a rod of iron. The hearts of
 the people were made callous by the sight of stocks,
 whipping-posts, pillories, in every shire, town, or con-
siderable village. Flagellation with the cat-o'-nine-
 tails, burning in the hand, or forehead, with a hot
 iron, cropping the ears of prisoners in the pillory,
 were all common sights to the youngest, as well as
 the oldest, portion of the community. The Friends
 in Pennsylvania were among the first people in the
 Union to make an effort to change this barbarity for
 some milder system, thinking, and thinking justly,
 that severe punishments produced, rather than dimi-
nished crime. To this order of Christians the public
 are indebted for many good examples; but if this
 was the only thing they had done for mankind, they
 would deservedly stand high with the historian. By
 their efforts, the penal code of Pennsylvania was
 ameliorated, and this good precedent has been fol-
lowed by most of the States in the Union. In 1796, Mr. Eddy was on a journey to Philadelphia,
 in company with General Philip Schuyler , of the State
 of New York. Schuyler was then a member of the
 Senate of that State, and was, justly, very influential.
 He had been for more than forty years a prominent
 character in the country, first, as an officer in the war
 of 1755, and then a magnanimous leader in the revo-
lutionary contest. He had talents, integrity, property,
 and moral courage, and was the very man for the
 purpose Eddy had in view, which was to engage him
 in the change he wished to bring about in the penal
 code of the State of New York, and for the establish-
ment of a penitentiary system. Eddy conversed free-
ly with Schuyler upon every topic that had a bearing
 upon the subject, and as soon as they reached the city 
of Philadelphia, they repaired to the prison and made
 a thorough examination of the edifice, the convicts,
 the by-laws, the whole economy of the establishment,
 which were satisfactory to that practical statesman
 Mr. Eddy had laboured to engage in the cause, and he
 was now ready to go heart and hand with him. Mr.
 Eddy procured a large number of copies of the penal
 code of Pennsylvania, and distributed them freely.
 To each of the members of the Legislature he pre-
sented a copy, at the next meeting of that body, after
 his visit to Philadelphia. The General , with the as-
sistance of Mr. Eddy , drew up a bill for establishing
 a penitentiary system in the State of New York.
 This bill he did not introduce into the Senate him-
self, but engaged the services of a distinguished
 member of that body, Ambrose Spencer ,* * See Appendix. a gentleman
 of first rate abilities, and who has since filled the
 important office of Chief Justice of the State of New 
York, with high honour. Both Spencer and Schuy-
ler made excellent speeches on the subject, which had
 a surprising effect upon the members of the Senate,
 and on the audience. Mr. Eddy was at hand to give
 all the details that were necessary for a proper
 understanding of the provisions of the bill. The
 moment the representatives of the people were con-
vinced of the utility and practicability of the mea-
sure, the bill was passed without any great difficulty.
 The bill directed a state prison to be erected, and
 appointed Matthew Clarkson , John Watts , Thomas
 Eddy, Isaac Stoutenburg , and John Murray, jun. ,
 commissioners to carry the bill into effect. These
 commissioners designated Thomas Eddy as a com-
mittee for building the prison, who engaged the
 architect and workmen, and went on in his own way
 with the whole concern. This duty he set about to
 perform, but imitated very closely the plan of the
 establishment at Philadelphia; the plan of the single
 rooms was an after thought with Mr. Eddy , but 
which, in fact, is the great improvement of the age.
 Such was Mr. Eddy 's anxiety to have the penitenti-
ary succeed, that he not only consented to serve as a
 director, but as an agent. He undertook the latter
 office, as his reputation was involved in the success
 of the plan, and probably from an honest conviction
 that he had made himself better acquainted with
 the whole subject than any other person in the State.
 In these two offices, as inspector and agent, he acted
 for more than four years. He was so assiduous and 
calculating in his duties, that every anticipation of
 his friends and of himself was more than realized.
 The expenses of the establishment had been less
 than were expected, the health of the prisoners bet-
ter than that of the free and honest citizens in the
 ordinary walks of life. Such cleanliness, order, and
 moral discipline, marked the penitentiary system
 under the administration of this untired philanthro-
pist, that those formerly dissipated and sickly were
 made sober and healthy. He watched the results of
 his plans, and held to a theory no longer than he
 found it good in practice. His, was truly the induc-
tive system of philanthropy. In 1801, Mr. Eddy pub-
lished an account of the State Prison of New York.
 His mottos were taken from Beccaria and Montes-
quieu; in fact, his whole theory of crimes and pun-
ishments is drawn from those great friends of liberty,
 Beccaria, Montesquieu, Howard , Penn , and other
 celebrated reformers of this and a former age. He
 pointed out the state of the penal code in New York
 before 1796, and showed, that after it was altered,
 diminishing the number of capital punishments,
 and substituting imprisonment, the humane change
 was made without increasing crime. In this work,
 Mr. Eddy recounted the history of the establish-
ment, described the edifice with its workshops, cells,
 &c.; and no one can deny but that the plan was
 admirable, according to the state of information on
 these subjects at that time. The government of the
prison is also treated of, its officers named, and their
 duties minutely pointed out. This, at present, would
 seem superfluous, but, at that time, it was a new
 affair. The writer goes on to give a full account
 of the prisoners in the State, with the treatment,
 occupations, dress, and diet of the convicts, as also
 the means used, and to be used, for their reforma-
tion. On the subject of food and dress, he is quite
 minute; all of which goes to prove that cleanliness
 is the great promoter and preserver of health, and
 that no effective labour can be expected of men who
 are not substantially and well fed. In fact, he ap-
proves of the maxim of the stable, that to get la
bour from the animal, he should be kept under the full
 force of feed—good wholesome feed, however coarse.
 Among these excellent statistics of the prison, there
 is nothing to be compared to his doctrines upon the
 subject of reformation. The end of human punishments is the prevention
 of crimes. In the endeavour to attain this end, three
 things are to be considered: the amendment of the
 offender; the deterring of others by his example;
 reparation to society and the party injured. Of these
 objects, the first, without doubt, is of the highest
 importance. Society cannot be better secured against
 crimes, than by eradicating the evil passions and cor-
rupt habits which are the sources of guilt. The 
operation of punishment as a terror to others, is gene-
rally considered as momentary and uncertain in its
 effects; for men are often found so regardless of the
 future, as to perpetrate crimes at the instant they are
 witnessing the most dreadful execution of a criminal
 for a similar offence. The punishment of death pre-
cludes the possibility of the amendment of the crimi-
nal by any human means. Every hope of reforma-
tion is at once cut off without a single effort to
 accomplish so just and benevolent a purpose. Society
 and the injured party are, indeed, in the strictest
 sense, avenged on the head of the guilty offender. 
Justice, however, not revenge, is the true foundation
 of the right of punishment. But, it is not the design
of the present work to discuss the principles of a 
code of criminal law, or to point out the errors which
 have been perpetuated by the passions or ignorance
of legislators. If society is effectually secured against future mis-
chief by the imprisonment of the offender, it is that
 mode of punishment also which affords the only
 chance of reclaiming him from evil. It is by con-
finement to hard labour in a penitentiary house, that
 the primary and legitimate purpose of human punish-
ment is to be effected. The character of men are
 endlessly diversified, and their motives and actions
 assume a thousand different hues. In considering
 convicts, we may, in general, distinguish them into
 three classes: men grown old in habits of profligacy
 and violence, unfeeling and desperate offenders, who
 discover no signs of contrition, and yield little hope
 of amendment: those who, in early life, have received
 a moral and religious education, and, though after-
wards led by passion and evil example into the com-
mission of crimes, still retain some sense of virtue:
 those who, have sustained a fair reputation, are
 arrested for the first public offence, before they have
 become familiar with vice; who wished, perhaps, to
 return to the path of virtue, but had not energy enough
 to retrace their steps. In forming an opinion of the depravity of convicts,
 nothing can be more unjust than to confound these
 different classes in the same judgment. All were once
 innocent; but, blinded by passion, allured by present
 temptation, they have mistaken their true interest,
 and been gradually led into the depths of vice and
 criminality. In designating punishments for various
 offences, the legislator can regard only the tendency
 of actions to injure society, and distribute those pun-
ishments according to the comparative degrees of harm
 such actions may produce. He cannot foresee those 
circumstances in the moral condition of the agent
 which may justly lessen or aggravate his guilt; and,
 by the wise constitution and jealous policy of our
 laws, judges are not vested with any discretionary
 power to apportion the punishment according to a
 greater or less criminality of intention in the offen-
der. It is in a penitentiary house, that an oppor-
tunity is afforded of distinguishing the shades of guilt
 in different offenders, and of correcting that error
 and injustice, in some degree inseparable from the
 best system of laws, by which persons, whose guilt
 admits of different degrees, are subjected to the same
 punishment.* * This topic may be enlarged upon in the conclusion, when we come to
 speak of pardons. It would greatly assist the Inspectors in the just exer-
cise of their power, if the judges who sentence convicts were required to
 furnish a statement of all the circumstances that attended the trial, or
 which may have come to their knowledge, and which may serve to render
 the guilt of the convict, in their opinion, more or less aggravated. It is for those to whom the superinten-
dence of such an institution is intrusted, to effect, as
 far as possible, the amendment of the delinquent, and
 thus to fulfil the highest duty of humanity. And,
 it is with no small pleasure that the inspectors have
 observed, that a number of those who have been dis-
charged from the prison confided to their care, have
 continued in habits of industry and sobriety, and
 bid fair to become good members of society. It
 would, no doubt, be interesting to the philanthropist,
 to be informed of the particular incidents in the
 lives of such men, and the circumstances which
 have furnished ground to predict the rectitude of
 their future conduct. But this would, in some
 degree, lead the writer beyond his immediate ob-
ject; and motives of prudence and charity ought,
 perhaps, to induce him, for the present, to forbear such
 a recital. The most efficacious means of reformation are to
 be found in that system of regular labour and exact
 temperance by which habits of industry and sobriety
 are formed. The inspectors have not been unmind-
ful of other means of amendment, less immediately 
connected with the nature of the punishment to which
 the convicts are sentenced. By the great attention
 paid to cleanliness in every part of the prison, they
 have shown their opinion of its importance in aiding
 reformation. Its benign influence on the physical
 character, though well understood by many, is not
 duly estimated by the bulk of mankind. Though
 its effect on bodily health be more obvious, its less
 striking but equally certain effect on the mind has
 been no where more fully experienced than in this
 prison. It is found to soften the temper, meliorate 
the disposition, and to produce a regard to temper-
ance, order, and industry; and, by exciting more
 agreeable and tranquil sensations, to render men sus-
ceptible of good impressions, and thereby conduce to
 their future amendment.* 
* Count RUMFORD , in his Essays, speaking of the good effects produced
 on the mendicants in the House of Industry at Munich, by cleanliness,
 says, that virtue never dwelt long with filth and nastiness; nor do I
 believe there ever was a person scrupulously attentive to cleanliness, who
 was a consummate villain. In the winter, those of the convicts who have
 appeared to be most meritorious, are allowed, with
 the approbation of the keeper, to be taught reading,
 writing, and arithmetic. Teachers are selected from
 such of them as are competent, and twenty are per-
mitted to meet together daily with one of the keep-
ers, and to receive instruction for about two hours in
 the evening. This is considered as a privilege, and
 conferred on those only, who, by a peaceable, indus-
trious, and regular course of conduct, have shown a
 disposition towards reformation. It is a further requi-
site for an admission into this school, that the person
should have performed labour above his task to the
 value of four shillings a week, which is to pay for
 the implements of writing, light, and fuel. Care is taken, as far as possible, to separate the
 less vicious from the more hardened and daring offen-
ders. About twenty-two of the most obdurate crimi-
nals are kept confined and at work in separate 
apartments, and are not suffered to come out, or to
 have communication with other prisoners, but are
 constantly watched by keepers day and night. Expe-
rience will evince, that among any given number of
 convicts, one tenth part may be fairly considered as
 desperate and hardened villains, who appear incor-
rigible; and, it is of importance that such should be
 carefully selected and separated from the rest, as it
 is more probable they may, by proper management,
 be reformed. As another means of reformation, attention is paid
 to their religious and moral instruction. A large room in the prison, very neatly finished, is
 set apart for the purpose of divine worship. This
 room, and the gallery round it, will accommodate
 about six hundred persons. In this place the prisoners are assembled on the
 first day of each week, when one of their number
 reads a sermon and prayers, and the rest join in sing-
ing psalms. It is expected that the public preachers of the gos-
pel in the city will cheerfully devote a small portion
 of their time to the service of these unhappy beings,
 who have so much need of their instruction, and of
 the counsel of the truly good and benevolent. As no distinction of sect exists in this great work
 of charity and benevolence, it is hoped that religious
 characters of every Christian denomination will feel
 it their duty to visit them on the day set apart for
 divine worship; since it is obvious that a due atten-
tion to this important duty must produce the most
 salutary effects on the minds and conduct of the pri-
soners, and most powerfully promote the great plan
 of reformation.* 
* As rational and immortal beings, we owe this to them, nor can any
 criminality of theirs justify our neglect in this particular. HOWARD . Connected with this scheme of punishment and
 reformation, is another object, which, though of infe-
rior importance in a moral view, is yet deserving of 
 attention. This is, indemnity to the community for
 the expense of the conviction and maintenance of 
the offender. It is highly probable, that with due
 management and economy, the profit of the labour of
 the convicts may be rendered equal to their support.
 Such a result, however, has not been anticipated by
 the zealous friends of reform in penal law in Europe.
 They have regarded it as the indispensable duty of
 legislators, to meliorate the laws, and correct the
 abuses of prisons, without counting the cost of their
 justice or humanity. In Pennsylvania, we are assu-
red, that the experiment has been attended with
 success;—and when the improved system of the
 penitentiary house of this state has had time to operate
 fully, there can be no doubt of a result equally 
 favourable. It ought to have fair scope, and not to
 be thwarted in its infancy, by distrust, or the selfish
 views of individuals or particular classes of men. A
 wise legislature will extend its concern to the whole
 community, and, regardless of private interests, stea-
dily pursue a plan the best calculated to promote the
 general good. In the first establishment of the prison, the inspec
tors have had to encounter all the difficulties of a
 new experiment, with the disadvantage of imperfect 
knowledge in many branches of manufacture. A
 system was to be formed, by which above two hun-
dred convicts, many of them hardened, desperate,
 and refractory, and many ignorant, or incapacitated
 through infirmity or disease, might be brought into a
 regular course of productive labour. To find suitable
 employment for so many persons, was a matter of
 considerable difficulty. In the choice of occupations,
 regard must be had to those which require the least
 capital, are most productive of profit, and most con-
sistent with the health of the convicts, and the general
 security of the prison. Among the different kinds
 of manufactures, that of shoes was first introduced,
 and has been fouud the most convenient and profita-
ble. The capital required for the purchase of the raw
 materials is not large, and the manufactured article
 will always meet with a ready sale; since the con-
sumption of so indispensable a part of dress is great,
 and continually increasing, beyond the power of the
 tradesmen of the city to supply.* * Large quantities of shoes have heretofore been brought from New
 Jersey and the Eastern States, and sold in New York. The manufacture
 of nails, and other articles, has been carried on for
 about two years. This required more capital; and
 it was not until very lately that sufficient experience
 was gained, in the purchase of stock and the use of
 machinery, to enable the inspectors to manage this
 branch of business with advantage. These circum-
stances, and many others that might be detailed,
 which necessarily attend an infant establishment, and
 which diminished the profits of the past years, will,
 in future, cease to produce expense and embarrass-
ment. It is doubtful, whether the manufacture of
 nails, and of several other articles, ought to be carried
 on to a great extent, as they require too large a capi-
tal in advance. Experience will furnish, every year,
 grounds for improvement in the mode of conducting
 the branches of industry, or in the introduction of
 more advantageous kinds of labour; and there is
 every reason to believe, that, with a competent capi-
tal, the business may be rendered so productive as 
to defray the expenses of conviction and maintenance
 of the prisoners. Calculations, however, founded on
 the statements of the past year, will not furnish ade-
quate means of judging with certainty of the future
 profits which may be made to arise from the labour
 of the convicts. That the number of convicts has increased since
 the erection of the State Prison, is evident. But to
 infer from that fact, that the new and milder scheme
 of punishment has been less efficacious in preventing
 crimes than the old and sanguinary system, would be
 a most partial and erroneous conclusion. The true 
causes of this increase of crimes are the rapid growth
 of our population and wealth; the consequent luxury
 and corruption of, manners, particularly in the capital
 of the state; and the great number of indigent and
 vicious emigrants from Europe and the West Indies,
 driven hither by the disordered and distressful condi-
tion of their native countries, or to escape the ven-
geance of the laws. More than three fourths of the whole number of
 crimes are committed in the city of New York. Its
 population has almost doubled in ten years, and the
 increase of its trade and wealth is unequalled in the
 history of commercial states. It is certain also, that under
 the present system of punishment, a much less
 number of offenders escape conviction. Individuals
 do not, from a sense of the terrible consequences to
 the party, refuse to prosecute; nor juries, from motives
 of compassion, forbear to convict the guilty. This
 is a most salutary consequence of the melioration of
 our penal laws. The corruption of morals engenders those crimes
 which pollute society, and undermine the security of
 life and property. It is the duty of government to
 begin at the source, and to endeavour, by every
 rational and practicable expedient, to prevent crimes,
 rather than to apply the painful and uncertain remedy
 of punishment to evils grown formidable by negli-
gence. It is in vain, under the best devised plan of
 punishment, to expect that crimes should be dimin-
ished or exterminated, if laws are not framed to check
 the progress of vice, and to arrest the first steps of
 guilt. It is well known, that the greater number of crimes
 originate in the irregular and vicious habits produced
 by intoxication, and by the idle, low, and dissipated
 practices encouraged in taverns and tippling-houses.
 There are few criminals whose gradual depravation
 cannot be traced to this source. It is well ascertained,
 that in this city there are more than twelve hundred 
taverns or shops, where spirituous liquors are retailed
 in drams or in the form of grog. In eight or ten con-
siderable streets, one fourth part of the whole num-
ber of houses are taverns and groceries, or, in other
 words, dram-shops. The number of taverns is unlimit
ited by law. By the city charter, the power of granting
 licenses is vested in the mayor, who is the sole judge
 of the propriety of granting them, or of their number.
 Thirty shillings are paid for each license, four fifths
 of which sum goes into the city treasury, and the
 residue to the mayor. While a revenue is derived to
 the corporation from these licenses, it is not to be
 expected that there will be much solicitude to lessen
 their number, or to examine minutely into the merits
 of the applicants for them. Some regulations ought
 to be adopted for the reformation of the police in this
 respect. Grocers ought to be strictly prohibited from
 retailing liquors in drams. The number of taverns
 ought to be greatly diminished. Licenses should not
 be granted but to persons who are recommended by
 five known and respectable citizens, and under much
 larger penalties than at present, to enforce their obser-
vance of the laws.* * In the town of Boston there are fifty taverns, or persons, licensed to
 retail liquors in small quantities. Three or four times that number, one
 would imagine, would be more than sufficient for this city. At present, the temptation to
 the indigent and labouring classes of the people to
 indulge in drink is so powerful, and the gratification
 so easy, at every turn of the street, that the greater
 number spend a large portion of their time and earn-
ings in repeated indulgences of this depraved appe-
tite, during the day, and return to their families in a
 state of partial or complete intoxication. The per-
nicious consequences of such habits, to the individual
 and to society, are too striking to need any elaborate
 description, to enforce the propriety of adopting every
 suitable means of legislative and municipal regula-
tion, for their prevention. A further source of vice and criminality is to be
 found in the horse-races which regularly take place
in New York and some of the neighbouring coun-
ties. These draw together crowds of people, who
 engage in wagering, all kinds of games of chance,
 and in debauchery, which produce habits that lead
 to the ruin of many, and drive numbers to the com-
mission of crimes. Horse-races, billiard-tables, and
 all games of chance, ought to be strictly prohibit-
ed. Baiting of animals with dogs, and every spe-
cies of amusement which may tend to harden the
 heart, and render the manners of the people ferocious,
 ought to be prevented by a well regulated police.
 Laws are made for the preservation of decency and
 order on the first day of the week ; and it remains
 only to have them more faithfully executed. Perhaps
 there is no city of equal extent, where fewer crimes
 escape detection and punishment, or where greater
 order and tranquillity prevail. Too much praise can-
not be bestowed on those to whom the peace and
 safety of our city is entrusted, for their unwearied
attention and vigilance in the discharge of duties, the
 extent and importance of which are not generally
 understood, or fully estimated. But, notwithstanding
 the improved state of our police, and the care of our
 magistrates, every year furnishes new objects of atten-
tion, evils which demand additional remedies, and
 more powerful reasons for devising and applying
 them in the best and most effectual manner. Another object more immediately connected with
 the subject of this work, is the present mode of pun-
ishment for petty crimes. The only prison in this
 city for the punishment of those convicted of small
 thefts and other petty offences, is the Bridewell, part
 of which is also appropriated to the safe keeping of
 prisoners before their trial or conviction. At present,
 vagrants, disorderly persons, and convicts for petty
 offences, are confined in this prison ; and are put into
 rooms together, without any discrimination, or regard
 to difference of character. No proper or adequate
 means are used to prevent profanity, intoxication,
filth, or idleness. In this condition, corrupting and
 corrupted, their imprisonment, so far from tending to
 produce the amendment of the culprits, or to secure
 society against the effects of their future misconduct,
 serves, by the contagion of example and the exaspe-
ration of bad passions, to render them an hundred
 fold more vicious and untractable. It is, in truth, a
 nursery of criminals for the state prison. As a remedy
 for this defect in the penal system, it is suggested,
 that a building should be erected by the corporation,
 large enough to contain sixty cells, of the same dimen-
sions as those in the state prison-that the police
 magistrates should have power to try, in a summary
 way, and to sentence to solitary confinement in these
 cells, vagrants, drunkards, riotous and disorderly per-
sons, &c. for a time not exceeding thirty days;—that
 the quarter sessions of the city should send persons
 convicted of assaults and batteries, petit larcenies,
 and such offences as are not aggravated or atrocious,
 for a time not exceeding sixty or ninety days. The
 convicts should be kept in these cells in perfect soli-
tude, and on spare diet, in the manner practised in
 the state prison. Such a punishment, for sixty days,
 would be more severe and terrible, and tend more to
 the prevention of crimes, than confinement, for one
 or two years, to hard labour in the state prison. It
 would also tend more to the reformation of the offen-
der himself. Detached from vicious companions, from
 temptation, and from all means of gratifying his
 depraved appetites, conscience would have time to
 awaken a sense of guilt and remorse for his past
 folly and misconduct. Should a plan of such obvious utility be adopted
 and carried into execution, it would not then be neces-
sary to send convicts to the state prison for a shorter
 period than three years. For every person once con-
fined in the solitary cells, who should, after his release,
 commit a second offence, would deserve to be sen-
tenced to hard labour for at least three years. Indeed, 
it might, with propriety, be left to the discretion of
 the court, in certain cases of second offences, to inflict
 the same punishment as in cases of grand larceny;
 since it can hardly be supposed, that any material or
 lasting effect can be produced on a criminal, by the
 labour and discipline of a penitentiary house, in a
 shorter time than four or five years. And if he is
 incorrigible by means of solitude, temperance, and
 cleanliness, he will not merit, if he is guilty of a
 second offence, a punishment less severe than impri-
sonment for that length of time. It is not requisite, here, to enter into the details
 of this plan of a county prison; which, if found, on
 experiment, to succeed in the city of New York, may
 be extended to Albany, and one or two other coun-
ties, where the increase of population, and the fre-
quency of petty offences, may render it necessary. Before concluding this account, it may be proper to
 make a few remarks, the result of some observation and
 experience, on a subject which may have an essen-
tial influence on the present scheme of punishments. It has been observed by BECCARIA, whose opinions
 have the force of axioms in the science of penal law,
 that as punishments become more mild, clemency
 and PARDON become less necessary; — that clemency
 belongs to the legislator, and not to the executer of
 the laws: a virtue which ought to shine in the code,
 not in private judgments. To show mankind that
 crimes may be pardoned, or that punishment is not
the necessary consequence, is to nourish the flattering
 hope of impunity.—Let then the executer of the
 law be inexorable, but let the legislator be tender,
 indulgent, and humane.* * Dei Delitti e delle Pene, §20.—A misura che le pene divengono più
dolci, la clemenza ed il perdono diventano meno necessari, &c. These principles, though just in theory, necessarily
 presuppose a perfect system of penal law, by which
 each punishment is with such exact justice appor-
tioned to each crime, that no difference of circum- 
stances can arise in any case, which ought to vary
 the punishment prescribed for the particular offence.
 No code so perfect has yet been framed, and until
 such a one is promulgated, it is necessary that the
 power of pardoning should reside somewhere, to pre-
vent that injustice in particular cases which the legis-
lator did not foresee, or could not avoid. By our
 constitution, this power is confided to the governor,
 the chief executive magistrate.* 
* In cases of treason and murder, the governor cannot pardon, but may
 reprieve the convict until the next meeting of the legislature, who may
 pardon if they think fit. And under the present penal laws, except in those
 cases where the punishment of death still remains,
 the power of pardoning may be exercised without
 violating the principle advanced by the philosopher
 of Milan. It may be asserted, that, in the deliberate
 and impartial manner in which justice is adminis-
tered in our courts, it is scarcely possible that any
 man can be presented, by a grand jury, tried and
 convicted by a petit jury of twelve men, in the
 presence of the court and the world, without a degree
 of guilt deserving of some punishment. Imprison-
ment for a short period, under the mild and humane
 regulations of the state prison, cannot, in cases the
 most favourable to the prisoners, be deemed unjust.
 It may be laid down, then, as a general principle,
 that no person, convicted of a crime, and sentenced
 to imprisonment, ought to be pardoned, until he has
 suffered a punishment proportioned to the degree of
 his guilt, or at least so much as may satisfy the com-
munity he has injured. Under the guidance of this
 principle, it is believed, that the power of pardoning
 may be made conducive to a more perfect dispensa-
tion of justice, and subservient to the plan of refor-
mation intended by a penitentiary prison. It will
 not be thought useless to endeavour to fix some general
 rules for the exercise of a power, which, if arbitrary
 and capricious, may produce consequences neither
foreseen nor intended; but, if exerted with sound
 discretion, so far from weakening the laws, will
 strengthen their operation. Where the punishment is fixed by law to a crime
of a general legal description, comprehending a great
 variety of different acts, which must, from the course
 of human conduct, be accompanied with evidence of 
greater or less depravity; there, this attribute of the 
chief executive magistrate seems necessary, to remedy
 the imperfection of the general law, and to render
 the punishment more equitably proportioned to the 
guilt of the offender; since, from the inevitable want
 of foresight in the legislature, of the circumstances of
 each case, it could not be so predetermined by them.
 Thus, forgery and counterfeiting, as well as passing
 money, knowing the same to be forged or counter-
feit, punished by imprisonment for life, is a crime,
 the objects of which are endlessly diversified, com-
prehending acts of different degrees of turpitude.* 
* It may be fairly questioned, whether this and some other crimes are
 not improperly punished by imprisonment for life. If the sentence did not
 exceed a certain number of years, it would be in the power of the court to
 apply the punishment in a manner more justly proportioned to the offence:
 there would then be rarely, if ever, any occasion for the executive to remit
 the sentence. Most of the governments of Europe, excepting England,
 have, in circumstances of society and manners far less favourable than
 those of this country, gone farther in the melioration of their penal laws;
 and the punishment of death is gradually disappearing from their codes. Where the law has only defined a limit in the
 time of imprisonment, leaving it to the discretion of
 the judge to fix the duration of punishment within
 that limit, according to the circumstances of each case;
 there, it may be generally said, that the executive
 ought not to interpose, unless when the discretion of
 the court has been manifestly exercised under some
 misapprehension, or where circumstances, favourable
 to the convict, come to light after trial, of which he
 could not avail himself at the time, but had they been
 known, ought to have prevented or lessened his
 punishment. Unequivocal evidence of reformation in a con-
vict, after his imprisonment; to ascertain which, as 
well as the propriety and safety of discharging a
 convict before the expiration of his term of punish-
ment, the judgment of the inspectors of the prison,
 from their situation, may be of essential importance.
 Indeed, this precaution has been taken by the late
 and present governor of the state, who have applied
 for the requisite information to the inspectors, the
 majority of whom have joined in a recommendation
 for pardon, where they thought it clearly merited by
 the convict. Previous to such recommendation, how-
ever, the inspectors think it their duty to inquire,— 
whether the prisoner was convicted by clear and
 undoubted testimony ; which may be ascertained by
 the report of the judge before whom he was tried;—
 whether the circumstances attending the commission
 of the crime denote a greater or less degree of depra-
vity;—whether the prisoner has already suffered a
 punishment sufficient to satisfy society, and to afford
 a reasonable ground to believe that his release will
 not diminish the dread of future punishment in him,
 or inspire the hope of impunity in others;—whether,
 while in prison, he has conducted himself with uni-
form decency, industry, and sobriety, and has never
 attempted to violate any of its regulations;—and,
 lastly, whether, from what is known of his temper,
 character, and deportment, it is probable, that if resto-
red to society, he will become a peaceable, honest, and
 industrious citizen. These inquiries ought to be
 satisfactorily answered in favour of the convict,
 before he is recommended for pardon; for it is not a
 common or ordinary course of good conduct and indus-
try, but a pre-eminent and unexceptionable behaviour,
 that should entitle a prisoner to this grace. A convict
 radically and incurably depraved, in hope of gaining
 favour, may, for a season, so far disguise his genuine
 character, as to deceive his keepers and inspectors.
 Sufficient time should be allowed to discover his real
 disposition, which, on some occasion, at an unguarded
 moment, will show itself. In short, pardon ought 
never to be granted from the momentary impulse of
 compassion, the indulgence of which may be gratify-
ing to the individual, but as regulated by no fixed
 principle, must be injurious to the public; nor ought
 it be to granted, merely at the instance of friends
 or relations, or from considerations of family, but
 from the clear and unbiassed dictates of justice and
 humanity, and in such a manner that the community
 may be satisfied that the influence of the law is not
 impaired, nor its severity relaxed, without sufficient
 reason. No man who enters the prison with vicious habits,
 can be reasonably expected to be divested of them in
 less than four or five years; and it would greatly
 injure the penitentiary system, to pardon any prisoner
 before the expiration of that time, unless in extraor-
dinary cases, which may possibly, but very rarely,
 happen. When sentenced to imprisonment for life,
 no person ought to be released, until after seven years
 confinement. If, under the circumstances which have
 been mentioned, and on principles here stated, par-
dons are sometimes granted, instead of counteracting
 the force of the law, they may be made to harmonize
 with, and support the general scheme of punishments
 so widely adopted. Its success must, in a great mea-
sure, depend on the wisdom of the regulations devised
 for the internal management of the prison, and on the
 prudence, disinterested attention, and perseverance
 of those to whom that management is entrusted. To exhibit a simple and faithful account of those
 regulations, and to furnish such useful hints as the
 writer from his own experience, and the suggestions
 of others, could impart, is the purpose of the preceding
 pages. He is sensible that the plan of interior regu-
lation is far from being perfect; but every year will
 add to its improvement. For, besides relieving the
 counties from the great burden of keeping convicts,
 and diminishing the chances of escape, by bringing
 them all into one prison, under a more vigilant inspec-
tion, the establishment of a state prison presents the
 best opportunity, by the magnitude and liberality of
 its plan, for the formation of a well-digested scheme
of internal management and economy, and the full
 execution of the only just and beneficent system yet
 devised for the punishment and correction of crimi-
nals. The New York state prison will furnish a
model for others, which the increase of population
 and growth of luxury may render necessary in the
 distant parts of this extensive country.*
* Similar prisons are now established in New Jersey, Virginia, Massa-
chusetts, Carolina, New Hampshire, Vermont, District of Columbia, &c.
 EDITOR. And, what-
ever may be the future condition of mankind, this
 institution will reflect lasting honour on the state;
 become a durable monument of the wisdom, justice,
 and humanity of its legislators, more glorious than
 the most splendid achievements of conquerors or
 kings; and be remembered when the magnificent
 structures of folly and pride, with their founders, are
 alike exterminated and forgotten. This extract concentrates much that has been said
 by seer or sage on this subject since that date. He
 goes on to demonstrate what can be done by care
 and sagacity in the great work of reform and econo-
my, and shows that the labours of the convicts almost
 supported themselves, and that the State was only
 charged five thousand dollars, and the salaries of the
 officers and keepers of the prison. Dissensions soon arose, not among the superin-
tendents of the prison, but amongst the rulers of the
 state. The council of appointment changed the
 whole board, and brought into office those who were
 wholly ignorant of the least of their duties. The
 funds they were entrusted with were badly spent,
 and all the land-marks of economy and system swept
 away. There were two years of returning reason,
 in Mr. Eddy 's opinion, when Mr. William Torry 
 acted as agent. This good man attempted to bring
 back the laws and customs of the establishment to 
their pristine course, but he, after two years service,
 ceased to act in the cause. Soon after the state prison was built in the city of
 New-York, Mr. Eddy began to think that if he had
 not committed an error in his plan, it certainly was
 susceptible of improvement. He found, from careful
 observation, that several confined in a cell corrupted
 each other, for each one told to his companions his
 career of vice, and all joined by sympathetic villany
 to keep each other in countenance. This, to the eye
 of the shrewd philanthropist was not long conceal-
ed ; and like a man of moral intrepidity, he avowed
 his error and condemned it. There can be no doubt
 but this single-cell plan now in use, was conceived
 and made known to the public by Mr. Eddy , before
 it was thought of either in this country, or in Europe,
 by any other person. In March, 1802, he visited Al-
bany, solely for the purpose of prevailing upon the
 Legislature to pass a bill for erecting a prison in the
 city and county of New-York, and by degrees to ex-
tend the plan to other districts in the state, which
prison was to contain solitary cells. These prisons 
were to be used for all those who had committed
 minor crimes, and no one was to be sent to the state
 prison for a less term than three years. Into the
 solitary cells in these, the prisoner was to be confined
 according to his crime. So situated, he would have
 time to reflect upon his past conduct, and to begin
 the work of reformation. A bill was passed for this
 purpose, but by making it optional with the city
 and county, instead of being imperative, the plan
 was not carried into effect, notwithstanding every
 exertion of Mr. Eddy and his friends, in urging it
 upon the corporation. One committee after another
 took it into consideration, and seemed highly pleased
 with the plan, being convinced that it would be a
 means of preventing crime, yet they did not comply
 with the requisition. Mr. Eddy was not to be dis-
couraged by the failure. He mentioned his plan in 
a letter to his friend Patrick Colquhoun , Esq. of Lon-
don, one of the great moral reformers of the day, who
 highly approved of it, and handed Mr. Eddy 's com-
munication to Lord Sidmouth , then Minister for the
 Home Department, who, as well as Mr. Colquhoun ,
 gave his decided approbation to the plan, and wished
 it should be introduced into England; and this was 
done by the London Society for improving Prison
 Discipline, and one or two prisons were soon after
 built upon this plan, one near London, containing six
 or seven hundred cells. A prison was also built at
 Pittsburgh, in Pennsylvania, upon this construction,
 containing from five to six hundred cells. When the
Auburn state prison was erected, Mr. Eddy urged
 them to have the buildings wholly divided into cells,
 seven by nine feet each, but most of the commission-
ers were afraid to try the experiment fully, but did
 it only in part, and this change from the old plan
 was made from their confidence in the judgment of
 the adviser. In 1824, Messrs. Tibbits , Allen , and Hopkins , were
 appointed by the legislature of New-York, to exa-
mine and report on certain questions relating to the
 state prisons; the result of their labours was a confir-
mation of the system that Mr. Eddy had recommend-
ed twenty-two years before. These commissioners,
 on entering on their inquiries, issued a circular, which
 was answered by several gentlemen, and amongst
 them, by Mr. Eddy . Notwithstanding the fact, that
 loose habits of doing business, and inattention to
 the proper methods of reformation, united to the
 expense of the experiment, the public had, in a good
 degree, become tired of the penitentiary system, and
 it was thought by many, that it would be abandoned
 altogether; yet Mr. Eddy adhered to his previous
 opinion, and returned the following answer. To GEORGE TIBBITS , STEPHEN ALLEN , and SAMUEL
 M. HOPKINS, Esquires, Commissioners appointed by
 the Legislature to examine and report on certain
 questions relating to the State Prisons.
 RESPECTED FRIENDS,— I received your circular letter, containing a number
 of queries, to which you request distinct replies. First—Is the present system established in the
 New-York prison, a real system of punishment? Are 
the convicts, in general, less comfortable than they
 would be if at liberty? Answer—I beg leave to state that, in my opinion,
 the system established in the New-York State Prison
 is not a real system of punishment calculated to pre-
vent crimes. Undoubtedly convicts are, in general, less comforta-
ble than they would be if at liberty. Second—Have you ever known any satisfactory
 instances of reformation produced by the present, or
 any prison discipline? And, if so, please to state the
 cases particularly, so far as may be proper? Answer—The general habits of intemperance pre-
vious to the confinement of convicts, and their ex-
treme attachment to the use of ardent spirits, has
 scarcely, in any instance, been cured even by a long
 imprisonment; and their minds, owing to a number
 of them being together during the night in one room,
 have been so corrupted, that experience has proved,
 that reformation has rarely taken place. During
 several years that I served as an inspector of our
 state prison, I only recollect two cases of complete
 reformation. One of these has resided many years
 in a neighbouring government, the other, in this
 state; both are, at this time, men of considerable pro-
perty, much respected and well esteemed. It is not
 known to their present friends and neighbours, that
 they ever were under confinement. Each of them 
were four years in our state prison, and, on account
 of orderly conduct and good behaviour, pardoned. Third—Has there been sufficient experience of
 solitary confinement, to enable you to answer the
 same question in relation to that mode of punish-
ment? And so far as your experience or observation
 may extend, please to state the result? Answer—There has been no experience in the state
 prison of New-York, that would serve to ascertain
 how far continual solitary confinement may eventu-
ally produce reformation; recourse has only been had
 to it, as a temporary punishment for bad conduct in
 the prison—in this way it has produced good effects,
 and has generally been the means of enforcing clean-
liness, preserving order, and good behaviour, even
 among the most hardened convicts. When I was a member of the Board of Inspectors,
 by-laws were enacted, which declared, that all con-
versation, (except such as might be necessary whilst
 at work,) want of cleanliness, whistling, attempting
 to sing, &c., were offences against the laws of the
 prison, and should meet with immediate punishment,
 by confinement in a solitary cell on bread and water,
 from one to three days, or longer, according to the
 nature of the offence. By a faithful and rigid execu-
tion of these laws, the quiet and order of this prison
 was, with some exceptions, perfectly preserved; and,
 as regarded neatness and extreme cleanliness, no
 prison in the world could surpass it. Fourth—If you shall be of opinion that the pre-
sent, or any system of prison discipline, may be made
 to produce material and permanent reformation in
 any large proportion of cases, then be pleased to state
 how, and in what way, in your opinion, it becomes
 operative towards that end? What are the circum-
stances in the system which will tend to change the
 character of the convict, and how do they, or will
 they, operate? What can be done to make them
 more effectual? Answer—The subjoined general remarks, will serve
 as a reply to this query. Fifth—Can you suggest any means by which the
 compulsory labour of convicts, can be made to cover
 the expense of supporting and guarding them? or
 any, by which the labour of the convicts of this prison,
 can be made more productive than at present? Answer—I beg to make the same reference, as a
 reply to this query. Sixth—Can you suggest any means by which the
 expense may be diminished, and how? Can the guard
 be dispensed with? Can the rations be lessened with
 propriety, or made cheaper? Answer—If the prison was rightly constructed, no
 military guard would be wanted; but, I apprehend
 the expenses of the prison in this city cannot be
 diminished, unless the plan and construction of it
 should be completely altered. Not being acquainted
 with the quality and amount of the rations at present
 served to the convicts, it is impossible for me to say
 how far they may, with propriety, be lessened, or
 made cheaper. Seventh—Please to state briefly your views of the
 most effectual system for the protection of society
 against crimes; and therein note such alterations, if
 any, as you would suggest, in the present system of
 management? Answer—My views as to the most effectual means
 for protecting society against crimes, will appear in
 the subsequent remarks. GENERAL REMARKS. Many reasons might be offered, why the success of
 the Penitentiary System in this state has not been
 equal to the expectations of its early patrons, and of
 the public at large. 1st. The inspectors have generally been changed
 with every change of our political rulers; hence, men
 inadequate to the task, were frequently appointed to 
fill the important office of inspectors. These fre-
quent changes have produced a very great increase
 of expenses, and materially tended to prevent suita-
ble and important improvements in the general sys-
tem. 2d. The number of pardons that have been grant-
ed, has been attended with most serious injury, and
 very much prevented the good effects that the system
 might otherwise have produced. Pardon should be
 granted only on the discovery of facts unknown at
 the trial, which, if known, would probably have pro-
duced an acquittal. In fact, it may be truly said,
 that under a mild system, pardons materially contri-
bute to the increase of crimes. 3d. In the New-York prison, the rooms lodge each
 about twenty convicts, and owing to so many being
 brought together every night, they corrupt each other,
 and thus prevent complete order in the prison, and
 all chance of reformation is effectually defeated; the
 elder criminals serve as teachers to the younger, and
 prepare them for the commission of greater crimes
 than those for which they have been convicted. Thus
 the New-York prison, in place of answering the pur-
pose for which the convicts are confined, viz. their
 reformation, becomes a nursery and seminary of vice. 4th. The authority given to the inspectors to in-
flict corporal punishment for violating the laws of
 the prison, respecting good order, &c. has no doubt
 had a very injurious effect, for, it is directly opposite
 to the mild system that ought to prevail in a peni-
tentiary. It must tend to harden the minds of the
 convicts, and materially lessen the chances of reform-
ation. To adopt such a mode of punishment, is
extremely unwise, because the more mild plan of
 occasional confinement in solitary cells on bread and
 water, has been proved by experience, effectually to
 answer the most important purposes of strict and
 rigid discipline. The reasons above assigned are, in
 my opinion, sufficient to show why the Penitentiary 
System has failed to answer, fully, the end and pur-
poses for which it was intended, particularly as it
 regards reformation. I now shall respectfully offer for the consideration
 of the commissioners, my views of the most effectual
 system for the protection of society against crimes,
 and the most certain means to promote the reforma-
tion of convicts. First. The great preventive of offences is doubtless
 an early attention to moral and religious instruction,
 and thus to fortify the infant mind with good princi-
ples. The observation made by John Locke, is re-
markably appropriate and excellent:—I think, I may
 say, that, of all the men we meet with, nine parts of
 ten, are what they are, good or evil, useful or not, by
 their education. That a careful attention to educate
 the children of parents in low circumstances through-
out the State, would go far towards the prevention
 of crimes, is demonstrated by the fact, that in cons-
quence of a diligent search being made by a com-
mittee of the New-York Free School Society, it was
 ascertained that but one boy of those who had re-
ceived their education in the schools of that institu-
tion, had been convicted of a petty crime, although
 several hundreds who had not been at the Free
 Schools, had been tried at the Quarter Sessions, and
 been committed to the City Penitentiary, for vagran-
cy and various other offences. We are told by high
 authority—Train up a child in the way he should
 go, and when he is old, he will not depart from it. The great error of all governments has been, not
 affording instruction to the lower class of society,
 and inflicting punishments often very disproportion-
ate to offences. It is evident, that civilization has not
 effected all the moral changes and improvements that
 can be produced in the constitution of human society,
 nor have laws and government been carried to the
 utmost limits of perfection. It is, therefore, highly
 incumbent for us to cherish the firm and unshaken
conviction, that it is not beyond the bounds of hu-
man effort to devise a system, that will combine in
 its tendency, the prevention of crimes, and the reform-
ation of convicts. Let us then ask any sagacious
 observer of human nature, what should be the inci-
pient step in order to protect society against crime.
 The answer is plain. To afford them a common
 school education, and fasten on their minds a know-
ledge of their duties towards God, and carefully in-
struct them by means of the Holy Scriptures, in the
 principles of the Christian religion. Let, then, the
 present laws for common schools be cherished and
 improved, in such manner as will oblige parents of
 the poorer classes in society, to send their children to
 some one of the common schools, to be instructed in
 reading, writing, and arithmetic, and in a knowledge
 of the Scriptures. By a legislative act, rules should be prescribed for
 enforcing a strict regard to the perfect cleanliness of
 the persons of the children, to their moral conduct, to
 oblige the teacher to read at the opening of the school,
 daily, a chapter from a work entitled Scripture Les-
sons, which is, on many accounts, preferable to the
 Bible for the use of schools, as it contains the most
 important part of the Scriptures appertaining to vir-
tue and good morals. This book has been translated
 into most of the languages of Europe, and is exten-
sively used in the common schools in that quarter of
 the globe, and also in the United States. To make
 it the duty of all overseers of common schools, to em-
ploy such teachers only, as are men of suitable quali-
fications, sober and exemplary characters. Every
 inducement should be used to encourage parents (in
 every place where it is practicable) to send their
 children to school, as soon as they reach three years
 of age. This might be done, by making it the duty
 of overseers of each school, occasionally to visit the
 parents of the children, as has been done by the trus-
tees of the New-York Free School Society. Although
the latter have, at present, under their care, above
 4000 children, who receive a gratuitous education at
 the schools under their charge ; yet, notwithstanding
 their care and diligence in endeavouring to prevail
 on parents to send their children to school, it is be-
lieved that there are 8000 children in the city, who
 are brought up without the advantage of school
 learning. An inspector might be appointed, in the
 manner other officers of the state are appointed, who
 should be of a respectable character and talents, and
 be allowed a good salary; his duty should be to visit,
 once in each year, every common school throughout
 the state, and inquire into the condition of each school,
 the number of scholars; whether the laws of the state
 are duly complied with; the salary, name, general
 character, and qualifications of the teachers, and an
 account of all the receipts and expenditures; he should
 make his report annually, to the superintendent of
 common schools, who should be directed to present
 the same to the legislature. Next to providing for the moral and religious edu-
cation of children, by means of common schools
 throughout the state, it would be productive of in-
calculable advantage, to erect a suitable prison, solely
 for the confinement of boys under sixteen years of
 age, considered as vagrants, or guilty of petty thefts,
 or other minor offences: it is believed that there are
 but few amongst the most guilty of this description
 of juvenile delinquents, who may not, by proper dis-
cipline, be subdued and reclaimed, by the establish-
ment of a well-regulated prison for criminal youth.
 In Massachusetts, there is a prison for young convicts
 in each county. A number of the citizens of New-
York, conceiving the great benefit that would be de-
rived, by erecting a suitable building for the reception
 of such objects as has been described, have associated
 for the purpose, and have been incorporated by the
 name of The Society for the Reformation of Juvenile
 Offenders in the city of New-York. This establish- 
ment is in so great a state of forwardness as to be
 nearly ready for the reception of suitable objects. It
 is to be denominated the House of Refuge, and youth,
 not exceeding sixteen or seventeen years of age, are
 to be committed there by the criminal courts, instead
 of being sent to the City Penitentiary, or State Prison,
 as has heretofore been the practice. At night they
 are to lodge in separate cells, and during the day, to
 be employed in some useful labour; they are to be
 instructed in reading, writing, and arithmetic. The
 utmost degree of cleanliness is to be strictly observed,
throughout every part of the building; and in the
 persons of the boys, good morals and decent beha-
viour, are to be rigidly maintained; the careful and
 frequent reading of the Holy Scriptures is to be en-
forced. The trustees are empowered to bind them
 as apprentices, to the sea-service, to a trade, or to
 farmers. A similar establishment might be formed
 at Albany, to serve for Troy and other towns on the
 North River, and the state might be divided into con-
venient districts, and one establishment of this
 nature erected in each district. A distinct and separate building should be erected on
 the premises attached to the state prison, for the confine-
ment of adults, males and females, such as common
 drunkards, prostitutes, those who keep houses of ill
 fame, or gambling-houses, or for those guilty of small
 petty thefts, or vagrants. This prison should be divi-
ded into cells about the size of six feet by four. A single magistrate should be vested with power to
commit persons to this prison from three to thirty days.
 Each prisoner should be obliged to wash his face and
 hands every morning. Rigid care should be taken
 to have each cell well ventilated, and kept perfectly
 clean; and this care should be extended, as far as pos-
sible, to their clothes and personal appearance. He
 should be confined in a separate cell, and fed only on
 bread and water, have no work, and no bed, except
 a single blanket. The prisoners should be allowed 
no tobacco, and should be deprived of every kind of
 amusement; they should be permitted to have no
 books, except the Bible, and perhaps it might be most
 beneficial that that only be allowed them, when, in
 the judgment of the keeper, their minds appeared to
 be in a disposition to read it with profit. No person
 should be permitted to converse with any prisoner,
 except the keeper, or those appointed to have the
 superintendence of the prison, or a magistrate. If the
 prisoner be guilty of a second offence, he should be
 tried for it, and receive such punishment as the court,
 in their discretion, shall award him, either to be re-
committed, or sentenced to the state prison. The plan of confining the above description of
 minor offenders in solitude without employment from
 three to thirty days, cannot fail, frequently, of having
 the most beneficial effect, as the prisoner will be then
 forced to reflect on his past life. It may also tend to
 convince the convict that his punishment is just; and,
 unless this effect be produced on the mind of the
 prisoner, unless he be led to believe that his own
 welfare, as well as the public good, is consulted in
 his punishment, it will be in vain to expect reforma-
tion ; but, on the contrary, to confine a man in a soli-
tary cell for months, or years, is a punishment which
 may appear to the criminal unnecessarily harsh and
 unjust, hardens his temper, and excites those feelings
 of enmity towards his species, that the thought of
 doing them an injury by the commission of new
 crimes is gratifying to him. If it should be urged that solitary confinement will
 be expensive, it may be answered, that any expense
 which it can possibly occasion, should be considered
 as nothing in comparison to the accomplishment of
 the great object which it concerns. And, besides, in
 proportion as crimes are lessened or decreased, or as
 they are summarily punished, the expenses of the
 state, in relation to the apprehension, detention, and
 prosecution of criminals, are diminished. There is, as it appears to me, a moral and religious
 view of this subject, which should not be without its
 influence. We are too apt to forget while we are
 providing for the protection of persons and property
 by passing laws for the punishment of crimes, that
 the human beings who may become obnoxious to
 these laws, have also their claims upon us. If it be
 admitted that the infliction of solitude, from three to
 sixty days, for minor offences, will, while it sup-
presses criminality in an equal degree with any other
 mode of punishment, also tend to reform the offender
 more than any other course would do, we are bound
 by every feeling of humanity, and by all the precepts
 of the christian religion, to adopt that course which
 may raise a fellow-creature from degradation, fit him
 for usefulness in this life, and prepare him for that
 which is to come. State Prisons, or Penitentiaries.—Great inconveni-
ence, and apparent injustice, is frequently produced,
 in making the distinction of the punishment of those
 guilty of petty larceny, and those guilty of grand lar-
ceny:—a person charged with committing the former, is
 at present liable to be sentenced to the county prisons,
 at hard labour, for a term not exceeding three years;
 and if guilty of the latter, for a term not less than
 three years, or not exceeding fourteen years. To
 steal an article of the value of twenty-five dollars, or
 less, is deemed petty larceny; and, if the value of the
 article stolen exceeds twenty-five dollars, it is termed
 grand larceny. So that the stealing of a watch,
 valued at twenty-five dollars, is deemed petty larceny,
 but if a watch, valued at twenty-six dollars, grand
 larceny. Now, the moral turpitude being the same,
 it is therefore certainly absurd to make any differ-
ence in the punishment. Although the moral turpitude of committing an
 offence, in law deemed petty larceny, may frequently
 be the same as that denominated grand larceny, I do
 not mean to contend that there should be no line of 
distinction to mark the difference between them; but
 considering that, in order to graduate the punishment
 as near as possible to the nature of the offence, much
 must necessarily be left to the discretion of the court,
 I would respectfully suggest the propriety of an alter-
vation in our penal code, so as that petty larceny,
 should consist in stealing articles not exceeding the
 value of one hundred dollars. If this were done, the
 convict might be sentenced to a longer or shorter
 confinement, according to his general character, and
 other circumstances, and not according to the value of
 the goods stolen. An old offender stealing goods to
 the value of ten dollars, should certainly, in most
 cases, be punished with more severity than a young
 offender stealing to the value of fifty dollars. Unless
 there be a careful and due discrimination of charac-
ter, in fixing duration of punishment, courts may
 frequently commit extreme and barefaced injustice.
 It is equally as sound a maxim in jurisprudence as
 in morals, that he who punishes another for offend-
ing against justice, should himself be just. The state prison in this city is so badly contrived,
 that it never can be successfully used as a Penitenti-
ary ; it should be sold, and a new one erected a few
 miles from the city, constructed on the same plan as
 the state prison at Auburn, to have separate cells, so
 that the prisoners might lodge separately. Every cell
 should be properly ventilated by means of a small
 aperture next the ceiling, of three inches diameter. The prisoners ought to be kept constantly employ-
ed at such work as the overseers of the prison should
 think most suitable. To purchase raw materials to
 be worked up in the prison, has frequently been at-
tended with loss, owing to want of skill in purchas-
ing, and bad management in disposing of manufac-
tured articles to the best advantage. The most
 preferable plan would be, to make contracts for
 the labour of the convicts, with shoe makers, stone-cut-
ters, &c. &c. the contractors furnishing the raw ma-
terials; but no contractor should be allowed to enter
 the prison, or to have any intercourse whatever with
 the convicts. The prisoners might safely be employ-
ed during the day in the yards, and effectually pre-
vented from all improper intercourse or conversation
 with each other, provided the prison discipline, before
 recommended in the answer to the third query, be
 rigidly enforced. The cells should not be used, ex-
cept to confine a convict on a low diet, when he vio-
lates any by-law of the prison. The by-laws relating
 to the government of the convicts, such as preserving
 the greatest degree of cleanliness in the persons, and
 in the rooms, halls, kitchen, and throughout every
 part of the prison, &c. should be very minutely de-
tailed, printed and fixed in different parts of the
 prison, and no offence against those rules should ever
 escape being punished, under any pretence whatever. The confinement of criminals in a solitary cell du-
ring the whole time of their sentence, say, from one
 to five years, or more, appears to be unnecessarily
 severe. Suppose the term of his punishment to be
 three years, and that he should have some kind of 
daily employment, yet it appears to me, that the pro-
ject is cruel and unjust, as it is highly probable
 the health of the convict would be impaired if not de-
stroyed, and in many cases it would produce insanity.
 We well know, that cruel and severe punishment
 has never proved sufficient to deter persons from per-
petrating crimes; and to confine a man for years in
 a solitary cell, will be more likely to harden his
 mind, and brutalize his disposition, than to produce
 his reformation. I am very willing to admit, that
 the observations I have made, may not be correct in
 every instance, as cases may occur, that will serve to
 prove, that a man may be confined in solitude for
 several years without injury to his health, and also
 that reformation has effected its perfect work; but I
 am well assured that such instances would very sel-
dom occur. It is acknowledged by all, who have reflected on
 the best means of establishing a penitentiary system,
most likely to protect society against crimes, that
 the construction of the building should be such, as to
 prevent the convicts from improper intercourse with
 each other; and that it is impossible this important
 end can be attained, unless each be at night lodged
 separately in a cell. It is in vain to expect any
 beneficial effects under the best regulations that can
 be devised, if the prison admit a number of prisoners
 to lodge in one room. During the day they may be employed with safety
 in the yards, under the charge of keepers, and by a
 rigid discipline, all improper intercourse prevented;
 this has been fully demonstrated by my own expe-
rience as an inspector, during the first four years
 after the state prison in this city was erected. It is
 only necessary to punish any offender the moment he
 commits an offence, by confinement in a solitary cell
 on bread and water. No person should be allowed
 to visit the prison, unless accompanied by a magis-
trate or one of the inspectors. In the foregoing part
 of this communication, I have stated my sentiments, on
 the indispensable necessity of preserving the most per-
fect degree of cleanliness, in the person of the prisoners,
 and throughout the prison, as it will produce the
 best moral effects in the preservation of order, and
 aid materially in the reformation of the convicts. No undue severity should be exercised towards
 prisoners. The best general system of government
 and management is by mild treatment. The plan of fixing tasks, or agreeing to make al-
lowance for extra work performed by convicts, ought
 not to be adopted; it is bad policy, as it tends to
 lessen too much the principle of punishment. It
 would be much better to give the convict, when dis-
charged on the expiration of his sentence, a small
 sum to serve him till he can get into a situation to
 earn something by his own industry, and if he be
inclined to endeavour to go to work, from three to five
 dollars will be sufficient to give him, and if he has no
 disposition to seek for employment, to give him even
 a small sum would most likely prove an injury. If
 he has not learned any regular trade, he can soon 
get employment on a farm or in the city as a labourer.
 In England the state of things is widely different
 to what it is in this country, and it may there be
 more necessary, that convicts during their confine-
ment should learn some trade. A school in the evening should be established, and
 on the First day of the week they should be assem-
bled for the purpose of Divine Worship, and a chapter
 in the Bible should be read to them every morning
 or evening. In selecting inspectors, care should be taken that
 they are highly respectable men, capable of perform-
ing the duties of their office, and who would act
 solely from benevolent motives, with a religious view
 to benefit their fellow creatures. Much would depend
 on their dispositions and exertions, and on their occa-
sionally giving to the convicts suitable religious and
 moral advice. Gradual changes may be effected
 even in the worst of men, by a steady, firm, and
 persevering attention to correct their acquired bad
 habits. Those who assert (and there are many
 respectable men who make the assertion) that to
 attempt to reform convicts, by exercising kind and
 conciliatory means, is chimerical and absurd, cer-
tainly do not reflect, that to advise and admonish the
 most profligate and abandoned, is the usual practice
 of life, and is solemnly enjoined by the precepts of
 the Founder of our holy religion. We ought not to
 refrain from using such means as may be in our
 power, to produce an amendment and change in the
 dispositions of convicts, from an apprehension that
 a complete reformation cannot be expected. The
 employments that would be the most suitable for
 the prisoners, ought to be left to the discretion of the 
inspectors, and also the sole power to appoint the
 keeper, agent, and other officers, and to remove them
 in case of improper conduct, or want of sufficient
 qualifications to discharge their respective duties. I do not approve of dividing the prisoners into dif-
ferent classes, and distinguishing each class by dif-
ferent coloured clothing; and, if the plan I have pro-
posed be adopted, of having separate prisons for the
 different descriptions of convicts, this plan of classi-
fication in any one prison will be useless, except
 having a separate yard for those committed for second
 offences. The different prisons I have proposed, might be
 built adjoining each other, but to have separate yards.
 The whole might be under the same board of inspec-
tors. Recapitulation of my views of the most effectual
 system for the protection of society against crimes: A careful attention to early education, by amend-
ing our laws, so that every poor family in the state
 should partake of the benefit afforded by our Com-
mon Schools. To establish a House of Refuge for Juvenile
 Delinquents. To erect in each county a prison to contain a
 number of cells, to receive common drunkards, pros-
titutes, keepers of houses of ill fame, for gambling, or
 those guilty of petty thefts, or vagrants, to be commit-
ted by a single magistrate, and confined from three
 to thirty days, and kept on low diet without any
 employment. Two State Prisons or Penitentiaries, properly
 constructed, and subject to suitable regulations, for
 persons convicted of grand larceny, and crimes of a
 higher grade. I am, with great respect and esteem,
 Your assured friend, THOMAS EDDY. New York, lst month, 7th, 1825. Mr. Eddy answered these inquiries, and others in
different walks of life took up the pen. Among them
 was Cadwallader D. Colden , Esq., who wrote as a
 lawyer, and a man of philanthropy and experience,
 and his work is valuable to all who make the sub-
ject a matter of inquiry. That bold and original
 thinker, Doctor Charles Caldwell , of Transylvania
 University, also wrote upon state prison discipline,
 and in a striking manner connected the subject with
 his favourite science, phrenology. Dr. Caldwell 's
 book should be read to set people a thinking, for his
 singularity is not more striking than his bold and
 clear logic. We may differ from him in many things,
 but we feel indebted to a man who teaches us to
 reason. Mr. Eddy lived to see his state prison discipline
 carried into effect in several States of the Union, which
 was acknowledged to be the greatest improvement of 
the age. Since his death, this system has received the
 approbation of the enlightened philosopher, Dr. Lei-
 ber, in the Encyclopaedia Americana, under the arti-
cle Prison Discipline, who says, referring to Allen ,
 Tibbits , and Hopkins , The result of the wise la-
bours of these excellent men was the perfecting of a
 scheme of prison discipline, which had been begun
 partially at Auburn, and which is substantially the
 model on which the reforms attempted in most of the
 other States have been conducted. It consists, prin-
cipally, of the solitary confinement of the convicts
 during the night, and the time of taking their meals;
 of labour during the day; and of silence at all times,
 except for the purposes of communication with their
 keepers; they are never allowed to address each other,
 not even by signs or looks. The strictest supervision
 is, of course, necessary, to secure uninterrupted and
 industrious labour, and to prevent the evil communi-
cations which would otherwise abound. The advan-
tages of this system are, that it affords an opportunity
 alternately for silent and solitary reflection, for the
salutary reflection of the mind upon itself; and for
 that mental activity upon other objects, and that re-
laxation from the severer task of thinking, which is
 at once necessary to preserve the healthy state of the
 mind and body, and to give efficacy to the meditation
 which is thus encouraged. But this alternation of
 labour and reflection is not the only, nor, perhaps, the
 greatest advantage of the plan. The unaided thoughts
 of the corrupt and hardened might recur to topics
 which would be any thing but salutary; but, in the
 silence and darkness of night, the voice of religious
 instruction is heard; and, if any circumstances can
 be imagined, calculated to impress the warnings, the
 encouragements, the threats, or the hopes of religion
 upon the mind, it must surely be those of the convict
 in his cell, where he is unseen and unheard, and
 where nothing can reach him but the voice which
 must come to him, as it were, from another world,
 telling him of things which, perhaps, never before
 entered into his mind; telling him of God, of eter-
nity, of future reward and future punishment, of suf-
fering far greater than the mere physical endurances
 of the present life, and of joy infinitely beyond the
 pleasures he may have experienced. These instruc-
tions frequently discover to the guilty tenant of the
 cell, what seems often not to have occurred to him,
 the simple fact, that he has a spiritual nature; that he
 is not the mere animal which his habits and hitherto
 uncontrolled propensities would indicate; and this is
 a discovery which alone may, and does effect, a great
 change in a man's whole character. He feels that he
 is a being superior to what he had thought himself,
 and that he is regarded as one having higher powers
 than he had supposed. The first step in the path of
 improvement is a prodigious one; a new ambition is
 created, and the encouragement of it is the principal
 thing now needed. This encouragement it is part of
 the system to give. The spiritual guide of this out-
cast flock must study the character and previous cir-
cumstances of every individual; he must adapt him-
self and his instructions to their wants; he must
 teach the ignorant, arouse the careless, touch, if it be
 possible, the impenitent, lead the willing, and be all
 things to all men, if by any means he may save
 some. To the morning and evening services of de-
votion, are to be added the more direct and elaborate
 instructions of the Sabbath, and the no less important
 influences which may be effected in private inter-
course with the convict. The Sunday school may
 communicate the most valuable information on many
 subjects; and every improper influence may be, and
 ought to be, absolutely excluded. It is this system
 of addressing the intellectual and moral qualities of
 man, of treating the convict as a being of a compound
 nature—both physical and spiritual—that constitutes
 the peculiar merit of the prison discipline, which is
 now about to be introduced. No new discovery has
 been made, unless it be considered one that criminals
 may sometimes be made susceptible of moral influ-
ences. It is only the adaptation of well known prin-
ciples to a new class of subjects. It is merely carry-
ing to the lowest, the most ignorant, and the most
 degraded class, that plan of education which is nearly
 universal among us, and which should be entirely so
 every where. The exercise of mere force, which has
 been so long considered the only means of punish-
ment, is at length yielding to the rapidly strength-
ening conviction of the superior efficacy of moral
 influence. At the same time Mr. Eddy was labouring to change
 the penal code of the state of New York, and estab-
lish his penitentiary system, his mind was deeply
 engaged upon other charities. An Hospital had been
 founded in the city of New York, by the munificence
 of individuals, 011 this and on the other side of the
 water, a few years before the commencement of the
 revolutionary war; but that momentous event chang-
ed the whole course of things in this country, and 
the Hospital suffered with other institutions. On
 the return of peace, this charity seemed still warm
with life, but was not reanimated until after the
 adoption of the Federal constitution. This act,
 which gave strength, vigour and reputation to the 
nation, was soon followed by great exertions. In
 less than two years after the constitution went into
 operation, the hospital was open for the reception
 of patients. The legislature had lent a helping hand;
 but it was not until Mr. Eddy , in 1793, was elected
 one of the governors of this institution, that great and
 liberal things were done for it. At this time, the
 Board met but once in three months; he proposed
 that the Board should meet once a month. This
 was agreed to, and new life was given to these
 meetings by plans proposed by Mr. Eddy. There was
 a field back of the Hospital of seven acres, which
 might have been purchased for one hundred pounds
 an acre, and he urged the Board to buy it without
 delay, but in this he was, unfortunately for the insti-
tution, overruled; yet nothing abated his ardour in the
 cause of this charity. The annual allowance from
 the legislature to the hospital was five thousand dol-
lars, and this was limited to four years. In 1795,
 Mr. Eddy , being at Albany, held a communication
 with that prince of patriotism and benevolence, Gen.
 Schuyler.* * See Appendix. He prevailed on him to introduce a bill in
 the Senate, which passed into a law, giving the Hos-
pital ten thousand dollars a year for four years.
 The next year Mr. Eddy again visited Albany, and
procured the passage of a law adding twenty-five
 hundred dollars a year to the former grant. In 1800,
Mr. Eddy repaired to Albany, and procured an exten-
sion of the grant for five years. Notwithstanding
 this liberality, the governors could not extend their
 plans according to their wishes, and they did the
 best they could until 1806, when they again sent
 their faithful representative with a petition, the 
prayer of which was for an extension of these grants
 for fifty years, and it was allowed. The indefati-
gable philanthropist did not become wearied in his
 cause, for in 1810 he again succeeded in getting an
 additional sum of three thousand five hundred dol-
lars for ten years, or during the pleasure of the legis-
lature ; at this time, the Hospital was in the receipt
 of sixteen thousand dollars a year. This last act of
 the Assembly was repealed in 1817, and the income
 from the State reduced to twelve thousand five hun-
dred dollars. Early in the year 1815, Mr. Eddy made a written
 communication to the Governors of the Hospital,
 which enforced the propriety of introducing an in-
stitution for lunatic patients, more extensive than
 had heretofore been in existence in this country.
 The communication is full of good sense without any
 pretensions; and, although all the sentiments it con-
tains are now familiar to us, they were novel then
 to most of those who had paid attention to the sub-
ject of insanity. This communication is mentioned
 in the history of the hospital, and the proceedings
 had thereon. An appeal was again made to the legislature for
 assistance, and Mr. Eddy was requested to proceed
 to Albany and present a memorial, but this he de-
clined for various reasons. It is a painful and labo-
rious task to attend a winter session of a delibera-
tive body, and he thought he had done more than
 his share of this labour. No one can tell how irksome
 it is to talk with hundreds of persons, clothed with
 authority, often captious, sometimes suspecting self-
ishness, and generally impatient listeners, when
 caught in the lobbies or out of doors; and then it is
 natural for every man to feel an aversion to any one
 who often comes on errands of solicitation. To do
 much and offend but few, was the peculiar gift of
 Mr. Eddy . The Governors of the Hospital would
 not vote to relieve him from this duty, but particular-
ly evaded the subject by leaving it to Peter A. Jay ,
 Esq. then a member of the legislature, a gentleman
 of talents and weight of character. Mr. Jay went to
 Albany, hut after a while wrote to Mr. Eddy to come
 to his assistance. The appeal was made in such
 strong terms, that he could not resist it, and he set
 out for Albany, and with the exertions of Mr. Jay ,
 an act was passed, giving ten thousand dollars a year
 for the support of the insane, and for erecting new
 buildings. This act was limited by the act for
 the better support of the hospital, which granted
 twelve thousand five hundred dollars for fifty years.
 Probably many members had forgotten when the act
 would expire, and those who did remember the
 fact, did not choose to say any thing about it. View-
ed in any light, it was a liberal donation for a noble
 purpose. Nearly eighty acres of land were pur-
chased at Bloomingdale, and a fine building erected
 for the accommodation of the insane. The success
 of his exertions, and those of his coadjutors, gave
 Mr. Eddy the liveliest pleasure, which he took no
pains to disguise. He always felt himself an in-
structor of those whose minds were sickly, and he
 believed that, though it was difficult, yet it was not
 impossible to
 Minister to a mind diseased;
 Pluck from the memory a rooted sorrow;
 Raze out the written troubles of the brain;
 And, with some sweet oblivious antidote,
 Cleanse the stuff'd bosom of that perilous stuff,
 That weighs upon the heart.
 The study of mental derangement is one of deep
 interest to the philanthropist. To mark insanity in
 all its various forms, to go back to the cause of its
 existence, whether moral, physical, or accidental,
 requires acuteness and constant observation. The
 wise and the kind feel assured that they carry with
 them many cures and a thousand anodynes for mise-
ry. Those who devote a life to doing good, in cu-
ring or soothing the maladies of the mind, improve 
their own intellects, and at the same time are learn-
ing lessons for the government of their own passions,
 and purifying their own affections. They find that
 the furious maniac yields to gentle firmness, when
 he would rave at severity; that melancholy may be
 banished by the voice of cheerfulness and kindness,
 when it would grow deeper if attacked by boiste-
rous harshness; and that even demency may be
 quickened into life and mental action by proper
 moral sentiments. It is an acknowledged fact, that
 those who have the care of the insane are generally
 cheerful; one cause of which may be, that they feel
 conscious of being in the way of doing good, and the
 effects of their exertions are constantly before them;
 and, perhaps, another is, that the same mind is unceas-
ingly dwelling upon the blessings it enjoys in its
 sanity, and draws comparisons between itself, and
 those unfortunate beings who are deprived of reason,
 as we take a more elastic step when we pass a crip-
ple, who moves on slowly in his deformity and an-
guish, or as we look at the sun, or some bright object,
 and see that the petitioner for street alms is blind. The Indians within the United States have been
 harassed, warred upon, driven from their primitive
 abodes, and, at times, hunted down as beasts of the
 forest. Sometimes they were sinned against, but 
often sinning in the causes which produced this dis-
tress. They thought this whole continent their own,
 and that they were sole proprietors of it. Their
 ideas of national rights and of political economy
 were not very extensive, but their patriotism and
 courage will never be doubted by those acquainted
 with their history. At times, they seemed to wish to
 be friends; at other times, were vindictive and blood-
thirsty. The Eastern Indians were among the fiercest on
 the continent. King Philip is a noble instance of
 sagacity and love of country ; and the Six Nations, so
 well known in the history of New York, were brave, 
and most generally faithful to their treaties. But it
 often happened, that when the philosopher was con-
templating them as patriots and warriors, he heard
 of some of their massacres and conflagrations, and
 his resentment arose against them at their barbarous
 disposition. Or, he saw them through the medium
 of taste, and was disgusted with their filthy habits
 and wandering course of life. When Mr. Eddy began
 his career of active philanthropy, the Six Nations had
 been so far reduced as not to be feared, but rather to
 be pitied. Their case came within the view of the
 charities of his religious order, and he made himself
 acquainted with their situation, their habits, and cha-
racter. In 1793, Mr. Eddy , with his friend, John Mur-
ray, junior, visited the Brothertown, Stockbridge,
 Oneida, and Onondaga Indians, to get more accurate
information in regard to them, and see if some plan
 could not be devised to ameliorate their condition.
 At this time, the west was a wild; Utica, now so con-
siderable a place, then contained but three houses.
 From Utica they travelled on an Indian path to
Cayuga lake, and attended the meeting for making
 a treaty, held by General Schuyler , and other com-
missioners, with the Indians, seven hundred of whom
 were present. Mr. Eddy , and his friend Murray , on
 their return, made so favourable a report to the
 Yearly Meeting Committee for the improvement of
 the Indians, that for several years—and I never have
 heard that the Friends had relinquished their exer-
tions in the cause—considerable sums were appropri-
ated to instruct and civilize them. He was not very
 sanguine, in this charity, of doing much good, notwith-
standing the great interest he took in the welfare of
 the Indians. He saw that their original character
 was every day changing, and that the whites, some-
times honestly, and by fair contract, but often impro-
perly, were encroaching on their grounds: but there
 was another side to the question; a race of industrious
 men, adorned with all the arts and sciences of civi-
lization, was growing up and occupying a space for
 a village, where thousands were supported, that would
 not have furnished room and verge enough for a
 dozen aboriginal hunters, according to their notions
of life. But, if such men as Mr. Eddy had been in
 the Council for Indian affairs, the tribes would have
 faded away, if that is their fate—and who can doubt
 it?—with less suffering and less repining than is now
 witnessed. His hospitable mansion was a wigwam
 to the travelling Indian, where he drank when thirsty
 and ate when hungry. He sometimes had a dozen
 Indians, men, women, and children, in the house at
 once. Among his Indian acquaintance, was the fa-
mous Red Jacket , of the Seneca tribe. This chief
 was a warrior and orator of high intellectual powers
 and commanding mien. His head was the admira-
tion of the phrenologist, and his rifle was as un-
erring as death. This man exhibited all that was
 noble in the savage; he was brave, sagacious, and
 patriotic, but he yielded to the weakness of intem-
perance, and showed the worst as well as the best
 qualities of their fallen nature. His tribe once de-
posed him from power as a chief, for his imprudence;
 but he had energy of character enough to redeem
 himself, and regain his power in his tribe—a singu-
lar occurrence in savage or civil life. To Mr. Eddy ,
Red Jacket was a study, and so was Eddy to Red
Jacket, for he, too, with all his fierceness, was a phi-
lanthropist and a philosopher. Since Mr. Eddy 's death,
the state of the Indians has excited much feeling in the
community, but the time is rapidly approaching, when
 this subject will only be a bygone tale. In New Eng-
land, there are a few remnants of several once power-
ful tribes, but they are mixed with the Africans, and
have no importance in the community. Though some
of their ancient territories are, in some instances, ap-
propriated to their use, and the States act as guardians,
 in order that these shall not be taken from them. In
 New York, the Six Nations, once so powerful, are now
fast declining, and in the Western States of Ohio,
 Kentucky, and Mississippi, they are nearly annihila-
ted. Beyond the settlements, there are a few who
 have maintained their independence, but these soon
 will share the fate of other nations of aborigines on
 this continent. But, if we must come to these melan-
choly conclusions, we ought not to forget that there
 have been philanthropists who have struggled to save
 them, and to press upon them the arts, and teach 
them the value of civilization and Christianity. The 
following letters will show how much has been done. New Stockbridge, Nov. 19th, 1795. BROTHERS, Our ears have been open to hear from you these
 many days, but have not heard a word. And we
 suppose you also have expected to hear our welfare,
 and have not heard one word. Brothers—With pleasure we have retained the good
counsels you given us when you were here our place.
 We have been endeavoured to follow the way you
 pointed out for us. Now we will also inform you 
that our nation at large enjoy their health ever since
 you left us. This, we acknowledge, is merely from
 the good Spirit. We are sorry to hear that many of
 our white brothers at New York, have been taken
 away by death. This, also, we believe, is by the
 will of the same Spirit. Brothers—We believe that you have heard the
 childish conduct of our brethren, the Oneidas, with
 regard to their land affairs, therefore, 'tis needless that
 we should say any thing about it. As we look upon you to be our true Friends, we
 write to you as such; you are sincerely wished that
 our poor Nations should be build up so as to become
 civilized people; we, also, have an earnest wish for
 the same. We ever have endeavoured to promote the happi-
ness of our Nation here, but our depend ance is wholly
on him who is able to do more for us than we can
 ask. Still, we believe, that in some respects he will
 not do any thing without our endeavours. Brothers—By your good counsels, you have given
 us good encouragement to go on in the good way,
 and although we have been endeavoured to do what
 we have told you, but as we are new beginners we
 find ourselves to be as children who could not walk
 strait or go alone without little help by some Friend. And we also find some real obstructions in the way
 which we can avoid if we can get some help. And
 as you are our Friends, we will open our minds
 freely unto you. Here we have upwards than sixty
 families who are not acquainted how to make cloth
 of no kind; it has been therefore necessary for each
 one to go out from the Town, at times, to seek some
 articles of clothing among the white traders; and
 the traders generally set up great price on their
 goods. In this way of living, among so many families,
 have spend many many a days in one year. Besides
 all this, there are some Indians who, while they seek-
ing where to purchase some necessary articles for
 their poor families, they have been overtaken by the
 strong Heroe, and robbed by him, and come home
 almost naked and starved. Brothers—This is one obstruction on our way; in
 order to avoid it, we would ask your assistance. If
 you can find it in your minds so as to do it with
 ease to trust us few articles of clothing, that we may
 keep little store in our Town, that our people may
 not spend much of their time as they have done, and 
that the white traders may not take all the advan-
tages on this respect as they always did. And the
 great Heroe (whose name is Rum) should not rob
 our Indians as he has done these many years. This
 means will fasten our Nation at one place, we the
 subscribers, engage to pay you at such a time as we
 may agree. If such thing can take place here, it 
would also great deal help our brethren, the Oneidas
 and Tuscaroras. This, Brothers, is our request—and
 we leave it to your consideration—and desire to hear
 your voices as soon as you can find it convenient to
 send answer. This is all what we have to say. From your friends, HENDRICK AUPAUMUT ,
 JOHN QUINNEY ,
 SOLOMON QUANUUANCHMUT .
 George Embree .}
 Thomas Eddy .}
John Murray .} 
 We have not received the stove yet, and wish to
 hear something about it. Two or three hundred pounds worth of such
 articles as these: Three point blankets ; two and half ditto; linen,
 and brown linen, and tow cloth; broadcloths, such
 as strouds; rateen for legings ; some calicoes, thread,
 needles; some handkerchiefs, and some broadcloth,
 which may be used for coating,—such colour as
 Friends generally have for coats. New York, 12th mo. 10th, 1795. BROTHERS, A few days ago we received your letter, dated
 19th of last month. The account you give us of your
 welfare affords us much satisfaction, and we rejoice
 to find that you retained the counsel and advice we
 gave to you at Stockbridge, and our written commu-
nications at Brothertown. We hope you will dili-
gently attend to the voice of the good Spirit, which
 is placed in all men's hearts, and which is all sufficient
 to lead out of all bad practices—and as you closely
 pursue those ways which is consistent with this
 divine Spirit, you will witness, by experience, that it
 will be your strength, your good Counsellor, and your
 true Comforter. Since our return home we have been 
very thoughtful about our Indian Brethren, and in-
tended soon to have wrote to you. Our minds, as well as your other Friends in this
 city, have been much employed in thinking in what
 way we could best serve you; we are sensible you
 want assistance, and we are very desirous of helping
 you to become Farmers, and learn some useful trades,
 so that you may not find it necessary to go so much
 out among the white people, which has been already
 of great hurt to your young men, by exposing them
 to be overtaken by the great Hero, as you very justly
 observe. But, Brothers, we must tell you in plain
 words, that unless you are in earnest, and particu-
larly the peace makers and chiefs among yourselves,
 to make by-laws to prevent your Nation from going
 so much among the white people, or bringing Rum
 into your Nation, we may be discouraged from lend-
ing you assistance. Now, Brothers, we want you to
 be wise, study your own good, and endeavour to
 promote your own happiness. We fully depend on
 you to use exertions to make a reform in your Nation,
 and that you will, in the first place, strive to leave
 off drinking Rum, as being the first and great step
 to your becoming a sober and industrious, and, in
 time, a civilized people; and hoping this happy
 change may take place, you may likely again receive
 another visit next summer from some of our Society;
 and in order to encourage you to go on in well-doing,
 we have agreed to comply with your request in
 sending you a few goods, in confidence that you will
 pay us punctually for them in twelve months. As we have endeavoured to point out the path
which leads to your happiness in this world and the
 next, so we hope you will be favoured with strength
and good resolutions to walk in it; and, as you now
 experience a fresh instance of our regard, in furnish-
ing you with some goods, so we particularly request
 of you to be very cautious how you suffer them to
 go out of your possession. Only trust such of your 
Nation as you know are men of uprightness, who
 will pay you in good season, whereby you will be
 enabled to be punctual in paying at the time pro-
posed, which will greatly add to the reputation of
 your character as a people, and, in an especial man-
ner, secure to you the future favour and friendship
 of our Society; which, that it may be the case, is the
 sincere desire of Your real friends and brethren, JOHN MURRAY, jun .
 THOMAS EDDY . 
 The stove, and sufficient of length of pipe, was sent
 some time ago to Albany, to the care of Thomas
Spencer, merchant there, with directions to him to
 send it to the care of Peter Smith , at old Fort Schuy-
ler. Our Assembly will meet next month, and, perhaps,
 it would be best for you three to come to this city,
 and try if you can prevail on them to grant you
 compensation for your old claim. We will give you
 our assistance, and we believe, if you come, that we
 can prevail on the Assembly to grant you an annuity.
Inclosed is invoice of the goods, amounting to 1291. 15s. 10d. To the Chiefs and Warriors of the Six Nations. BROTHERS, In all my intercourse and acquaintance, I have
 endeavoured to give you proofs that I am your friend.
 Of this truth I trust you are well convinced. If, 
then, you believe me to be your friend, you will listen
 to my talk; and if you think I have understanding
 to discern what is for your best good, you will attend
 to my advice. Brothers—I have often shown you what good things
 the white people enjoy, and explained how you might
 also enjoy them. You have answered, that what I
 told you was very good, and that you were willing 
to adopt the useful ways of the white people by 
degrees, but that you could not lay aside your old
 customs all at once. This was a wise answer. It
 will be necessary for you to continue your hunting
 while the game is so plenty as to be worth pursuing.
 But you already know that the game is becoming
 scarce, and have reason to expect, that in a few years
 more it will be gone. What then will you do to feed
 and clothe yourselves, your wives and children?
 Brothers, this is an important question; think well
 upon it; the oldest hunters may, perhaps, find some
 game as long as they live; but before the young men
 grow old, all the game will be destroyed; the young
 men, then, and the boys, should learn to get food and
 clothing without hunting. How are they to do this?
 By cultivating the ground as the white people do;
 for with what grows out of the ground they can
 purchase all other necessaries. If you make fences
 to enclose many fields, you can then securely raise
 corn, wheat, and hay in abundance, to feed your
 families, and as many cattle and hogs as you want,
 and the cattle and hogs will give you more meat than
 you could ever obtain by hunting, even when game
 was plentiest. Now, Brothers, I have the good pleasure to inform
 you, that your good friends, the Quakers, have formed
 a wise plan to show your young men and boys the
most useful practices of the white people. They will
 choose some prudent good men to instruct them.
 These good men will do this only for the love they
 bear to you, their fellow men, as children of the Great
 Spirit, whom they desire to please, and who will be 
pleased with the good they do to you. The Quakers
 and the good men they employ, will ask nothing
 from you, neither land, nor money, nor skins, nor
 furs, for all the good they will render unto you; they
 will only request your consent, and the attention of
 the young men and boys to learn what will be so
 useful. Brothers—If this first attempt succeeds, the way
 will be opened in which your young people may
 learn other useful practices of the white people, so
as to enable them to supply all their own wants, and
 such as choose it may learn to read and write. Having thus explained to you the plan of your
 friends, the Quakers, I conclude with heartily recom-
mending it to your adoption, as better calculated to
 procure lasting and essential benefits to your Nations
 than any plan ever before attempted. Wishing it
 great success, I remain your friend and brother, TIMOTHY PICKERING .
* Timothy Pickering was, in 1796, Secretary of State for the United States;
 George Washington , President. Philadelphia, Feb. 15th, 1796. To MR. JASPER PARISH . Philadelphia, February 15th, 1796. SIR, The Society of Friends, always manifesting a
 desire to promote the best interest of the Indians,
 have now formed a plan to introduce among them
 the most necessary arts of civil life, and have raised,
 and will raise, money, and employ agents, to carry
 it into effect, or at least to make a fair experiment
 to change their present habits, and to adopt in their
 places the practice of those most necessary arts. In
 this attempt, the Friends will need the assistance of
 all well disposed men, who are capable of deriving
 pleasure from the happiness of their fellow men, and
 are therefore willing to promote it. But, of all men,
 those who understand the language of the Indians,
 if possessed of capacity and humanity, have it in
 their power to do them most good; for this reason,
 the Friends earnestly desire your aid; their great
 object is, not to teach peculiar doctrines, but useful
 practices; to instruct the Indians in husbandry, and
 the plain mechanical arts and manufactures directly 
 connected with it. This is beginning at the right
 end, and, if so much can be accomplished, their far-
ther improvements will follow of course. The agents whom the Friends mean to engage to
 reside among the Indians, will be men divested of all
 mercenary views, and devoted for the time solely to
 the pursuit of the object above explained. To the request of the Friends I add mine, that you
 will embrace every occasion which shall offer to ex-
plain to the Indians of the Six Nations, and to per-
suade them to adopt, a plan whose sole object is their
 happiness. I am, Sir, Your friend and servant, TIMOTHY PICKERING . Captain ISRAEL CHAPIN , Superintendent of the
 Six Nations. Philadelphia, February 15th, 1796. DEAR SIR, The Society of Friends have formed a plan to
 instruct the Indians of the Six Nations in husbandry
 and the most necessary arts of civil life. The good-
ness of the design, and the disinterestedness of the
 motives, must recommend it to the favour and support
 of all who wish the happiness of their fellow men.
 You are of this number, and as the Indians have
 confidence in you, it will be in your power greatly
 to promote the success of the plan; and I am sure
 you will not need urging to exert it, on all fit occa-
sions. The persons who will be employed by the
 Friends in this benevolent undertaking, will make
 themselves known to you, and ask your advice and
 assistance. You will oblige me by presenting my
 kind regard to your brother and sister, and I beg you
 to be assured of my esteem and friendship. TIMOTHY PICKERING . 
 An Account of the Commissioners of Pennsylvania who
 were appointed by Government to explore the Back
 Country, &c. in 1796. On their arrival in the town in which the Corn-
planter usually resides, they communicated to him,
 and the men of the town, the errand on which they
 came. After receiving a welcome, and an approba-
tion of their business, the Commissioners retired, and
 were about to proceed forward, when they were
 again called to the Council House, where an elderly
 Indian woman, in the presence of the Corn-planter 
 and his Council, gave in charge to the Commissioners
 to inform your Excellency, That, in the Seneca Nation, the women have as
 much to say in Council as the men have, and in all
 important business have equal authority; that all
 affairs of trade and agriculture are under the sole
direction of the women; that having learned from
their Wise Men that the business they came on was
a search after a better road into their country than
the usual trading path, the women had judged it
 proper to express their approbation of that measure,
 which they saw was equally advantageous to the
Senecas, by lessening the expense of carriage, as to
 the white people; that they were sensible that since
 the game was going from among them, their men
had been less successful in hunting than formerly,
yet they hoped their trade was well worth their
attention; that the proposals made last Spring by
the Chiefs of their Nations, for introducing the plough
among them, had been considered and approved by
the women, who had the greatest interest in it, as
the labour fell wholly on them; that they had also
approved of the request for teachers to be sent among
them to instruct their young people; that if these
were done, they hoped that their Nation might be-
come one people with the Americans, and the Senecas
 would then enjoy the advantages which they per-
ceived they perceived the white people derived from
their superior wisdom.M Thus committed to them, it became their duty to
 lay it before your Excellency. To THE BROTHERTOWN INDIANS.
New York, 6 mo., 2d, 1796. FRIENDS AND BROTHERS, We expect you have already been informed of
the Governor having appointed General William
Floyd, with us, superintendants of the affairs of the
 Indians at Brothertown. This, we expect, will be
 handed you by General Floyd , whom we recom-
mend, from our knowledge of him, as your good
friend. We are satisfied he has the welfare of your
Nation much at heart, and, as we have given you
many proofs of our steady friendship, we hope you
will now closely attend to such advice as General
Floyd may give you. He will kindly inquire into
 your situation, and you must make known your
 wants to him; he will advise you what by-laws and
regulations may be necessary for you to make among 
yourselves, and you will inform him of such as you
 have already made, so that he may give you his senti-
ments thereon. Having had several conversations
with him on the subject of your affairs, we shall
 leave him to inform you of the supplies that is pro-
posed to be handed you this summer. You need not
fresh assurances from us, how desirous we are to
promote your welfare every way, as we believe a
reformation is really began among you; we earnestly
recommend to those sober men and women who have
so nobly stepped forward in so good an undertaking,
that they persevere in a steady conduct, and, by set-
ting examples of sobriety and industry, induce others
to join them, not only in refraining themselves from
the least use of spirituous liquors, but to put your
laws in full force against all offenders in this respect.
Until this shameful practice is entirely laid aside,
 you will labour under many great disadvantages,
and will prevent us from serving you so fully as we
wish to do. We trust you will closely attend to General Floyd's 
counsel, which will be for your good, as we well
know his humane disposition and regard for you will
lead him to bestow much pains with you. On your
example of industry and sobriety great expectations
are formed, with respect to a similar reformation
 with the neighbouring Indians; and we earnestly
hope General Floyd will have it in his power to give
a favourable report of you to the Governor, so as to
 induce him also to be your friend. We have not time now to enlarge much, recom-
mending you to the strict observance of the dictates
 of the Good Spirit placed in each of your hearts. We are, truly, your real friends,EDMUND PRIOR ,
THOMAS EDDY . Address of the Oneida and other Indians to the Assembly
of New York. MY FRIEND, As I always had the welfare of my Nation, and
Indians in general, at heart, I ever been use my en-
deavours to prevent drinking the spirituous liquors
 intemperately—prevailed upon Oneidas to unite with
us to send petitions to the Assembly of New York to
stop all liquors. I have inclosed the copy which I
drawn for our Nations, to send, that you may see it. Signed, HENDRICK AUT . (A true Copy.)
 To the Great Sachem and Chiefs of the State of New
York, sitting around the Great Council Fire of
New York. BROTHERS, Before you cover your Council Fire, we beg your
attention to the voice of your brethren. The different
tribes living at Oneida country, speaks to you in re-
membrance of the friendship you have manifested
towards them in all our treaties; we ourselves have
held Councils at different times, to contemplate the
welfare of our nations, because we cannot but groan
to see our situation; it is also melancholic to reflect
on the ways of our forefathers. Brothers—You, also, sometimes sorry to see the de-
plorable situation of your Indian Brethren, for which
you have given us many good counsels; though we
feel willing to follow your counsels, but it has made
no effect as yet. Our situation is still miserable. Our ancestors have
been conquered, immediately after you came on this
Island, by the strong Heroe, who does still reign
among Indian tribes with tyranny, who has robbed
us of every thing that was precious in our eyes.
We need not mention every particular, how this
tyrant has used us, for your eyes have been open to
behold our dismal situation. By the power of our enemy our eyes have been
blinded; our young men became willing slaves to
this despotic Heroe, so that we have displeased the
good Spirit, and we could not become civilized
people. In looking back, we see nothing but desolation of
our mighty men; in looking forward, we foresee the
 desolation of our tribes. Our Chiefs have used their
endeavours to reform their respective people, but,
having seen no success, they seem discouraged, and
hang down their heads. Brothers—In remembrance of your kind promises,
we unite our cries to you for help. Perhaps, you are ready to think whatman it must
be that have abused so much of our brethren; never
was such Heroe, or tyrant, heard that ever meddled
with Indians. But, in reality, he is your own begot-
ten son, and his name you call Rum, and the names
of his officers, are Brandy, Wine, and Gin, and we
know that you have the power to control him ; and,
as we desire to live in peace, and to become civilized
 nations, we earnestly entreat you to use your power
and wisdom to prevent all people, whether white or
black, who may cause the Rum, and the other spirit-
uous liquors, to come in the hands of our tribes
throughout your State. In compliance with this, our
 request, we will acknowledge your friendship. Is from your brethren, Chiefs and Warriors of Oneida Nation,
 JOHN SKONNONDOGH , CRISDIAN THONIGHGIVENSERA , WILLIAM TATAGIVESERA , SHAGOGHYUDAHA , KAWEGDOT , CORNELIUS KONOYOUNG . 
Chiefs of Tuscaroras,
 NICHOLAS CUSECK, DAVID TYANRESCAGWENDYRORAS , PETER DYONGIVET . 
Chiefs of Maheconneck, or Stockbridge Tribe,
 HENDRICK AUPAUMUT , JOSEPH QUINNEY , JOSEPH SHANQUEATHQUOT , JOHN QUINNEY . The following letters to General Floyd , who was
an Indian agent, and took a lively interest in the
civilization of those under his care, we copy from
Mr. Eddy 's manuscripts, which give a full and fair
account of the efforts of the philanthropists of that
day, in their endeavours to assist the Indians, in
which they were joined by the General and States'
Governments. To General WILLIAM FLOYD , at Fort Stanwick, New York, 7th mo. 11th, 1796. RESPECTED FRIEND, Thy favour of 19th ultimo, to Thomas Eddy , is
 now before us, with the contents of which we are
much pleased. The delay of the buildings, and lay-
ing out the money designed for that, in articles more
 immediately necessary for the Indians, we think a
very judicious step, as, while it will tend to convince
them how much we wish to serve them, they will
also receive more immediate benefits. We hope, by
this time, the goods proposed to be sent them when
thou wast here, have reached them. Thou wilt ob-
serve several additions to them, that were agreed to
 before thou left us, which was in consequence of our
interview with the Governor. As the articles will, probably, be ready for distri-
bution before thou comest away, thou mayest proba-
bly learn whether they are suitably adapted to their
wants, and from thence form a judgment how to
 proceed in future. When suitable opportunity can be
had to consult with them, we think there would be
a propriety in doing it. And, therefore, as it is
probable, some supplies of clothing, blankets, &c.,
may be wanted for the winter season, it would be
agreeable to us if thou wouldest endeavour to obtain
such knowledge of the articles most necessary, and
furnish us with the list thereof. We also think there
 will be a propriety in making an inquiry of them,
what it is probable they will want next season, as that
will afford us time to procure the articles, both in
quantity and quality, much better adapted to their
 use, and, perhaps, a saving. This spring, we found
much difficulty in procuring some things, particularly
the hoes, axes, scythes, &c., some of which are short
of the quantity designed, and, we fear, may also be
 deficient in the quality, though we spared no pains
to procure them of the most proper kinds. If thou shouldest have another opportunity with
 the Indians before thy return, we wish to inform
them of our uniting with thee in what thou hast done;
and we also unite in sentiment with thee, on the
absolute necessity of their making strait by-laws to
prevent the introduction of spirituous liquors among 
 them, and that, when made, they be careful strictly
to enforce them in all delinquencies. The bills thou mentionest having drawn, will all
be duly honoured as they appear. We are, very respectfully, thy Friends, EDMUND PRIOR ,
 THOMAS EDDY . To General WILLIAM FLOYD , at Fort Stanwick, New York, 8th mo. 15th, 1796. ESTEEMED FRIEND, Since our last, we have been without any of
thy favours, and although we much approved of what
thou didst, as being for the most immediate benefit
of the Indians, and have paid the bills thou drewest,
yet we have since had cause to regret furnishing
them with any supplies, till their school house was
built. We now find that the law expressly directs,
that the school house shall be first built, and a mas-
ter provided, and until this is done, the Governor is
restrained from handing us any more money than
may be thought sufficient for those purposes. Of
course, when we called on him, in expectation of
receiving the money, we could get none, as he said
the house must be first completed, as the law directs. We have now no way of being paid our advances,
but by setting about and completing the school house
with all possible expedition ; and, on consulting with
the Governor, we have approved of erecting only a
school house at present, and, at a future time, erect
another house, to serve for to transact their town
business in, and as a meeting house. We have, there-
fore, with his approbation, changed the plan of that
we sent thee, and, enclosed, thou wilt find one calcu-
lated for a school house only. Near where the old
one stands, on John Tuhis 's land, is thought to be an
eligible spot for the new house. Perhaps, if the Indians are informed that the Go-
vernor is restrained by law, from granting any farther
support to them, until the house is finished, they will
generally turn out, and endeavour by their exertions
 to complete the building in a short time. We are of opinion, that logs be collected, and sawed
into pieces about four or five inches thick, and as
wide as the timber will admit of, to be placed on the
top of each other, and pinned and dove-tailed toge-
ther. The building then to be boarded on the outside,
with boards to stand upright, not lengthways. These
boards may be planed, so as they can be painted, if
thought necessary, at a future day. The roof to be
shingled; the lower pieces of the building to be pitch
pine or white oak, to prevent decay. The house
should stand about eighteen inches above the ground,
underpinned with brick or stone, and till this can be
done, it may remain, perhaps, till next year, supported
on blocks. The floor should be pitch pine plank, or,
if not to be had, of white pine, and ceiled above
with boards. The floor and ceiling should be grooved,
but need not to be planed. On this plan we wish thee to procure as many men
as can work, and to proceed immediately, and erect
a house in the most convenient situation that can be
obtained; and thou wilt readily see the necessity of
sending us an acoount of the cost thereof, as soon as
it can be ascertained, which, if some part is done by
the job, may be done even before the building is
finished. Thou wilt please engage young Wampey ,
 or some other, for a master, at a stipulated salary,
until we can procure one that may be better quali-
fied. The Governor agrees to advance us five hundred
dollars towards erecting the proposed house; but thou
wilt remember, no more can be got till the building
is finished, or the cost thereof known, so as to report
it to the Governor. It will be also necessary, that
thou sendest us an account of articles purchased for,
 and supplied to, the Indians. Thou mayest readily procure money for going on
with the building, from any of the store keepers, for
bills on us, which we would be glad thou couldest
make at thirty days' sight, if in thy power. It is
 probable thou mayest engage Post, at old Fort Schuy-
ler, or Kirkland the Attorney, to superintend the
building, after thou engagest a good carpenter. We
 wish to hear from thee by next post, and are, with
much esteem, Thy assured Friends THOMAS EDDY ,
 EDMUND PRIOR . 
 Plan of the Building. 24 feet by 30, in the clear. 9 do. high do. Door in the middle of the front, and 2 windows
 each side. Two windows in the west; none in the north. Chimney in the east. Windows—12 lights, 7 by 9. To the Chiefs of the Delawares* * N. B. Addressed by the Mohigans, (or Stockbridge nation,) to a remnant
of Delawares who lived near Atsion, twenty miles from Philadelphia, till
 1797, and then united themselves with the Stockbridge Indians, 150 miles
west of Albany. The Mohigans always call the Delawares grand-father.-
EDDY .
The Delaware, or Lenni Lenape Indians, were the ancestors of the six
nations, and of most of the tribes of New England; their language has been
considered as the most copious and perfect, of all spoken by the Indian
tribes. It is said to be so formed, as to express almost every shade of meaning
 by prefixes, affixes, and reduplications. Historians have informed us, that
the other tribes had children brought up among the Delawares, in order to
give correctness and polish to their own language on their return to their
respective tribes. Any one acquainted with the history of the Indian, is well
aware that every tribe takes especial care to keep its vernacular as perfect as
possible. Those who examined the Cherokees and Winnebagoes when they
visited the United States, can bear witness to this care to preserve their lan-
guage pure, and their pronunciation correct. This appellation of grandsire,
used by the Mohigans to the Delawares, is in corroboration of this fact.
S. L. K. GRANDFATHER, Attend to the words of your grand-children. I am glad that, by the goodness of the great Good
Spirit, we are allowed to meet together by the side
 of this fire-place, and smoke the pipe of friendship,
while we talk together in commemoration of ancient
covenant, which our forefathers established, and es-
teemed it. I am glad that the Great Spirit puts it in your
minds to visit your grandchildren, and preserve you
through the tedious journey, so to arrive here safely. Grandfather—When I look on you, I see your tears
flowing down from your eyes, on account of the dust
that flew about on the way, as you were coming
from your fire-place hither. In remembrance of the ancient customs of our
ancestors, I now stretch forth my hand, and wipe off
your tears, that you may see your grandchildren in
real appearance; in like manner, I clean your ears,
that you may hear plainly the voice of your grand-
children, and also clean your throat, and loose your
tongue, that you may speak freely. Grandfather—And also I find that your heart is
 hanging downwards, on account of the many losses
in your Nation these many days; and, according to
the customs of our forefathers, I now set your heart
upright, and lay aside all the sound which the white
birds have sounded on your ears, that you may, with-
out prejudice, be enabled to consider what your
grandchildren may say to you. Grandfather—Having done so much, then I see
mud all over your legs and feet, for an account of
the long muddy path in which you have walked
through. I now wash your legs and feet, but still I
discover some briars and thorns sticking fast in your
feet; now I pull out every one of them, and I take
weesquos, in which our ancestors used to put healing
oil, and oint your feet and legs, that you may feel
 well, and walk around by the fire-place of your
grandchildren. (A string of pure white wampum delivered.) Grandfather—Again listen. I am glad to find that you still retain our talk, 
 which passed between us at Philadelphia, when we
saw each other there, (about four years ago,) at which
time I took hold on your hand, and directed you to
my fire-place, which invitations our Chiefs, with our
 young men, do now renew. I spread this unnukkcon, or mat, wide, on which I
put you; likewise those pillows to lay your heads
on; then I stretch forth my hand on your fire-place,
and roll your mat, which you used to sit on, and
spread it over on the other mat, which I just made
ready for you, that you may feel more easy and com-
fortable; here you will eat with your grandchildren
out of one dish, and use one spoon; by the side of
 this fire-place you can cook what you please, and at
night you can lay down to rest, and dream about the
welfare of your men, women, and children. In the
morning you can get up, and promote the same. Grandfather—Lastly, I let you know that I put a
broom by the side of this bed, so that, whenever you
feel something hard on this bed, then when shall
use the broom to sweep off every thing, that nothing
may interrupt your rest. (Nunnchtkchk. String of wampum delivered.) Grandfather—once more attend. We will now let you know the reasons which in-
duce your grandchildren to give you such invitations. 1st. Because I believe that it is the will of the
great Good Spirit, that our ancestors did enter into
covenant, and established a strong friendship between
 them, which covenant we ever have maintained
bright. 2d. Because, by the goodness of the same Spirit,
we obtained this good dish, wherein we may eat
peaceably; and, by his kind providence, we were en-
abled to see your dismal situation; and farther, I
believe, that it is the same good Spirit who influenced
our hearts to have the compassionate feelings towards
your Nation. 3d. Because I believe, that if you can only once
 make out to bring the whole of your Nation here,
 you can have better chance to try to live as a people,
because this dish is much better than your old dish. 4th. Because you will have the privilege of hear-
ing the glad tidings of the Gospel preached, and your
children will be instructed to read and write. 5th. Because here we can live together as one
family, and counsel one another, and comfort
and exhort one another daily, so long as we are allowed
to live this side of eternity. From your grandchildren, Sachems,
 JOSEPH SKAUQUEATHQUANT , HENDRICK AUPAMUT . 
Counsellors of Maheconneck Nation,
 JOHN QUINNEY , JOSEPH QUINNEY . 
Delivered in full Council.
 New Stockbridge, October 9th, 1796. To the Stockbridge.—Answer. Grandchildren—Attend. I am glad that, by the goodness of the Great
Spirit, we were allowed to meet together by the side
of this fire-place, to smoke the pipe of friendship, as
our ancestors were accustomed to do. Grandchildren,
I am glad to find a token of your friendship, which
you manifested at your grandfather's arrival at this
fire-place; likewise, ever since, for which we are
extremely thankful, and ever shall be gratefully re-
membered. Grandchildren—At our arrival, you wiped away
the tears from our eyes, which were caused by the
filth and dust which blew into them in our long
journey, as also, on the account of the many tall
trees, which are fallen and lost amongst us. Like-
wise, you have cleared out my ears and throat, and
set my heart upright. Likewise, you have wiped off 
the mud from my legs and feet, and, finding them
full of briars and thorns, you reached thither your
hands, and plucked them all out, and applied the
healing oil of our deceased ancestors upon them. Grandchildren—Since your performance of this
 kindness to your grandfather, I see you clearly; I
see the tears running down on your eyes, on the
account of the many losses in your Nation, and the
many high trees that are fallen. Grandchildren—Now, in remembrance of our an-
cient covenant, I stretch forth my hands, and raise
up your head, and obliterate from your eyes and mind
all tears and sorrow, and fix your eyes forward, that
they may not be obstructed from looking forward
on the happy days which are coming, in looking back
on the trees which are fallen. Grandchildren—I also cleanse your ears, that you
may hear plainly ; and strengthen your tongues, that
you may be enabled to speak the things which are
profitable for your Nation, both temporally and spi-
ritually. Likewise, I set your heart upright, that you
may be capable of contemplating the welfare and
happiness of your old men, women, and children. Now, Grandchildren, attend. By these strings you renew the kind invitation
you gave us, when we saw each other in Philadel-
phia. I think it needless to repeat the same, but for
which we again thank you. Likewise, Grandchil-
dren, be it known unto you, that we have deeply
 considered your invitation, and finding it heartily
sincere, and your dish a lasting good one, and your
 paths so good and straight, we accept of your invi-
tation, and lay hold on it with both of our hands,
hoping that the great Good Spirit may enable and
protect us, in promoting each other's welfare and
happiness, and that we may live and die together by
 the side of your fire-place. Now, Grandchildren, I must tell you, now that I
am about turning my eyes towards my fire-place,
 hoping that, as you have begun and entered in this
good path, you may stiil continue to persevere there-
in ; and although we shall be absent some time in
body, our hearts shall still be present with you. It is evident, that many true philanthropists were
 feelingly alive to the state of the Indians. The Se-
cretary of State for the United States, at that time
the Honourable Timothy Pickering , was deeply en-
gaged for the welfare of the children of the forest.
He was a sagacious politician, of great hardihood of
 character, and was always governed more by the
dictates of his understanding than the feelings of his
heart. He, as it will be seen by the foregoing letters,
 from his own hand, did all in his power to aid and
abet the Society of Friends, in their benevolent efforts
for the Indians. Certificate. The subscriber certifies, that the following commu-
nications were written by him, in short hand, as
they were delivered, at two conferences held in the
city of Baltimore, on the 26th and 27th of 12th month,
 1801, between several Indian chiefs, residing on the
waters of the Wabash, Lake Erie, and Lake Michigan,
 and the committee for Indian affairs, appointed by
the yearly meeting of the Society of Friends, held in
Baltimore, at which were also present many others
of the Society of Friends, and people of different
 religious persuasions; and that it is acknowledged
by those who were present, that the communications
are taken down with accuracy. GERARD T. HOPKINS . I have perused the following speeches, written in
short hand by Gerard T. Hopkins , as they were
 delivered in the city of Baltimore, by the Indian 
Chiefs, the Little Turtle and the Five Medals , and
 do hereby certify that they are taken down with
 accuracy. WILLIAM WELLS ,
Interpreter and Agent for Indian Affairs. Proceedings of the First Conference. A member of the Society of Friends opened the con-
ference by addressing the chiefs as follows: BROTHERS AND FRIENDS, I am desirous that, in the early part of this op-
portunity, you may be informed that the people called
Quakers, consider all mankind as their brethren;
that they believe the Great Spirit and Father of man-
kind created all men of one blood; and that it is the
will of Him, who also created the sun, the moon, and
the stars, and causes them to give us light—that Great
Spirit and common Father of all mankind—that we
should not do one another hurt, but that we should
do one another all the good we can; and it is on
this ground and this principle, that we believe it right
to take you by the hand. After sitting a short time in silence, another Friend
addressed them as follows: BROTHERS AND FRIENDS, We, the people called Quakers, believe that it is
required of us, that we should all love one another,
however separated we may be in our local settlements
in the world, or whatever difference there may be in
our colour. And, as we are convinced it is not in
our power to perform our religious duties to Him
that hath created us, without his assistance, so we
conceive it to be our duty, when we are about to
enter upon such weighty business as, I apprehend, this is,
thus to sit down in stillness, in order to endeavour
to feel after the operation of his spirit in our hearts;
and we believe that this cannot be attained by our 
 own natural powers, but must be under the influence
of the Good Spirit. We also believe that there is an evil spirit, which
is always striving to lead us into wrong things: that
 spirit which leads us to hate and destroy one another;
and in this persuasion of mind, we believe it neces-
sary for us to sit down in stillness and quiet, to wait
upon the Great Spirit. Under these impressions, we are concerned often
to assemble ourselves together, that we may indivi-
dually come under an exercise and concern, to be
rightly directed in our religious movements; and
once in the year we assemble at certain places, in
order to have a general and full conference, to know
 how things are amongst us as a people. One of these meetings is held at Philadelphia, and
another at Baltimore. At our yearly meeting at Baltimore, several years
past, our minds were brought under a concern on
behalf of our brethren, the Indians; and remember-
ing the friendship that had subsisted between our
society and the Indians, from the first settlement of
our fathers upon this continent, and at the same time
recollecting that the country to the westward was
fast settling, apprehensions arose in our mind, that,
as the game became scarce, they would be brought
under sufferings; and, as there had been long wars
between some of the white people and the Indians,
we had not had, for a long time, an opportunity of
taking our brothers, the Indians, by the hand. Now, brothers, as we are thus led by the concerns
that arose in our council, some of us were appointed
to go out into the wilderness, and endeavour to get
amongst our brethren, the Indians, that we might
have some talk with them; and amongst those who
 were appointed, this, my brother, who sits at my
right hand, was one; and I have thought that he,
perhaps, can give a more full account, both of the
times, and of our first movements at the concern. The Friend alluded to then proceeded:— BROTHERS, About six years ago, we believe, the Good Spirit
put into our hearts, at our great council, held in this
town, to endeavour to do something for the Indians;
and, about four years ago, two others, besides myself,
went over the Great Mountains, westward, in order
to see your situation, and to know your disposition,
whether you would receive any thing from us or not. We wished to go to Sandusky, expecting to find
the greatest number of Indians at that place. We
could not get a guide till we got to the forks of Scioto,
where we agreed with one to take us to Isaac
 Zane's. At that place, we were informed that a
number of chiefs were at Detroit. We sent for some Wyandot chiefs, who resided
 about 25 miles from Isaac Zane 's, and had a confer-
ence with them. We informed them of the desire
our society had, to do something for the Indians that
 would be useful to them. From thence we went to
Upper Sandusky. Isaac Zane piloted us, and there,
 also, we had a conference with some of the Delaware
 chiefs. We wanted to know whether they would
be willing to be instructed, on their own lands, in
a way to procure a sufficiency for them to eat; to
 have a mill to grind their corn, and have their chil-
dren instructed to read and write? They informed
us, that they could not give us an answer at that time,
but would lay our proposals before their council. About three years ago, we received a speech and
a belt of wampum from a council held at Detroit;
the speech did not contain an answer to the propo-
sals made to them, but an invitation to us to attend
their council. (A short pause.) The Little Turtle , chief of the Miamis, said:— BROTHER,
 It is not usual for us to interrupt any one in
speaking, but I wish to inquire, from whom the
 speech you mention came? (The speech was then produced, and the names to
it read)—Little Turtle added— I see that our brothers, the Quakers, are not so
fully acquainted with the situation of the Indians as
we wish. After we have taken the great chief of
the white people by the hand, I hope he will give
you full information with respect to us. The Friend, who had been interrupted, then pro-
ceeded:— BROTHERS, Two years, last Spring, seven of us went over
 the Ohio, and thence to Upper Sandusky, at the time
mentioned in the speech that was sent to us—we
were invited to be there about the first of June, and,
accordingly, got there about that time, but were in-
formed, that the council was not to be held till
about two weeks after. Not being accustomed to
their mode of living, and finding a considerable num-
ber of the Indians, at that place, intoxicated with
liquor, we were much discouraged, and concluded
we might as well return home again. The Indians,
however, notwithstanding their situation, treated us
very kindly. We got together several Chiefs of the
Wyandots, and communicated to them our business.
 They informed us, they would lay it before the
Chiefs, at the council, and return us answer; but we
have not received one. The Friend, who made the second communication,
 addressed them again, as follows:— BROTHERS AND FRIENDS, We were glad when we heard, that some of our
red brethren were come to this city, and felt our
minds drawn to take them by the hand, in order that
we might have an opportunity of knowing them. As we had not been acquainted with their situa-
tions and circumstances, we have not been able to
 judge, whether any thing we had to propose to do
 for them, would be accepted?—Whether they were
 under the necessity of applying to some other mode
 for a livelihood ?—Whether the game in their coun-
try was in plenty?—We have thought, brothers, that
if it should not yet be the case, that the game is
 scarce, it probably will be the case at some time;
and, therefore, we thought it would be best for our
red brethren, to give some attention to the cultiva-
tion of the soil. This is one of the subjects which has claimed our
consideration. And, feeling in our hearts, that we
loved the Indians, and wished their welfare, it was
our concern that they might be instructed to turn
their attention to the cultivation of their lands. And,
as we believe, brothers, that we derive very great
advantages from reading books, which contain much
instruction, and wishing our brethren, the Indians,
should also derive the same advantage with us, we
have wished that they should candidly let us know,
whether they desire these things, that we might do
for them whatever is in our power to do. After a pause, the Little Turtle observed:— BROTHERS AND FRIENDS, If there is any more that you have to say, we
wish to hear it; but, if not, I will make a short
reply to what we have already heard you say. He was desired to proceed; when, rising on his
 feet, he said:— FRIENDS AND BROTHERS, My heart returns thanks to the Great Spirit
above, that has put it in our power to speak to one
another. My brother chiefs, with myself, are glad
 that our friends and brothers, the Quakers, have such
great compassion for their red brethren. Friends and Brothers—Your red brethren believe, 
that one man—one Great Man, made all the men that
 are on the earth; and that he made the sun, the
moon, and the stars, to give light, and to be useful
to them. Friends and Brothers—We now rejoice, that the
Great Spirit has made you feel, that we stand in
need of the assistance which you have been descri-
bing to us, and to wish, if possible, to render your red
brethren those services which they now are highly
in need of. Brothers and Friends—It appears to us, your red
 brethren, that you have been kept in the straight
 path, by the Great and Good Spirit. We have been 
led astray by inferior spirits; we now hope, that
we may come upon your track, and follow it. Brothers and Friends—The long and destructive
wars that have raged in the country of your red
brethren, since your fathers first came among them,
have caused their numbers to be greatly diminished.
Those that have come amongst us, have very much
cheated and imposed upon us. They have found
us simple and ignorant, and have taken very great
care to keep every thing from our knowledge, in order
to profit by our ignorance. Friends and Brothers—We find that you are now
disposed, with open arms, to receive us, and we hope
the Great Spirit will assist you, together with the
 great chief of the white people, whom we are now
about to apply to for help. Brothers and Friends—At the treaty of Grenville,
 which is now a little past six years ago, we received
some presents, by the hands of the great war chief of
 the Americans, (General Wayne ,) said to be sent to us
by our brothers, the Quakers. After this treaty, I
was invited, by the great chiefs of the Americans,
 to visit them. It is now four years since I visited
them, at Philadelphia, whilst the great council was
held at that city. I had there opportunity to see our
brothers, the Quakers, and received from their mouths
some talks: all these talks I wrapped up in my heart,
and, when I returned home to my brothers, I com-
municated to them, faithfully, all those good things
which you had told us you were desirous to do for us. Friends and Brothers—I am happy to say, that
 these, my red brothers, now present with me, are
chiefs, who, in their own country, are equally great
with myself. They were rejoiced to hear your
words, delivered to them, through me, four years ago,
and they are now equally glad with myself, to hear
from the mouths of our brothers, the Quakers, the
same good words again. Brothers and Friends—If we understand you right,
you wish to add comfort to our women and children,
 by teaching us some of your ways of living. I am
glad that the Great Spirit has put this into your
hearts, and am sorry that your exertions have not
yet been successful. Brothers and Friends—I now assure you, that you
hear the voice of the Patawattamy, Miami, Delaware,
 Shawanese, Weas, Eel River, Pisinkashaw, Kickapoo,
 and Kaskaskias tribes of Indians, and that, if you
wish to do any thing for any of these nations of
Indians, they will be ready, at all times, to receive
you—and we, also, will be ready, at all times, to ren-
der you any assistance in our power. Brothers and Friends—This is the first time that
the Great Spirit has brought us to take our brethren,
the Quakers of Baltimore, by the hand, and we re-
joice to hear them mention the same things to us,
 that have heretofore been mentioned to us, by our
 brothers, the Quakers of Philadelphia. Brothers—I, some time past, received from our
 brothers, the Quakers of Philadelphia, some tools,
 amongst which were two ploughs. I used them, and
did all I could to keep them from wearing out. I was
pleased with them: they have now become necessary
to be repaired. We have nobody amongst us that
can mend them, and they are now useless to me. Brothers and Friends—It is now five days since
we took our brothers, the Quakers of Philadelphia,
by the hand—we then talked over these things to-
gether. They have promised me, that at their next
great council, they will hold a talk about these things,
and consider what they can do for us. Brothers and Friends—If our brothers, the Quakers
of Baltimore, desire to do any thing for the Indians, I
wish to give them full information of the place where
we may be found generally together. The great
council of our tribes of Indians, is held at Fort Wayne,
at the time we receive our annuity from the United
States. At that time, any communications our brothers
wish to make to their red brethren, will be safely
handed to us by your white brother, our interpreter,
now with us, who is our agent at that place. (He
then sat down, but, after a short pause arose again.) Brothers—I must add a few words farther: I find
that I have not fully answered all the questions that
our brothers have put to us. Brothers and Friends—It is the real wish of your
brothers, the Indians, to engage in the cultivation of
our lands. And although the game is not yet so
scarce, but that we can get enough to eat, we know
it is becoming scarce, and that we must begin to
take hold of such tools as we see are in the hands of
the white people. Brothers and Friends—We are now on our way to
see the great chiefs of the Americans at their council.
We are glad to find that they remember their red
brethren, and rejoice to believe that the Great Spirit
has put it into the heart of the great chief of the
white people to do us such services as will add to the
comfort of his red children. Brothers and Friends—I will now only add, that
I rejoice to believe, that your friendship to your red
brethren is a friendship that is pure—a friendship
that comes from the heart—you want no compensa-
tion from the Indians for your services to them. You 
do not want to take away our lands from us—you
have always made use of this language to us; and
it has always been with pleasure that I have com-
municated it to our brethren. Brothers—We are a jealously disposed people—al-
most every white man that comes amongst us, endea-
vours all he can to cheat us; this has occasioned jea-
lousy among us. But your talks, brothers, are different;
we believe you, when you say you want no compensa-
tion from us, for your services to your red brethren. Five Medals , chief of the Pattawattamies, arose. FRIENDS AND BROTHERS, I rejoice to hear that you have so much compas-
sion on your red brethren. As my friend the Little
Turtle has observed, it is not the first time that we
have received tokens of friendship from you. It is some years since the treaty of Grenville,
 where we first experienced the friendship of our
brothers, the Quakers. He was there informed of
their good wishes, and of the great friendship they
had for their red brethren. He returned home, and informed us of all the great
talks he had with our brothers, the Quakers of
Philadelphia. It is truly pleasing to me, brothers, to hear the
same talks my friend had informed me of, now
 repeated, on my arrival at Baltimore, by our friends
and brothers the Quakers. I hope, brothers, that the Great Spirit, who has the
disposal of men, will assist you in your laudable
undertakings, and enable you to be of service to your
red brethren. Friends and Brothers—The talks that you have
now delivered to us, shall be carefully collected,
wrapped up, and put in our hearts—we will not
forget them. On our return home, we will have
them communicated from the head to the mouth of
the Wabash—from this to the Mississippi, and up that
river till it strikes the lakes, thence round by Michili-
mackanack, until they come back again to the same
place. What we say to you, you may he assured does not
come from one man, it comes from many—and what
you have now said to us, you speak it to but a few,
but it shall be communicated to many. Brothers and Friends—I observed to our friends the
Quakers of Philadelphia, five days ago, what I now
say to you: That we wish our brothers, the Quakers,
to render us those services which they have proposed.
We promise that nothing shall be wanting on our
part, to give aid to so desirable a thing in our country. Our situation, at present, will not admit of carrying
such a plan so fully into execution as might be
desired by our brothers; but that, I hope, will not
prevent you from making trial. If we had such
 tools as you make use of, and which add so much to
your comfort—for we have been lost in wonder at
what we have seen amongst you—if we had these
instruments, we should, I hope, be willing to use
them; and in the course of a little time, there would
be people amongst us, that would know well how
to use them, through the assistance they might
obtain from you, and the rest of our white friends. Brothers and Friends—Whatever goods you may
have in store for your red brothers, we cannot but
wish that you will show them to us as soon as pos-
sible. That we can yet live upon the game of our country
is true; but we know that this will not be the case
long. Brothers, from the great things, and the aston-
ishing wonders which we have seen among you, and
finding they all come out of the earth, it makes me
anxious to try if I cannot get some for myself. I
 hope, brothers, that by the aid of the Great Spirit,
and of our friends and brothers, the Quakers, together
with the government of the United States, that we
shall yet be enabled to get these good things for our-
selves—such as will make us, our women, and our
children happy. Brothers—We do not know what our brothers, the
Quakers of Philadelphia, may have in contemplation
to do for their red brethren, but we hope it will be
something that will add to our comfort; we hope
it will be something by which we shall profit; some-
thing by which we shall be enabled to cultivate our
lands, and live by the fruits of the earth. We have
been walking in a thorny path; we want to get into
your track and follow it; and the sooner this is
put into our power, I am convinced the better it will
be for our red brethren. Brothers and Friends—I have not much to say
further; what has now been said to you is the voice
of the Pattawattamy, Miami, Delaware, Shawanese,
Weas, Eel-River, Pisinkashaw, Kickapoo, and Kaskas-
kias tribes of Indians. I rejoice, brothers, that we
now know each other, and hope if you have any
thing to communicate to your red brethren, that it
will come to us through your good brother, William
Wells, our interpreter, who resides in our country.
We can place great confidence in him. He is the only
white man in our country we will trust; we shall
then get it, and do now assure you, that it shall be
faithfully sent to all these people, in the manner you
wish it to be. Brothers and Friends—I hope the Great Spirit will
 assist you in your undertakings to do your red
brethren good. Your movements towards the Wyan-
dots, have not met with that success which they
deserved. It makes me sorry to find an answer from
them of the kind you have mentioned. There is a
great deal, brothers, in having a good interpreter,
and beginning at the right end of the business. (The end of the first Conference.) Second Conference. One of the Society of Friends opened the conference
 as follows:— BROTHERS AND FRIENDS, When the talks, which we had last evening at
 this place, ended, I believe it was generally under-
stood, that the subject matter which had been
spoken upon, was satisfactory; but, on considering fur-
ther, some of us thought that there were some things
of considerable importance, which had not been
spoken upon—and thought that it would be right
to have another opportunity. We are, accordingly, again assembled—and, see-
ing that it has been the will of the Great Spirit, and
Father of us all, to permit us thus to come together
again, it is my desire that any thing we may feel
in our hearts, that may be likely to have a tendency
to promote the good of our red brethren, may be freely
spoken. Another Friend next addressed them, as follows:— I may tell you, I have been made glad, that I have
an opportunity of sitting once more with you; and
as I have found, that the more I am with you, the
more the love I have felt for you has increased, and
the stronger has been my desire for your welfare,
and that this love has taken away all fear of giving
offence; I feel myself authorized, I think, as a bro
ther, to use freedom of speech with you, and in the
 freedom which I feel, under the influence of that
love which, I trust, has been impressed upon my
heart by the Great and Good Spirit, who, as he has
made us all of one blood, so he requires of us, that
we should love one another. I may tell you, brothers,
that, when I was in the Indian country, I had fre-
quent opportunities of observing the pernicious con-
sequences of the use of spirituous liquors, with which 
the Indians were furnished by the traders; and as I
 have reason to believe, that you who are now present
are wise men, who have eyes in your heads, and are
able to see things as they really are, I have felt a
desire in my heart to know your opinions, and what
is your judgment concerning this thing—the using
spirituous liquors to excess; believing, brothers, that
if you have seen things in the same light in which I
have seen them, that you would be desirous that a
stop might be put to the evils, that arise from the use
of so destructive a liquor. I may tell you, brothers,
who are now present, as well as the Indians in
 general, that I have believed that there is not any
thing that stands more in your way to improvement
than this, the too frequent use of spirituous liquors:
and I have thought, that if you are of the same mind
 with us, who are your friends, and have your good
at heart, that it would be right for us to take the
subject into our serious consideration, to endeavour
to discover, whether there may not be some step
taken, that would put a check upon this pernicious
thing. Now, brothers, as a hint of this sort was omitted
when we were together last evening, some of us did
not find our minds easy: we thought it ought to
 have come under consideration, hoping that you, who,
as I have already said, have eyes in your heads, and
can see for yourselves, have had this subject under
your consideration. We now hope, brothers, that
you will express yourselves freely to us on this sub-
ject, and let us know how it has happened to you.
After which, perhaps, it will open a way for some
 further observations from us. After a short pause, the Little Turtle , on his seat,
 said, I will now make some reply, if none of my
brothers have one to offer. He was desired to proceed—when, rising on his
feet, he said, MY BROTHERS AND FRIENDS, I am happy to find, that it has pleased the Great
Spirit, that we should again, this evening, meet in
the same house, in which we held our council yester-
day. I am happy to find, that it is the will of the
Great and Good Spirit, that we should discover, there
was something yesterday not mentioned, that was
highly necessary for the welfare of your brethren. Friends and Brothers—I am glad to find that it has
pleased the Great Spirit, to put a wish in your hearts,
to know our opinions on the subject you have men-
tioned ; a subject of the greatest moment to us.
What you have said, relative to our being one flesh,
and one blood, is true. Your brothers, the Indians,
believe, that it is in this light the Great Spirit con-
siders all mankind. Brothers and Friends—My brother chiefs, that are
now present, with myself, are happy to find, that you
have a good opinion of us. You say, that you ap-
prehend we have eyes in our heads, and can clearly
see for ourselves, those things that are injurious to us.
This, my friends and brothers, is the case; we clearly
see these things: my brother chiefs, that are now
 present with me, as well as myself, have long seen
them; we have long lamented these great evils that
have raged in our country, and that have done your
red brethren so much harm; we have applied for
redress, and endeavoured to have them removed from
amongst us. When our forefathers met first on this Island, your
red brethren then were numerous; but since the
introduction amongst us of what you call spirituous
liquors, and what, we think, may be justly called
poison, our numbers are greatly diminished: it has
destroyed a great part of our red brethren. My Brothers and Friends—I am glad to hear you
observe, that freedom of speech ought always to be
made use of amongst brothers; this, brothers, really
ought to be the case. I will now, therefore, take
the liberty to mention, that most of the existing
evils amongst your red brethren, have been caught
from the white people; not only that liquor that
destroys us daily, but many diseases that our fore-
fathers were ignorant of, before they saw you. My Brothers and Friends—I am glad, with my
brother chiefs, that are now present, to find that you
are ready to assist us in every thing that will add to
our good: we hope that the Great Spirit will aid you
in all your good undertakings, with respect to us.
We plainly perceive, brothers, that you see that very
evil that destroys your red brethren. It is not an
 evil, brothers, of our own making; we have not
placed it amongst ourselves; it is an evil placed
amongst us by the white people; we look up to them
to remove it out of our country: if they have that
friendship for us, which they tell us they have, they
certainly will not let it continue amongst us any
longer. Our repeated entreaties to those who bring
this evil amongst us, we find, has not the desired
effect. We tell them—Brothers, fetch us useful things;
bring goods that will clothe us, our women, and our
children, and not this evil liquor, that destroys our
 reason—that destroys our health—that destroys our
lives: but all we can say on the subject is of no ser-
vice, nor gives relief to your red brethren. My Brothers and Friends—I am glad that you
have seen into this business as we do—I rejoice to
find that you agree in opinion with us, and express
an anxiety to be, if possible, of service to us, to remove
this great evil out of our country—an evil that has
had so much room in it—that has destroyed so many
of our lives, that it causes our young men to say, we
had better be at war with the white people: this
liquor that they introduce into our country is more
to be feared than the gun and the tomahawk; there
are more of us dead since the treaty of Grenville,
than we lost by the six years war before; it is all
owing to the introduction of this liquor amongst us.
 Brothers, how to remove this evil from our country
we do not know; if we had known it to be a proper
subject to have mentioned to you in our council
yesterday, we should surely have done it. This
 subject, brothers, composes a part of what we intend
to make known to the great council of our white
brethren. On our arrival there we shall endeavour
to explain to our great father, the President; a great
many evils that have arisen in our country, from the
introduction of this liquor by the white traders. Brothers and Friends—In addition to what I have
before observed of this great evil in the country of
your red brethren, I will say further, that it has
made us poor. It is this liquor that causes our young
men to go without clothes, our women and children
to go without any thing to eat; and sorry am I to
mention now to you, brothers, that the evil is increas-
ing every day, as the white settlers come nearer to
us, and bring those kettles they boil that stuff in
they call whiskey, of which our young men are so
extremely fond. Brothers, when our young men
have been out hunting, and are returning home load-
ed with skins and furs, on their way, if it happens
that they come along where some of this whiskey
is deposited, the white man who sells it, tells them
to take a little drink; some of them will say no, I
 don't want it—they go on till they come to another
house, where they find more of this same kind of
drink; it is there again offered; they refuse; and again
the third time; but finally the fourth or fifth time
 one accepts of it, and takes a drink, and getting
one he wants another, and then a third and a fourth,
till his senses have left him. After his reason comes
back again to him, when he gets up and finds where
he is, he asks for his peltry: the answer is, you have
drank them. Where is my gun? It is gone. Where
is my blanket? It is gone. Where is my shirt? You
 have sold it for whiskey!! Now, brothers, figure to
yourselves what a condition this man must be in; he 
has a family at home, a wife and children that stand
in need of the profits of his hunting: what must
their wants be, when he himself is even without a
 shirt? This, brothers, I can assure you, is a fact that
often happens among us. As I have before observed,
we have no means to prevent it. If you, brothers,
have it in your power to render us any assistance,
we hope the Great Spirit will aid you. We shall lay
these evils before our great and good father; we hope
he will remove them from amongst us; we shall
assure him that if he does not, there will not be
many of his red children living long in our country.
The Great Spirit, brothers, has made you see as we
see; we hope, brothers, and expect, that if you have
 any influence with the great council of the United
States, that you will make use of it in behalf of your
red brethren. My Brothers and Friends—The talks that you
delivered to us when we were in council yesterday,
were certainly highly pleasing to myself, as well as
to my brother chiefs; we rejoiced to hear you speak
such words to us; but we all plainly saw, that there
was a great difficulty in the way, that ought to be
removed, before your good intentions towards us,
could be carried into effect: we agree with you,
brothers, that this great evil amongst us, spirituous
liquors, must first be removed; after this is done, we
hope you will find an easy access to us, much easier
than you can have at present. My Brothers and Friends—I hope that if we all
try to prevent the introduction of spirituous liquors
in the country of your red brethren, that the Great
Spirit will aid us in it, and that we shall meet with
no difficulty in doing it; after this is done, we hope
that the great services you have designed to do for
us, the great things mentioned by you in our
council yesterday, may take place, and have that
 success you so much desire. My Brothers and Friends—You have asked us our
opinion, on the subject of the introduction of
spirituous liquors into our country. I have now
given it to you. If I have given it to you in such
a manner that you do not understand me, I would
wish you to say so; all that I have said to you, I
wish to be made known to every body. We have our enemies in our own country, as all
other persons have in theirs; it is no unusual thing,
 brothers, to hear some people among us, (you will
perceive, brothers, that these are people that are
interested in keeping us ignorant,) when they hear
talks that have been delivered by our chiefs, to
people that are capable of rendering us services, they
say to our people, do you not hear? your chiefs
have sold you—your chiefs have sold your lands.
They put bad stories in the mouths of our young
men. For this reason, brothers, all that I have said I
wish to be made public; I wish every body to know
it. I only mention this to you, brothers. If it is
improper, I have no objection to your keeping it
amongst yourselves; but if it could be made public, I
would wish it—I have nothing further to say. (Sits
down.) Five Medals then arose on his feet. MY BROTHERS AND FRIENDS, I have nothing to say on the subject we have
now been talking over. My friend, the Little Turtle ,
has given you a full answer to those things you have
mentioned to us; we are but one people, and have
but one voice. Brothers and Friends—We have never had it in our
power to hold such talks with you at this place
 before. We have frequently had talks of this kind
with our brothers, the Quakers of Philadelphia; they
always appeared very glad to see us, and we find
you the same. We hope, brothers, that your friend-
ship and ours will never be broken. The Friend who delivered the second commu-
nication, then again addressed them as follows: FRIENDS AND BROTHERS, What you have communicated to us at this time
has been clearly understood, and we are glad to find
that you see things in the same light that we see
them. The several matters you have mentioned, and
the difficulties you have stated, claim our sympathy
and solid consideration, and we shall, I trust, take
the subject up, and if a way should open for us to
move forward, in aiding you in your application to
 the general government, we shall be willing, either
on this occasion, or any other, to render every service
in our power. To the Congress of the United States. The members of the committee appointed for
Indian affairs, by the yearly meeting of Friends held
in Baltimore, RESPECTFULLY REPRESENT— That a concern to introduce among some of the
Indian tribes northwest of the river Ohio, the most
simple and useful arts of civil life, being several years
since laid before our yearly meeting, a committee
was appointed by that body to visit them, to exa-
mine their situation, and endeavour to ascertain in
what manner so desirable a purpose could be effected.
A part of that committee, after having obtained the
approbation of the President of the United States,
proceeded to perform the service assigned them- and
the result of their inquiries and observations, as
 reported to the yearly meeting, was, that the quantity
of spirituous liquors, with which those people are
supplied by traders and frontier settlers, must coun-
teract the effect of every measure, however wise or
 salutary, which can be devised to improve their
situation. The truth of this is abundantly confirmed, by a 
speech recently made before us by the Miami chief,
 the Little Turtle , which we herewith offer to your
consideration, and believe the evil to be of such mag-
nitude, that unless it can be altogether removed or
 greatly restrained, no rational hope of success in the
proposed undertaking can be entertained; we are
induced to solicit the attention of the national legis-
lature to this interesting and important subject, a
subject which we believe involves not only their
future welfare, but their very existence as a people. Signed in behalf of the committee by, EVAN THOMAS , JOHN MCKIM . ELIAS ELLICOTT . JOEL WRIGHT . JOHN BROWN . GEORGE ELLICOTT . DAVID BROWN . Baltimore, lst month, 1st, 1802. The following address shows, that the female
Friends took a deep interest in the cause of the In-
dians, and that their efforts were duly appreciated
by the women of the Stockbridge tribe. In religion,
in civilization, and all the useful arts of life, women
have been pioneers, but often their efforts have been
passed over in silence by the historian. To Hannah Eddy , Martha Titus , Elizabeth Seaman ,
and our other Sisters, of the people called Quakers, of
the state of New-York, and elsewhere. DEAR SISTERS, We take this opportunity to inform you, that we
have been happy to see our worthy friends, Thomas
Eddy, Thomas Titus , and Gideon Seaman , who have
given us good counsel, which do much good on our
minds. We thankfully accept of their good words,
for we believe they are the children of light, and the
words they spoke flow from love. Sisters—We will also inform you, that we, and a
number of our Sisters of this nation, have, this seve-
ral years past, been endeavouring to follow the good
path which leads to everlasting happiness—and that
we experience, in degree, the love of Jesus Christ, who
died for such sinners as we are. Sisters—We find that these friends, who gave us
many good counsels, are true men—so we believe, that
you are, also, our true Sisters in the Lord. There-
fore, we think, you Would be willing to hear from us,
 who, though we are poor people, (commonly called by
 many white people, Squaws,) we are rejoiced to find
that the 1 riends have such love, which makes no
distinction. Sisters—We have religious meetings twice in
every week, to seek after the ways of the Good Spirit,
and have, at times, been comforted by him, who
searcheth all the hearts. Although we never have seen any of you, yet let
us join hand in hand to serve the Lord Almighty,
who is able to put such weapons on our minds, to
 withstand all the temptations of the evil one, and
that we may be able to hold out to the end, where
we shall join, to praise our Saviour to all eternity.
 Farewell. New-Stockbridge, 6 mo. 24th, 1797.
Signed by
 ELIZABETH JOSY , LYDIA HENDRICK , CATHERINE X NAUKOWWISQUOK , CATHERINE QUINNEY , CATHERINE KAWHAWSQUOK , CATHERINE QUAUQUACHMUT , JENNY ANDREW , ESTHER LITTLEMAN , MARY TAUKONNOMEEN , MARY HOLMES , MARGARET QUINNEY , HANNAH SEEPNOMMOW . 
 Directed to HANNAH EDDY . Mr. Eddy made the subject of imprisonment for
 debt, one of deep reflection. He did not believe that
 a man could, by any contract, pledge his liberty par-
tially; and it is conceded on all sides, that no man
can make himself a slave, liberty being an unalien-
able right. He saw that the gaols were crowded
 with poor debtors, sent to those awful places for
small sums, in general, where their health and morals
were injured, and their spirits broken down. The
 philanthropist alone, whose feelings are enlisted in
the spirit of reform, can come to any just calculation
of the number who, in former times, suffered as poor
debtors. He knew that more than ten thousand
were incarcerated in his own State, every year, for
sums that would not average fifteen dollars each;
and he had sufficient information from many other
States, to discover, that the evil existed among them
generally to as great an extent, according to their
 population. He frequently visited the gaol in the
city of New York, and assisted the prisoners from
his own purse, and from monies belonging to associ-
ations among the Friends. He did not live to see
imprisonment for debt abolished in the State of New
York; but he foresaw that the time would come,
 when that blot on the fame of our country would be
wiped away, not only in this State, but in others.
He preserved in his diary, a letter, which he believed
to have been written by the celebrated Indian, Brandt ,
who was educated at Dartmouth College. It is so
full of just remarks, and is, in itself, so great a
curiosity, that I thought it worthy of being pre-
served. MY DEAR SIR, Your letter came safe to hand. To give you
entire satisfaction, I must, I perceive, enter into the
 discussion of a subject, on which I have often thought.
My thoughts were my own, and, being so different
from the ideas entertained among your people, I
should certainly have carried them with me to the
grave, had I not received your obliging favour. You ask me, then, whether, in my opinion, civili-
zation is favourable to human happiness? In answer
to the question, it may be answered, that there are
degrees of civilization, from cannibals to the most
 polite of European nations. The question is not,
then, whether a degree of refinement is not condu-
cive to happiness, but whether you, or the natives of
this land, have obtained this happy medium. On
this subject we are, at present, I presume, of very
different opinions. You will, however, allow me, in
some respects, to have had the advantage of you in
forming my sentiments. I was, Sir, born of Indian
parents, and lived, while a child, among those whom
you are pleased to call savages. I was afterwards
sent to live among the white people, and educated at
one of your schools; since which period, I have been
honoured much beyond my deserts, by an acquaint-
ance with a number of principal characters, both in
Europe and America. After all this experience, and
 after every exertion to divest myself of prejudice, I
 am obliged to give my opinion in favour of my own
people. I will now, as much as I am able, collect
together, and set before you, some of the reasons that
have influenced my judgment on the subject now
before us. In the government you call civilized, the
happiness of the people is constantly sacrificed to the
splendour of empire. Hence your codes of criminal
and civil laws have had their origin; from hence
your dungeons and prisons. I will not enlarge on an
idea, so singular in civilized life, and, perhaps, dis-
agreeable to you; I will only observe, that among
us we have no prisons. We have no pompous parade
 of courts; we have no written laws, and yet judges
 are as highly revered among us as they are among 
you, and their decisions as much regarded. Property,
 to say the least, is as well guarded, and crimes are
as impartially punished. We have among us, no
splendid villains above the control of our laws.
 Daring wickedness is here never suffered to triumph
 over helpless innocence; the estates of widows and
orphans are never devoured by enterprising sharpers.
In a word, we have no robbery under the colour of
law. No person among us desires any other reward
for performing a brave and worthy action, but the
consciousness of having served his Nation. Our wise
men are called Fathers—they truly sustain that cha-
racter ; they are always accessible, I will not say to
the meanest of our people, for we have none mean,
but such as render themselves so by their vices. The palaces and prisons among you form a most
dreadful contrast. Go to the former places, and you
will see, perhaps, a deformed piece of earth, assuming
airs that become none but the Great Spirit above;
 go to one of your prisons;—here description utterly
 fails. Kill them, if you please—kill them, too, by
 torture; but let the torture last no longer than a day.
 Those you call savages, relent; the most furious of
our tormentors exhausts his rage in a few hours, and
despatches the unhappy victim with a sudden stroke.
 Perhaps, it is eligible that incorrigible offenders should
sometimes be cut off—Let it be done in a way that
is not degrading to human nature; let such unhap-
py men have an opportunity, by the fortitude of their
 death, of making an atonement, in some measure,
 for the crimes they have committed during their lives. But, for what are many of your prisoners con-
fined?—For debt.—Astonishing! And will you ever
again call the Indian nation cruel? Liberty, to a ra-
tional creature, as much exceeds property, as the light
 of the sun does that of the most twinkling star.
 But you put them on a level, to the everlasting dis-
grace of civilization! I knew, while I lived among
the white people, many of the most amiable contract
debts, and, I dare say, with the best intentions. Both
parties, at the time of the contract, expect to find
their advantage. The debtor, we will suppose, by a 
train of unavoidable misfortunes, fails; here is no
crime, nor even a fault; and yet, your laws put it in
the power of the creditor to throw the debtor into
prison, and confine him there for life!—a punishment
 infinitely worse than death to a brave man; and, I
seriously declare, I had rather die by the most severe
tortures ever inflicted on this continent, than languish
in one of your prisons for a single year. Great Spirit
of the universe! And do you call yourselves Christ-
ians ? does, then, the religion of Him whom you call
your Saviour, inspire this spirit, and lead to these
practices?—Surely, no. It is recorded of Him, that a
 bruised reed he never broke. Cease, then, to call
yourselves Christians, lest you publish to the world
your hypocrisy. Cease, too, to call other nations
savage, when you are tenfold more the children of
cruelty than they. Mr. Eddy did not confine himself to labours of bene-
volence alone, but entered deeply into every plan
suggested by others, or conceived by himself, that
could add to the prosperity of his country. Inland
 navigation had early engaged his attention; but
there must have been many minds at work in
planning and carrying into effect the grand canal of
the state of New-York. The claims of each indivi-
dual were urged with pertinacity by their friends.
 De Witt Clinton , the most prominent person in the
 great work, lias established a rule for the just distri-
bution of the honours flowing from this important
undertaking, which ought to be regarded. He says,
For the good which has been done by individuals, or
communities, in relation to the work, let each have a
due share of credit. The difficulty of giving each
this share, has been met by Doctor Hosack , in his
excellent memoir of De Witt Clinton ; and as I have
never heard this distribution of honours doubted for
its fairness, I have ventured to extract it, as no
one had better means than this distinguished writer 
for forming a correct opinion. He says, In noticing
this great event, this era in the life of Mr. Clinton ,
and which will ever be identified with his fame,
 posterity will demand a minute detail of the com-
mencement, the progress, and the completion of an
undertaking that ranks among the most important
that has been effected in any age, or in any country.
Posterity will look back to the authors of the bless-
ings, and the benefits, which this great event has
secured to this state and nation. The question, then, here naturally presents itself,
Who first projected the system of inland navigation
 from the Lakes to the Hudson, and the Atlantic
 Ocean? and who were the instruments of its accom-
plishment? In replying to these important inquiries,
I am fully aware of the delicacy of the task before me. The claimants to this honour are numerous and
respectable, and the claims of each to a certain ex-
tent founded in justice. While the minute details
upon this subject are passed over as out of place on
 the present occasion, I trust it will not be uninte-
resting to this intelligent assembly, to advert to a
brief sketch of the most interesting facts which this
examination has enabled me to develop, some of
which, it will be found, have hitherto been totally
overlooked in the public communications that have
appeared upon this subject. In viewing the origin
and progress of this great achievement, our attention
is drawn to its numerous friends, who have, in va-
rious capacities, contributed to its accomplishment.
But, in order that each of the numerous benefactors
to this work may have his due share of praise, pro-
portioned to the services he has rendered, it is pro-
posed to divide them into various classes, designating
the nature, character, and extent of those services.
I am fully sensible that fame has given to some a
 degree of reputation to which they are not entitled,
to the extent in which it is bestowed; while to others
much is due for the assistance they have rendered
in the accomplishment of this important work, and
whose contributions are comparatively little known
to the world, or have been but imperfectly acknow-
ledged. So far, therefore, as laborious inquiry has
enabled me to ascertain the facts now to be related,
distributive justice, the suum cuique tribuito, shall
 be most strictly and impartially observed.
 Amicus Plato—amicus Socrates—sed magis amica veritas. The contributors to canal navigation in the state
of New-York, may be considered as consisting of
four great classes: in the first, may be enumerated,
those foreseeing and predicting from the general
face of the country, the union of the lakes, the creeks
and rivers of the west, by measures calculated to
remove obstructions, improve the natural navigation
then existing, and ultimately, by different outlets, to
connect the same with the ocean. In this class, the
names of Cadwallader Colden , Sir Henry Moore ,
George Washington , George Clinton , and Gouver-
neur Morris, are prominent. In the second class, are
to be noticed, those who proposed, by artificial navi-
gation or canals, to form a connexion between the
waters of the Hudson and Lake Ontario, Lake Erie,
or both. Christopher Colles , Jeffrey Smith , Elkanah
Watson, Philip Schuyler , Jesse Hawley , and Joshua
Foreman, deserve the most honourable mention in this
place. Thirdly, those who, in the year 1810, have
been chiefly instrumental in effecting a direct inter-
nal communication between Lake Erie and the
Atlantic. In this class, Thomas Eddy , Jonas Platt ,
and De Witt Clinton , stand conspicuous. Fourthly,
another class of benefactors to this great work, is
composed of numerous members of both Houses of
the Legislature, who took a prominent station in
 devising and sustaining the measures necessary to
carry the same into effect; the various canal com-
missioners, engineers, surveyors, and many private
but public spirited citizens, in various parts of the 
state, who have zealously given their personal atten-
tions and services to this herculean undertaking, and
to whom too much praise cannot be ascribed: so
great is the number composing this class, that I am
compelled, at this time, to forbear from their enume-
ration. The commissioners of the canal fund, as
distinguished from that of Canal Commissioners, and
composed of the Lieutenant Governor, the Comptrol-
ler, the Attorney General, the Surveyor General, the
 Secretary and Treasurer, to whose special care are
committed the regulations of the tolls, and other cir-
cumstances relating to the government of the canal,
are entitled to high approbation, for their intelligent
and faithful discharge of the duties assigned them.
To all these different classes of coadjutors, may be
ascribed a high and enviable measure of applause. The sagacity of some, in early perceiving the prac-
ticability, and utility, of the inland communication;
the diligence and zeal of others, in unremitted exer-
tions to accomplish it; and the devotion and sacri-
fices of all to its completion, will be remembered by
their successors with everlasting gratitude. We, fortunately, have been able to get Mr. Eddy 's
 own account of his share in the great work of the
 Erie Canal. I was one (says he) of the first Directors of the
Western Inland Lock Navigation Company, and con-
tinued as a Director, and Treasurer, until the com-
pany disposed of their property to the state, in 1820.
I applied myself, with much zeal, in forwarding the
views of the company, and in improving the inter-
nal navigation of the state. Our funds were not
sufficient to extend any improvement, further than
a few miles west of Rome. The company had in
 their service, William Weston , an eminent engineer,
from England, and in company with him, and Gene-
ral Schuyler, the President, I made several journies
to the westward, in order to explore and examine
the country, as far as Seneca Lake, in order to ascer-
tain the practicability of making improvements in
the navigation, as far as that place. Being well
satisfied, from my own observation, of the practica-
bility of making extensive improvements, by means of
canals, &c., through the western parts of the state, and
considering the incalculable advantages that would
result from the completion of such a magnificent
work, my mind was devoted to its accomplishment.
As I was active in the prosecution of the improve-
ments made by the Western Inland Lock Navigation
Company, the geography and topography of the
western parts of this state were very familiar to
my mind, and having been very intimate with Mr.
Weston , when he was in this country, employed by
the company as Canal Engineer, and having accom-
panied him in exploring the country, from Rome to
Cayuga Lake, in 1796, and being repeatedly with
him, whilst he was employed on the canals on the
Mohawk river, my knowledge of the whole face of
the country fixed in my mind an ardent desire to
 extend a complete canal navigation, from Rome to
Seneca river. Occasionally, for many years, I urged
the Western Canal Company to extend their im-
provements further west. A vast sum of money had
been expended by them in improving the navigation
of the Mohawk, which, for many years, absorbed
the tolls, and prevented a dividend being made
among the stockholders. Under these circumstances,
no importunities of mine could prevail on the com-
pany to make advances for further improvements.
In March, 1810, I was at Albany, and it occurred to
me, that probably the Legislature might be induced
 to appoint commissioners, to examine and explore
the western parts of the state, for the purpose of
ascertaining the practicability of extending canal
navigation, and to estimate the expense, and report
 thereon. 1 was pertectly convinced, that if commis-
sioners should be appointed, they would make a
very favourable report. My friend, Jonas Platt , (now 
one of the Judges of the Supreme Court) was then a
member of the Senate, and on the evening of the 12th
of March, I called upon him, and suggested to him a
plan, on which I had never consulted any person, of
proposing to the Legislature, to appoint Commission-
ers, as before mentioned; and I proposed to him, that
he should use his endeavours in the Senate, to far-
ther the plan. He replied, he very highly approved
of my proposition, and asked why not make it the
duty of these commissioners to explore the country,
as far as Lake Erie, with the view to ascertain the
practicability of making a complete canal, from
thence to the Hudson? We immediately drafted a
joint resolution, to be offered to both branches of the
Legislature, which it was agreed he should present
to the Senate next morning. We also thought it
would be proper for us, then to fix on suitable names
to offer to the Senate, as Commissioners, and we
agreed in the necessity of selecting persons equally
from the two great political parties, which then divi-
ded the state. This we did, according to the best
judgment we could form, and the following gentle-
men were named, viz., Gouverneur Morris , De Witt
Clinton, Stephen Van Rensselaer , Simeon De Witt ,
William North , Thomas Eddy , and Peter B. Porter .
 It was concluded that I should meet Judge Platt , at
the Senate Chamber, next morning, when I accord-
ingly attended, and we called out De Witt Clinton ,
 and showed him the resolution. He expressed his
hearty concurrence with our plan, and as soon as
the Senate was formed, Judge Platt presented the
resolution, which we had prepared the previous even-
ing. It was seconded by Clinton , and passed with-
out a dissenting voice. It passed the house in the
same manner, within an hour after. In the summer
 of 1810, I accompanied the other Commissioners, in
exploring the country, as far as Lake Erie. In 1811,
we made our first report to the Legislature. Several
 laws were enacted, favourable to the prosecution of 
the project, notwithstanding which, the measure
met with a serious and warm opposition. The war
with England seemed to put a stop to all farther
proceedings, and many persons entertained serious
doubts of the practicability of the undertaking, and
if practicable, that the resources of the state were
incompetent to secure its completion. Besides these
difficulties, the measure was opposed, with great
warmth, on party grounds. Thus circumstanced,
after the war, the friends of the project appeared to
be entirely discouraged, and to have given up all
 hopes of the Legislature being induced again to take
up the subject, or adopt any measure to prosecute the
scheme. However, I could not thus resign a favourite
project; and, it appeared to me, that one more effort
 should be made; and Judge Platt , being then (Au-
tumn of 1815) in the city, holding court, I wrote a
note, inviting him to breakfast with me the next
morning. He came, and I proposed to him, that if it
met his approbation, I would undertake to get up
a public meeting, to be held at the City Hotel, in
order to urge the propriety, and policy, of offering a
memorial to the Legislature, pressing them to prose-
cute the canal from Erie to the Hudson. Judge Platt ,
 readily agreed to my proposition, and consented to
open the business to the meeting, if one could be
obtained. I then called on De Witt Clinton , who
united with me in adopting measures to procure a 
public meeting. Accordingly, a large and respecta-
ble meeting was held at the City Hotel. William
Bayard was chairman. Judge Platt made an intro-
ductory speech, and was followed by De Witt Clinton ,
John Swartout , and others. Cadwallader D. Colden ,
 De Witt Clinton , John Swartout , and myself, were
appointed a committee, to draft a memorial to the
Legislature. This memorial was drawn up by De
Witt Clinton, and from the masterly manner in
which it was written, it was evident he had a com-
plete knowledge of the subject, and evinced the un-
common talents of the author. It was signed by
many thousands in the city, and throughout the
state. With the Legislature, it had the desired effect,
and was the means of establishing the canal policy
on a firm basis, and producing the law of 15th of
April, 1817, directing the work to be commenced,
which was accordingly done on the 4th of July
 following. From the period of presenting the first report of
the commissioners to the legislature, in 1812, to the
passing of the act of 1817, (excepting two years of
the war with England) I attended the several ses-
sions of the Legislature, for the purpose of interesting
the members in the great project of the proposed
canal, from Lake Erie to the Hudson River. De Witt
Clinton, and myself, were uniformly engaged in
using every means in our power, by distributing
 pamphlets, and endeavouring to explain to the mem-
bers, the great value and importance of such a canal,
and showing them the great advantages the state
would derive, as to its agricultural and commercial
 improvements, and the increase of revenue, from tolls.
We were encouraged to pursue further exertions, by
procuring an act, in 1813, which authorized the com-
missioners to obtain a loan of five millions of dollars,
to enable the state to prosecute the grand under-
taking. This act was afterwards repealed, and
nothing further was done during the war, and from
the period of the termination, until the meeting held
at the City Hotel, in the latter part of the year 1815.
The friends of the plan were much discouraged, in
consequence of the violent opposition it met with
from men not capable of forming a correct judgment
as to the practicability of the work. From the year 1810, I devoted most of my time, in
endeavouring, in connexion with De Witt Clinton ,
and Robert Fulton , to enlighten the public mind,
respecting it, by publishing pamphlets, essays in
newspapers, &c. &c. Ever watching the progress of philanthropy, Mr.
Eddy early saw the great utility of Savings Banks.
This excellent institution had its origin as late as
1803. From this period, the benevolent were deeply
 engaged in establishing savings banks in every city,
town, or village, where they were required. The first
savings bank that was put into operation in this
 country was established at Philadelphia, but almost
simultaneously another at Boston. Mr. Eddy had, for
some time, made great exertions to get one up in the
city of New York, but he met with many difficulties
in the attempt. The objections raised were, one after
another, combatted with success, and at length, in
1819, Mr. Eddy , with his friends, John Murray , jun.
and Jeremiah Thompson , effected this purpose. This
bank has been in full operation ever since. Mr. Eddy 
was a Director from its commencement until his
death, and for some time Vice President of it. There
are now more than fifty of these savings banks in
the United States, which have been of an incalcula-
ble benefit to the poor. A bank not only saves their
money, which might have been foolishly expended,
but it gives a poor person no small degree of respec-
tability among all classes of people, when he is pro-
vident enough to put his spare earnings into such an
institution. Mr. Eddy was an active and zealous member of
the New York Bible Society, and amongst the first to
lend his aid to its establishment as early as 1806, and
continued his connexion with it until the time of his
death. This Society was founded only two years
after the parent society in London. The origin of
the Society is a singular fact in history. It is said,
that a Welsh divine, good as he of the same country
 described by Swift, whose cassock was out at elbows,
travelled to London, and stated to some of the reli-
gious societies the want of bibles in his flock, and the
great scarcity of them throughout all Wales. This
statement set the pious to making inquiries, and a 
great want of them was discovered in the army and
navy, and in fact almost every where. In a short
time a society was formed, whose growth has no
parallel in the history of nations. In less than thirty
years, the branches of this noble society have caused
the Scriptures to be translated and printed in more
than a hundred different languages, and spread it
over the charitable globe. This book is now familiar
to the Esquimaux of our northern regions, is spread
 throughout Asia, and is known in Africa. From five
thousand Bible Societies that can be enumerated,
issued every year almost an incredible number of
volumes, and therefore no one will perish for lack of
vision. These bibles have not only spread the chris-
tian religion, but have been the means of introducing
letters where they have been unknown before. The
first talents of Europe have been engaged in transla-
ting them into various languages, previously but little
 known, even to the learned. With a sagacity that seems to foresee the results of
the experience of many years, Mr. Eddy was for
having the bible go out without note or commentary,
that good sense and faith might have their full influ-
ence. This is now, after all the experience had on
the subject, thought to be the best course to pursue. The success of these societies have had salutary
influence among those who have been engaged in
the cause. Many young men have read the Bible
with care and attention, who never would have done
it, if the societies of which they were members had
not had before them subjects of discussion, requiring
something more than a cursory knowledge of the
Scriptures. Youth is ambitious, and will not be
ignorant of that which it is praiseworthy to obtain,
if rightly set before them. Another beneficial effect
of the Bible, and other societies, of a charitable and
religious kind, is, that they draw young men from
gay habits, and give them stability and gravity in
early life. In truth, it may be set down as an axiom,
that when institutions of learning and benevolence
increase, frivolity and dissipation decrease. The following reflections were found among Mr.
Eddy's papers, in his own hand writing, and show
how deeply this great cause had sunk into his heart. The formation of the American Bible Society, has
often disposed my mind, to reflect on the past and
present state of society in the world. In the course
of such reflections, I am naturally led to admire the
goodness and love of the divine author of our exist-
ence, in preparing, in his own way, the improvement
and melioration of mankind. His wisdom is dis-
played, in proportioning the degree of light to our
weak and feeble state. The splendour of the sun
is preceded by the dawn of day—so it is with respect
to the many essential and important truths, with
which the minds of men have been enlightened at
different periods of the world. Thus, formerly, an
eye for an eye, a tooth for a tooth, or the life of an
 offender as an expiation for his crime, were the rude
summary laws, which then seemed to be the perfec-
tion of justice. But the mild principles of the Chris-
tian religion, held out an easy and simple lesson for
the instruction of men, and taught them—Whatso-
ever ye would that men should do to you, do you
even so to them—love your enemies—do good
unto them that despitefully use you.—It is certain,
that even many of those, who were not baptized into
the spirit of our holy religion, were considerably in-
fluenced by these solemn and self-evident truths. It requires but a very slight acquaintance either
with the principles of human nature, or the history
of civil society, to be convinced, that until the human
mind became capable of perceiving the enormity of
 tolerating slavery, and the cruel injustice of holding
a portion of human beings in a state of abject bond-
age, we should never have been able to discover
the necessity of those prudent, humane, and salutary
 regulations, which have taken the place of sangui-
nary penal laws.—Thus, also, has christian sym-
pathy been gradually developed, and brought into
action that spirit of philanthropy, which desires to
promote the welfare of every part of the human
family. Hence we have been led into the exercise
of those benign affections, which have pointed out to
us the reasonableness and propriety of pursuing a
 course of mild and humane treatment, towards those
unfortunate persons who are afflicted with a dimi-
nution or aberration of intellect. At this auspicious period let us pause—a scene of
activity presents itself, fraught with an increase of
knowledge, enlargement of mind, and new powers
of rational enjoyment.—A new impulse has been
given to the Christian family, and its influence ex-
tends to every part of the world. The present age may be regarded as most remark-
ably auspicious to the interests of mankind, it is
marked by the union of benevolent persons of all
religious denominations, for the promotion of useful
objects; an improved system of education has been
reared up for youth, which has laid the foundation
of the greatest progress in intellectual and moral
 improvement that the world has hitherto known.
First day, or Sunday Schools, are established; and to
crown all, the British and Foreign Bible Society has
been organized, and in full operation, with wonder-
ful success, and on this day we celebrate the third
anniversary of the American Bible Society.—The
effects produced by this union are equal to the most
sanguine expectations of its founders—But Paul
may plant, and Apollos may water, but God alone
giveth the increase.—Relying on a continuance of
 blessings from on high, the fervent friend of Bible
Societies, viewing with gratitude the success of these
institutions in disseminating the oracles of divine
truth, looks towards the times, when the fruits of
 this seed shall be universally visible—he anticipates,
with joy, what has been in part accomplished—that
Bible Societies throughout the Christian world, have
been, in the hands of Providence, the means of effect-
ing a union of Christians, who, once widely sepa-
rated from each other, by countries, forms, and names,
have daily approximated, and coalesced, as it were,
into one spiritual body, proclaiming to the world,
that the true and invisible church, is not to be re-
stricted by the narrow limits of any particular sect,
or outward form, but comprehends all the genuine
worshippers of our God, and his Christ, in every part
of the habitable globe. How cheering, how anima-
ting are the happy effects, prospectively, that must
result from supplying the poor and destitute with
that book, which contains the words, the sayings,
and testimonies of God, pointing out a direct, plain,
and luminous path to immortality, promising the
assistance, and requiring submission to the same
spirit that inspired the holy penmen. In the present enlightened period, when peace per-
vades the whole world, is it too much to indulge the
hope, that the time is not very remote, when the pro-
phecy shall be fulfilled—Nation shall not lift up
sword against nation, neither shall they learn war
any more.—Though the Prince of this world may
still have rule among the people, we may in the
spirit of meekness pray—thy kingdom come.—We
may hope, that predisposing causes, in the hand of
divine Providence, may effect such a universal
change in the minds of men, as will finally extir-
pate the root of bitterness, and every evil passion that
serves to engender wars and fightings; and in room
thereof, men may learn to love each other, which is
the essential and true mark of a disciple and follower
of the Prince of Peace. From observations made upon the state of society
in the city of New-York, Mr. Eddy came to the con-
clusion, that one great cause of crime was pauperism,
which, in most instances in this country, arose from
ignorance in the poorer classes of the people; and, that
those who would do the best for the community, must
strike at the root of this evil, by teaching the children
of the poor to read and write, that they might be
able to find useful employment, or learn some trade
to enable them to earn a competent subsistence.
As this subject was deeply impressed on his mind,
he frequently corresponded with his friend Patrick
Colquhoun, of Westminster, who entertained similar
views, and he had, of course, the light of that
powerful mind to assist him. Mr. Eddy was tho-
roughly convinced of the efficacy of the system of
general instruction in operation in the Eastern States;
but, he thought, that it would be quite impossible to
bring the Legislature of New-York to pass a law for
such a school system, at that time;—such a one
must grow up radically with a people—it cannot
easily be done, after the population is numerous, and
 wealth has greatly increased. The rich man will
not consent that he should be taxed, according to his
property, to maintain schools, and then see that
money distributed in districts, according to the num-
ber of children under a certain age, such as usually
attend an instructor the whole or a portion of a
year. Mr. Eddy had frequently conversed with his
friends, John Murray, jun. and Matthew Franklin , on
the subject of schools; and, in February, 1805, they
proposed to him, to form an association of Friends,
to establish a free school, for the benefit of poor child-
ren, not members of their religious society. To this
Mr. Eddy objected, as he thought it would be impos-
sible to raise funds sufficient to support a school,
 except on a small scale, if it was confined to Friends
alone. He then proposed to call to his aid a num-
ber of respectable citizens, of different religious de-
nominations. The meeting was called; it was gene-
rally attended by the most active classes in the city,
and a committee was appointed to raise funds by
 subscription; and, also, to apply to the Legislature
for assistance. An act of incorporation, under the
name of the Society for establishing a Free School,
in the city of New-York, for the education of such
poor children as do not belong to, or are not provided
for by, any religious society, was obtained. The school
was soon opened, and twelve scholars admitted. From
this exertion, grew the splendid system of education
now in operation in the state of New-York. There had
been some legislative provisions previously enacted,
but the act had expired, without producing any
beneficial effects. At the commencement of the sys-
tem, the instruction was confined to the poor, who
were not otherwise provided for; at length it extend-
ed to all classes, and the reluctance that was felt, by
those in good circumstances, to sending their child-
ren to these common schools, is every day diminish-
ing, and will soon cease altogether. The first men
of New England were educated in their common
schools.* * In New England, although every man who pays a tax, has a vote not
only in general elections, but, also, in town offices, and in raising money
 and expending it; yet, the wealthy and well-to-do, have to take care of
the poor; for, in many instances, they have been opposed to raising money
for their common schools. In a town in Massachusetts, of no inconsidera-
ble size, where education is under the best of regulations, a proposition was
made, in town-meeting, to establish another school. A poor man who often
admired his own eloquence in these primary assemblies, opposed the measure
on the ground of oppressive taxation and spoke so strongly that many began
to doubt the expediency of establishing another school at that time. A friend
 to the proposition for another school followed the orator. He had prepared
 to meet this influence. He showed, in the first place, that the speaker, who
 alone opposed the measure, had been the father of ten sons, who were all edu-
 cated at the common schools in town, and that these sons had, on an ave-
rage, been at school seven years each. The gentlemen who argued in favour
of the additional school, next exhibited the school tax, from the time the oppo-
ser first paid a tax, to that year, and showed that his proportion of the whole
sum, for the seven years schooling of his boys, had been 39 cents only.
 They were bright boys, and often obtained prizes of books. Such is preju-
dice without calculation. EDITOR. 
Professor Johnson has written a fair and
pretty full account of education in the state of New-
York, which I here insert, as it is the best extant.
This system has even exceeded the calculation of
Mr. Eddy himself. EDUCATION. Though not the first among the states of the con-
federacy to introduce the system of universal educa-
tion, New-York may, with some truth, be said to
have surpassed all the other states, in the liberality,
as well as the sound policy, of her provisions for its
maintenance. She has happily taken the due means
between relying wholly upon taxation on the one
hand, and upon accumulated funds on the other, for
the support of schools throughout her community.
She has avoided the error of applying all her legis-
lation to a single class of institutions; thus showing
a spirit above the petty jealousy that would annihi-
late the higher, and a sense and patriotism that im-
peratively forbade her to neglect the lower semina-
ries of learning. We do not find colleges and uni-
versities multiplied till one actually devours another,
while the mass of the community is without even
the ordinary rudiments of knowledge; nor do we
perceive, on the contrary, the avenues to classical at-
tainments so hedged about by the expensiveness, the
useless requisitions, and the forbidding ceremonials
which might appal the youth, whose treasures were
 only of the mind, from attempting to gain the station
in society, for which his natural endowments had
qualified him. There does not appear any ostentatious display
of extravagance in her expenditures for education,—
nor any of that niggardly parsimony which would
compel the people to buy a cheap commodity of
 learning, sure, at the same time, that it must be a
poor one. She has not hesitated, while prosecuting the most
magnificent schemes for improving the value of her
physical resources, to devise and execute plans far
more magnificent for the development of her intel-
lectual treasures. It has not been the spirit of her
measures to consign a whole generation now existing
to brutish ignorance, in order that the next might
riot in its earnings, and sink in the same manner
into oblivion, without having been provided with
means of any rational enlargement of the most
 ennobling faculties. She has not been terrified by
the fear that the coming age, which is to be the heir
of her noble heritage of knowledge, freedom, and
moral power, should be compelled to pay out of its
immense resources, a few of the millions by which
that heritage was originally obtained. She has per-
ceived it to be sound policy to incur a debt, when the
transaction is sure to multiply a hundred fold the
power of repaying it. The system of internal im-
provements, instead of absorbing and annihilating
those very resources which are wanted to sustain
public spirit and intelligence, by means of education,
is, in New-York, made to minister directly and effec-
tually to that object, and thus to react in producing
again the foresight and discernment which were
alone requisite to, understand the utility of those
improvements, even before they had an existence. Origin of the System. The foundation of a sys-
tem of common schools was laid in this state nearly
forty years ago. The first act to that effect was
passed April 9, 1795, appropriating out of the annual
revenues of the state, twenty thousand pounds annu-
ally, for five years, for the purpose of encouraging
and maintaining schools in the several cities and
towns in the state. The several counties were re-
quired to raise a sum equal to one half of that appro-
priated to each by the state. At the expiration of
this law, in 1800, the legislature refused to renew it;
but, in 1805, impelled, probably, by a sense of the
 deprivation under which the state laboured, in being
again thrown back upon voluntary, iridividual, or
local efforts, the legislature passed an act, providing
that the nett proceeds of five hundred thousand acres
of vacant and unappropriated public lands should
be applied to form a permanent fund for the support
of common schools. In the same year, three thou-
sand shares of bank stock were ordered to be sub-
scribed by the state, and to belong to the school
fund. No part of this fund was to be applied to its
 ultimate object, until the interest should amount to
fifty thousand dollars annually. In 1811, measures were taken to organize and es-
tablish, in active force, a system of schools; such a
system was reported in 1812, and the first distribu-
tion of money under the provisions of 1805, and in
accordance with this system, were made in the year
 1816. Besides the avails of the lands, and of the
bank stock, above mentioned, the legislature enacted,
in 1819, that one half the amount to be received from
quit rents; the loans of 1790, and of 1808; the shares
of the capital stock of the Merchant's Bank, held by
the state; the nett proceeds of lands escheating to
the state, in the military tract; and the nett proceeds
of the fees of the clerks of the supreme court, should
all be assigned to this fund. In 1824, a reservation
in certain grants for lotteries, amounting to forty
thousand dollars, was added to the fund. In 1826,
it was enacted, that one hundred thousand dollars
should be annually distributed, by the state, for the
support of common schools; but, as the fund then
produced but eighty-five thousand dollars, the remain-
ing fifteen thousand dollars were paid trom the gene-
ral funds of the state. In 1827, further appropria-
tions, to make up the full amount of one hundred
thousand dollars, were made from the state loans of
1786, and from the bank stock still held by the state.
These two items amounted to one hundred and
thirty-three thousand six hundred and sixteen dollars. In the same year, the credit of the state was
pledged, in certificates of stock, to a canal company,
(the Hudson and Delaware,) which certificates were
to be sold, and the premiums obtained added to the
school fund; this transaction produced fifty thousand
dollars; and, finally, a large number of town lots, at
Oswego, amounting to ninety-one thousand three
hundred and forty-nine dollars, were sold in the
same year, and the proceeds, together with all the
sums obtained from the above-mentioned sources,
swelled the productive capital at the beginning of
1828, to one million six hundred and thirty thousand
eight hundred and ninety-five dollars. The constitu
tion of the state provides, that the proceeds of all
lands which shall be hereafter sold, or disposed of,
shall belong to the fund for the support of common
schools. In 1830, these lands consisted of eight hun-
dred and sixty-nine thousand one hundred and
seventy-eight acres, estimated at half a million of
dollars, which, added to the productive capital,
makes two millions one hundred and thirty thousand
eight hundred and twenty-five dollars. Besides the
general fund of the state, there are likewise several
local funds arising out of certain reserved lands in
the respective counties. More than eighty towns are
stated to participate in the benefit of these funds,
amounting to the sum of about seventeen thousand
dollars annually. Progress of the System. The first distribution of
public moneys, out of the fund, was made, as we
have said, in 1816, and not till then, can the system
be said to have gone into actual operation. An esti-
mate may be formed of the influence of this system
by comparing the state of things before the funds
 became available, with that which has existed since.
In sixteen counties in which the state of schools was
reported in 1798, the number of schools was then one
thousand three hundred and fifty-two, and of scholars
fifty-nine thousand six hundred and sixty. In the
same counties, in 1828, the number of school districts
established was two thousand five hundred and
eighty-six, and of scholars attending them, one hun-
dred and forty-two thousand three hundred and
seventy-two. Even this comparison falls far short
of exhibiting the actual increase of schools, and of
 pupils throughout the state; for, in 1798, there were
in all but twenty-three counties organized, and
therefore only seven which did not report. But, in
1828, there were fifty-five counties, divided into seven
 hundred and forty-two towns and wards, and eight
thousand two hundred and ninety-eight school dis-
tricts, containing four hundred and forty-one thou-
sand eight hundred and fifty-six children. It is true,
there are other causes besides the inherent efficacy of
the system, which should be regarded in accounting
for the rapid increase of schools and pupils. The
new counties formed subsequently to 1798, were set-
tled chiefly by emigrants from New-England, who
brought with them, as an essential part of their
existence, a habit of regarding universal education in
common public schools, as among the primary objects
 for which laws are to be enacted. And when the
system had been once established, it is easy to see
that its operation upon the minds of new companies
of such emigrants, must be to determine them to select
the state which had made this munificent provision
for that, which they consider as one of the first wants
of their nature, to be their permanent abode, in pre-
ference to another, where no such allurement was
held out, whatever might otherwise be the physical
superiority of the latter. Thus we see, that the sys-
tem of common schools has reacted, in turn, in favour
of population, and consequently in favour of wealth
and of power. physical, moral, and political. A Comparative View of the Returns of Common Schools,
from 1816 to 1832, inclusive. The year in which the report
was made to the Legislature. Number of towns from which
the returns were made. Whole number of school dis-
tricts in the said towns. Number of school districts from
which returns were received. Amount of public moneys re-
ceived in said towns. Number of children taught in
the school districts making re-
turns. *Number of children between
5 and 15 years of age, residing
in those districts. Proportion of the number of
children taught to the number of
children reported between the
age of 5 and 15 years. 1816 338 2755 2631 $55,720 98 140106 176449 4 to 15 1817 355 3713 2873 64,834 88 170385 198440 6 to 7 1818 374 3264 3228 73,235 42 183253 218969 5 to 6 1819 402 4614 3844 93,010 54 210316 235871 8 to 9 1820 515 5763 5118 117,151 07 271877 302703 9 to 10 1821 545 6332 5489 146,418 08 304559 317633 24 to 25 1822 611 6659 5882 157,195 04 332977 339258 42 to 43 1823 649 7051 6255 173,420 60 351173 357029 44 to 45 1824 656 7382 6705 182,820 25 377034 373208 94 to 93 1825 698 7642 6876 182,741 61 402940 383500 101 to 96 1826 700 7773 7117 182,790 09 425586 395586 100 to 93 1827 721 8114 7550 185,720 46 431601 411256 21 to 20 1828 742 8298 7806 222,995 77 441856 419216 96 to 91 1829 757 8609 8164 232,343 21 468205 449113 47 to 45 1830 773 8872 8292 214,840 14 480041 468257 48 to 47 1831 785 9063 8631 238,641 36 499424 497503 50 to 49 1832 793 9339 8841 244,998 85 507105 509967 1 to 1 * The returns of the last three years embrace the number of children over
five and under sixteen years of age. The above table exhibits only the amount of
money paid out of the funds, and so much as the
authority of the state imposes on the towns, to be
raised by them, in consideration of their receiving
those funds, which is an equal sum. The several
school districts have, besides, the authority to levy a
certain proportional sum, about double, it is believed,
 of that derived from the fund. But this, which makes in all four times the amount
distributed from the fund, does not show the total
 expenditure on this noble object of legislative pro-
vision. It was estimated at the beginning of the present
year (1832), that in the nine thousand and fifty-four
districts, where schools are supported, that two hun-
dred dollars each are invested, on an average, in
school-houses. This gives a total of one million eight
hundred and ten thousand eight hundred dollars,
which, together with one hundred and seventy thou-
sand dollars invested in the same way in the city of
New-York, gives a total of one million nine hundred
and eighty thousand dollars, vested in school-houses,
which, at an interest of six per cent. per annum,
would be
 $118,848 Annual expense of books for 506,887, at 50
cents each, 253,443 Fuel for 9054 schools, at $10 each, 90,540 Amount of public money for teachers' wages, 244,886 Amount paid for teachers' wages, besides
public money, 372,692 1,080,409 
showing the present annual expenditure of the citi-
zens of this state, for the support of common schools,
to be one million and eighty thousand dollars, and
proving that the application of one hundred thou-
sand dollars out of the fund, induces them to raise
voluntarily more than nine times the same amount
for the same object. Police of the System. This exists in the hands of
one superintendent of common schools, who is like-
wise the secretary of the commonwealth; fifty-five
clerks of counties; the commissioners of about seven
hundred and ninety towns, and the trustees of nine
thousand school districts. These several agents are in regular subordination
to each other, and, in succession, receive and distri-
bute the funds appropriated by the state for the sup-
port of schools. The highest officer, the superinten-
dent, is made directly amenable to public opinion,
as well as to the law, in being required to present
to the legislature annually, in the month of January,
a report containing:— A statement of the condition of the common
schools in the state. Estimates and accounts of expenditures of the
school moneys. Plans for the improvement and management
of the common school fund, and for the better organi-
zation of the common schools. All such matters relating to his office, and to
the common schools, as he shall deem expedient to
 communicate. The collection of documents already issued under
this requisition, contains a most useful and instruc-
tive mass of facts, which ought to be in the hands
of every state legislator in the union. It may be
observed, that the police of the general system is not
applied in the city of New-York, where, instead of
commissioners of towns and trustees of the schools,
chosen by the people, the disbursements of the public
money is entrusted to a company, called the Public
School Society. The reason or necessity of this dif-
ference of organization has never, to our knowledge,
been made evident. In 1832, the number of academies had risen to
fifty-nine, and the number of pupils was four thou-
sand eight hundred and eighty-eight, or seventy-one to
each academy. In addition to the means for support-
ing common schools, the state has another extensive
fund, called the literature fund, under the manage-
ment of the Regents of the University, to which
one hundred and fifty thousand dollars was added
in 1827, the income of which was required to be dis-
tributed to the several incorporated academies and
 seminaries, in proportion to their numbers of pupils.
It is gratifying to observe, that a liberal spirit has
been manifested in furnishing to these institutions
 various means and implements for cultivating the
 natural sciences, and that some of them have already
become useful to science, by their application of these
means. We may refer particularly to the numerous
 sets of meteorological observations occasionally pub-
lished by the Regents, and which are all made at
the academies under their charge. The money ap-
propriated to these institutions, has been thus appli-
ed with a view of converting them into nurseries of
teachers for the common schools. As the latter are generally taught but a part of
the year, that is, on an average, not more than eight
months, and as the teachers will generally be other-
wise engaged for a portion of their time, and will
not be permanently devoted to the business, it is high-
ly important that the greatest possible number of
 intelligent men should be found in every precinct,
capable of understanding the duties, if not of per-
forming the labours, of teachers. In a community
thus fully supplied with intelligent members, and
impressed with the value of thorough instruction,
dulness and mediocrity will seldom find encourage-
ment to usurp the office and responsibility of guid-
ing the intellectual pursuits of the young; while the
agents entrusted with the execution of the laws on
education will hesitate before they lay careless
hands on sculls that cannot teach, and will not learn. Mr. Eddy was also deeply engaged in the erection
of a House of Refuge, in the city of New-York. His
worthy friend, Professor John Griscom , made the
first suggestion of such an institution to Mr. Eddy ,
Isaac Collins , and others, and in 1823, they succeeded
in establishing this truly useful charity. The learn-
ed and benevolent professor lives to see his institu-
tion flourish, as an auxiliary to all the great pur-
poses of philanthropy to which his friend, Mr. Eddy ,
was devoted. With a strong desire to promote the interest of the
State of New-York, several intelligent gentlemen of
the state formed a society for the acquisition and
diffusion of all useful intelligence connected with
the inland trade and navigation of the country.
The society was called, the New-York Corresponding
Association for the Promotion of Internal Improve-
ment. When the association was organized, De
Witt Clinton was chosen President, and Doctor
Samuel L. Mitchell , and the Hon. Cadwallader D.
Colden, Vice Presidents, and Thomas Eddy , Chairman
of the committee of correspondence and publication.
The association exerted themselves for several years
with great assiduity, and the labours of the chairman
were very arduous, but promptly discharged. Who
has now the records of that association, I have not
been able to discover, but much valuable information
must have been collected by such indefatigable and
intellectual men as formed that association; and it is
well known, that their publications were numerous. On the great subject of slavery, which is now agi-
tating the world, Mr. Eddy took an early part. He
saw millions suffering in bondage, and willed them
to be free; but this was not enough; he knew that
means must be applied to ends, and that it was in
vain to deplore the condition of the Africans without
strenuous exertions. He was an active member of
the Abolition and Manumission Societies, and corres-
ponded with the philanthropists of Europe on the
subject, as well as with the leaders in the cause of
freedom in Hayti. He saw, as every wise man does,
that the evil was one that increased in magnitude
every day, and as time advanced, became more diffi-
cult to eradicate. It was the voice of such philan-
thropists, that assisted the politicians in fixing the
boundaries of the slave-trade, which was the first
step in the march of this charity; and which, if judi-
ciously followed up, will, in the end, drive the evil from
this country and the West Indies, and perhaps from 
 the world. The curse is becoming more intolerable
to the man who is considered the wealthy owner of
slaves, than even the imagination of the opposers of
slavery could have pictured. The great work of emancipation and colonization
is going on with zeal and success. Beside the Parent
Colonization Society, fifteen State Colonization Socie-
ties have been formed, and more than two hundred
and fifty auxiliaries established. New associations
are every day forming, to raise the condition of the
coloured free population; and these societies greatly
assist each other. These associations, formed for the
purpose of enlightening and benefiting the world,
are the great moral engines by which it is now and
hereafter to be moved. In the course of Mr. Eddy 's progress in the various
walks of philanthropy, he kept up a correspondence
with several distinguished philanthropists in Europe, 
and in this country. Several of those letters which
passed between Mr. Eddy and his coadjutors, I shall
here insert; for what such men as Colquhoun ,
Lushington , Roscoe , Clinton , Livingston , Colden ,
Schuyler , Throop , and others of the same high repu-
tation, have committed to paper, should be safely re-
corded for all. future times. They were among the
 pioneers of true reform, and exhibited a rare union
of intellectual light with moral courage. The letters
are given according to date, as it would not have
 been possible to have arranged them in order of sub-
jects, as some of the communications touch on a
number of topics. New York, 12th month, 7th, 1799. DEAR FRIEND, As it may be proper for the Canal Company to
make an application to the legislature this winter, I
think it would be right to be prepared early. We 
are in debt to the State 15,000l. Many reasons may
be urged to induce the legislature to take so many of
the unsubscribed shares, as amount to that sum;
they certainly would be more ready to do this, than
 to relinquish a claim for the interest for four or five
years, as we proposed last winter. Whilst we are
obliged to pay 900l., per year, interest on the above
 debt out of the tolls, we will not be able to divide
to the stockholders more than two per cent, as a
dividend. Perhaps some other way may occur to
thee to propose, for them to afford us pecuniary aid. The claims of the people at Still-Water are not
yet satisfied. Suppose the directors were to lay a
 requisition, payable 1st May next, and the stockhold-
ers refuse to pay, the comptroller would pay for the
 shares held by the state, the claimants might then be
paid; the corporation dissolved, and the whole stock
of the Northern Company belong only to the state.
I take the liberty of sending those hints, in hopes thou
wilt be so good as to improve them, and if it meets
thy approbation, to draw a petition to the legislature
on behalf of the Western Company, containing some-
thing like what I have mentioned in the preceding
part of this letter, and a copy for the consideration
of the Board, with such further remarks as will occur,
to be sent to the vice president as soon as possible.
Thou wilt excuse my anxiety to have, this commu-
nication early, as I expect to leave here for the north,
and soon after the assembly meets. The attorney general says, he had a good deal of
conversation with thee, relative to the proposed law,
to fix a punishment for small offences, and for regu-
lating county prisons. I beg to remind thee of the
plan I proposed, subject to thy improvement, viz. In
each county prison, to have as many rooms (or cells)
made as is convenient, six by eight feet. A single
justice to sentence an offender to be confined therein,
from twenty-four hours, to ten days. Three justices
to sentence a criminal for thirty days, and the Court 
of Quarter Sessions, ninety days; all greater offences,
to be sent to the state prison for one or more years.
No intercourse to be allowed with untried prisoners,
or debtors, and a total prohibition to their wives, chil-
dren, friends, or any person whatever. Inspectors to
visit the prison, at least once every month, to examine
into the conduct of the keeper, who should have rules
made by the inspectors, for his government. The
rooms should, by law, be directed to be white washed
twice every year, and no other than a low diet be allow-
ed, and strictly to prohibit any spirituous liquors. The
 inspectors might be appointed by the county court,
or supervisors, or by council of appointment. Many
of the jails at present are taverns; this should be
by law prevented. An allowance to the keeper
sufficient to procure a man of fair character should
be paid out of the public treasury. As our laws now
are, the keeper, as he must have charge of the debtors,
must be appointed by the sheriff. If what I have suggested meets thy approbation,
I know thou wilt considerably improve my plan; if
 so, and thou hast leisure to draw a bill, it will much
oblige me to be favoured with a copy. Be pleased to accept my best wishes for thy health,
and believe me respectfully, and very truly, Thy affectionate Friend, THOMAS EDDY . Philadelphia, 2d month, 24th, 1815. DEAR FRIEND. During the inclemency of the weather this morn-
ing, my mind has been turned towards several absent
Friends, and I determined to let them know it; per-
haps this may be the only sentiment worth commu-
nicating to thee; if it so turn out, thou mayest credit
me accordingly. The peace which has been lately concluded between
Great Britain and this country, whilst it is a subject
of general greeting and rejoicing, will, I hope, impress 
 our minds with thankfulness to him who is the
 author of every good and perfect gift; and dispose
us in future to harmonize more with each other.
That political trick and juggle, by which many have
contrived to direct the minds of the innocent and
 unwary, brought us to a precipice, to which it is even
now difficult to look back without shuddering. If
honesty of intention, and integrity of conduct, were
but the rule and practice of those appointed to direct
the affairs of the nation, I think, with the warning
we have had, we might long remain a separate and
peaceful people; but whether we are or shall soon
become fit to receive, and capable of enjoying, such
blessings, is known only to him whose ways, though
past finding out, must be infinitely great and good,
and must have for their object the happiness of his
creature, man. Not only have I contemplated the subject, as to its
general effect; but also as to its effect on some of my
personal friends. I have anticipated the pleasure of
hearing that it will effectually relieve those in New
York, who have been threatened with pecuniary loss
and embarrassment, by reason of the failure of Min-
turn and Champlin, and that they themselves will
be restored to a state of as much ease and affluence
as will do them good. I should be made glad by
hearing from thee, to this effect. Another anticipation I have indulged in. That
thyself and wife will give us your company at the
time of the next Yearly Meeting. Nor do I mean to
confine it to you only, but such other of the family
as may accompany you. Present my Sally's love to Hannah and the children,
and accept the assurance of my esteem. SAMUEL W. FISHER . To Thomas Eddy , and Thomas C. Butler , Esquires. RESPECTED FRIENDS, Having been informed that you can give us infor-
 mation relative to the penitentiary in New York.
We have to address you in the name, and on behalf
of the Philadelphia Society for alleviating the mise-
ries of public prisons, which, at a late meeting,
directed the secretaries to correspond with such per-
sons as are engaged in the conduct of penitentia-
ries, instituted in the different states of the union,
 wherein the humane and improved system of penal
laws are enforced; and, especially, to ascertain the
influence thereof, on the subjects of such treatment,
as well as their effect on the general condition of
society. Since the establishment of this institution, many
of its zealous and benevolent founders have gone
down to the grave. Some few, however, continue
 actively interested in its concerns; who were early
engaged in those humane exertions, which, regardless
of the influence of prejudice, and the example of
ages, aimed at the accomplishment of a reformation
in the penal jurisprudence of Pennsylvania. With
these are now united others, who, from a conviction
of the importance and utility of those labours, as well
as knowledge of the success of the experiments
 which flowed from them, have been induced to give
their assistance to the same philanthropic cause. To both these descriptions of our members it hath
become an interesting inquiry, what have been the
effects produced in your state by the adoption of a
meliorated code of criminal laws? Whether, allowing
for the increase of population, since their creation, crimes
have diminished in their number, or degree of enor-
mity? Whether individuals, who, by their errors,
have unhappily been the subjects of your peniten-
tiary system, are, since its wholesome correction,
restored to usefulness in the community? and, gene-
rally, whether the moral condition of society has
been improved, and the security of its members pro-
moted, by the abolition of punishments, which were
not less vindictive and cruel, than was the employ-
ment of them degrading to the character of our spe-
cies? It is not only for our own satisfaction, that we are
desirous of obtaining whatever information you can
furnish in relation to these interesting subjects, but
because we believe the combined experience of all
those who have been engaged in this great object of
state polity, cannot fail to advance its value in the
 estimation of others, and thereby subserve, at once,
the purposes of justice, and the cause of humanity. We believe that, in our own country, the number
of its friends is gradually multiplying; and it is with
 peculiar satisfaction, we have heard of the exertions
which some benevolent individuals, in their private
capacity, as well as enlightened statesmen, in their
public character, are employing in Great Britain, to
render the laws of that kingdom less sanguinary.—
These advocates of reformation have had the candour
to acknowledge, that they were encouraged to com-
mence the laudable work, from the success which
 had followed our experiments; and hence we see the
importance of embodying all the evidence which can
be collected, to support, in England, this effort of
mercy, and of diffusing these beneficent principles,
 through all those nations and states, by which they have
not yet been adopted. We are, very respectfully, &c. CALEB CRESSON , junr.,
ROBERT VAUX , } Secretaries. New York, 6th month, 5th, 1802. RESPECTED FRIEND, Thy sentiments on crimes and punishments com-
municated to the public, in two excellent works on
the Police of London and the Thames, has induced
me, without the pleasure of a personal acquaintance
to inform thee of the progress of an experiment
making in this state, by adopting a plan similar to
the one formed, soon after the revolution, in Pennsyl-
vania, for the amelioration of the penal laws. Some years ago, I was led to reflect on the state of
the criminal code in this state, and warmly impressed
with the belief, that all laws not founded on the
principles of truth and justice, the common feelings
of humanity, and the rights of mankind, should be
repealed; I took a very decided and active part in en-
deavouring to obtain a repeal of our former system, and
establishing one more consistent with the pure prin-
ciples of Christianity. In 1796, our laws were altered,
a state prison was directed to be built, and I was
 appointed one of the board of inspectors. My zeal
for promoting a plan, which I conceived would tend
to soften the dispositions of those concerned in govern-
ment, and thereby enlighten and prepare their minds
 for still more improving the condition and state of
mankind, induced me to leave extensive mercantile
pursuits, and reside near the prison, about two miles
from the city, in order that I might strictly attend to
 its concerns. To reduce such a description of men
to a regular course of labour, decent behaviour, and
cleanliness, was a task that required unremitting
attention, and on the success of the scheme, depended
 whether society should revive the former, or continue
the new system. I was exceedingly anxious that
our prison should furnish a model for other states, 
and have therefore attended, when in health, almost
daily, to superintend its concerns, and every winter
for five years past, visited Albany, in order to promote 
the passing of such laws or alterations of former
ones, as were deemed necessary, to perfect the pre-
sent code. I have lately published an account
of the prison, for the information of the public;
and with a view to excite other states to follow our
example. I take the liberty now, to present thee
with one of those publications, which will give full
information of the management, economy, &c. of the
prison. I understand there are some prisons in England,
where the convicts are employed at labour. I should
be very glad to obtain information of the kind of
work carried on; if the product is sufficient to pay
for their support, clothing, &c. I expect there are
printed accounts of them; and also some late books,
or pamphlets, on crimes and punishments, and on
 prisons. I therefore take the liberty to request of
thee, to be so obliging as to give my good friend,
 Charles Wilkes , a memorandum of such as in thy
opinion may be worth my procuring. I should be
very glad to obtain the report of the Committee of
the House of Commons, on Bentley's plan; also, any
or all of his writings. I have Howard , and the first
edition of Police of London and Thames. If thou
hast published any thing lately, be pleased to insert
it in the list. My friend Wilkes will take the trou-
ble of procuring from the booksellers, and forward-
ing to me, such books as thou wilt be so obliging as
to recommend. I enclose the last report of the inspectors of the
state prison to the legislature; they passed a law to
build a prison, for solitary confinement, on the plan
recommended in the Report. I have often thought
that this would be an excellent plan in the city of
London, for the punishment of petty offences, and
for preventing greater ones. I am clearly of opinion, that all prisons intended
for the confinement of convicts for a term of years
should be so constructed as that they should lodge in
separate rooms; by being kept thus solitary and sepa-
rate from each other, it would be more likely to
produce reformation, and prevent escapes. There are in the prison 145 of the convicts employ-
ed at shoemaking, and that business has hitherto
been carried on, by purchasing leather, &c., and dis-
posing of the shoes and boots when manufactured.
As this required a considerable capital, and was
always attended with inconvenience, we have lately
dropped conducting the business in this mode, and
have agreed with shoemakers in the city, to take in
work at a fixed price, for making each pair of shoes
and hoots, according to the size and quality—in this
manner of employing those 145 men, they now earn
 twelve hundred dollars per month, and it is now cer-
tain, that the labour performed by the prisoners will
be more than sufficient to support and clothe them,
pay for bringing them from the counties, and other
incidental expenses. I have hitherto acted as agent, but the system being
now completed, equal to my most sanguine expecta-
tion, I intend this summer to resign that situation. I am, with regard and esteem,
Very respectfully,
Thy assured friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To P. COLQUHOUN , London Eastbourne, in Sussex, 28th August, 1802. SIR, Your very acceptable letter of the 6th June, accom-
panied by your valuable and interesting publication,
giving an account of the State Penitentiary House in
the city of New York, was recently left, at my house
in Westminster, by Mr. Wilkes , and has since been
transmitted to me to the country, to which I have
retired for a short time, with a view to a little
relaxation from the labours attached to an arduous
public duty. My temporary retirement has furnished me with
an early opportunity of perusing with attention, and
also with much interest, your very excellent state-
ment of important and useful facts, and I consider
 myself under infinite obligations to you, not only for
the knowledge of these facts, but for the acquaint-
ance of the worthy and respectable author, who has
devoted so much time, and made so many sacrifices,
to promote the cause of humanity, and the good of
his fellow creatures. It is a peculiar gratification to me, to have thus
 discovered that my literary productions have fallen
under the cognizance of one who is able, and also
so thoroughly disposed, to carry the principles they
contain, on the subject of crimes and punishments,
into practice; and it is no small gratification to me
to find, that upon a subject so interesting to virtue
and humanity, our sentiments are completely in
unison. Your exertions, and those of your worthy colleagues,
appears to have done much for the State of New
York, and I entertain no doubt of the sentiments of
all the worthy and reflecting part of the community
being on your side in a short time; that the great
and good work, your unexampled perseverance has
so happily accomplished, will produce consequences
which will not only bring conviction to the minds of
the most prejudiced, but also that you will live to see
and experience that reward, in the ultimate and
complete success of the design, which, to a mind like
yours, must go far beyond the praises and encomiums
of the world. Your details are so clear, so accurate
and interesting, that they will be read with avidity
all over Europe. To me it has been no small gratification, although
I have, on account of the war and other circumstan-
ces, made as yet small progress in the objects I have
 recommended to be adopted in this country, that my
writings have been translated into most of the
languages in Europe, with a prospect of general
 benefit to mankind, since, in all countries, the vices
and crimes of individuals are similar, and only differ
as to their extent. I had read some years since, with the most heart-
felt pleasure, two different accounts of that most
excellent institution, the Penitentiary House in the
city of Philadelphia, which is the more valuable as
it furnishes an irrefragable proof to all Europe, as
well as America, that the great desideratum has
 been accomplished, of rendering the labour of crimi-
nals productive, to a degree more than equal to their
maintenance, and what is of more importance, of
restoring them again to society with amended morals,
and in a situation to become useful instead of
noxious members of the community. The criminal police is an object of the greatest im-
portance in all countries, but particularly in America,
not only as a new country, but as a Republic, ex-
posed, from peculiar circumstances, to be contami-
nated by importations of the scum and outcasts of
all Europe. This, and other considerations, have
excited great doubts in my mind, whether the intro-
duction of Europeans in the present state of the popu-
lation of America, is not, upon the whole, injurious.
This is exemplified in no inconsiderable degree in
the comparative view you have given of the coun-
tries to which the different classes of convicts belong.
It might be difficult and invidious to exclude the
white people of Europe, and might be a reflection
upon the national character; but, surely, this policy
does not apply to the negroes of the West Indies,
who, I perceive, tend, in no inconsiderable degree,
to increase the calendars of delinquency. You have been rightly informed, that several very
 expensive Houses of Correction have been estab-
lished in England, within the last twenty years,
under the authority of acts of Parliament, the out-
lines of which I have laid before the public; but
although the expense has been excessive, (in one in-
stance 80,000l. sterling,) I am sorry to say, that, how-
ever excellent the theory, by a fatality which is not
easy to be explained, no results that can be held out
as an example, can be exhibited. In one or two, in
particular, Oxford and Gloster, where, (like the Peni-
tentiary House at New-York) some benevolent cha-
racters have devoted much time and attention to the
economy of the establishments, the labour of the con-
victs has been rendered, in a certain degree produc-
tive.—We have a superb establishment in Middlesex,
to which I bestowed much attention at the outset,
but, instead of being seconded, I found myself coun-
teracted in all my anxious cares to introduce a sys-
tem of useful and productive labour, and I lament to
say, that, in addition to fourscore thousand pounds
laid out in the buildings, it costs the county nearly
4000l. sterling a year, to maintain the prisoners.—
Contemplating the difficulties and the consequent
failure of most of the plans founded on Mr. Howard 's
ideas, and considering the obstructions which are
opposed to evils, in their nature so gigantic, I have
been induced to give a decided preference to Mr.
Bentham's plan, as briefly explained in my treatise
on the police, (6th edition) where he proposes to
enter into a contract for the labour of convicts, and
to become responsible for the reformation of their
manners and vices.—When I return to London, I will
procure from that gentleman a copy of the detail of
his plan and will have great pleasure in transmit-
ting it to you, with such other publications as apply
to the subject of Penitentiary Houses. I will also send,
if I can possibly procure it, a copy of a report of the
Committee of the House of Commons.—The whole
of the reports have been reprinted in four volumes,
among which twenty-eight treats of Police. They
are all extremely interesting, and, I think, you will
be desirous that they should have a place in your
library; when I have the pleasure of seeing Mr.
Wilkes, I will consult with him how far I should go
in this respect. The first edition of the police of
 London may be considered as only an imperfect sketch.
It is in the sixth-edition of that work that you will
find those interesting topics discussed, to which your
attention is at present so laudably directed. The last report of your committee is extremely
interesting, and you press upon the attention of the
legislature, with great propriety, the evils arising
from the excessive multiplication of spirit houses, and
public houses. Nothing tends so much to the corrup-
tion of morals, or to promote habits of idleness, ulti-
mately generating crimes: 1200 of these receptacles
of vice in so small a city as New York, are to be con-
sidered as an evil of the greatest magnitude. In the
 metropolis of the British Empire, which contains
twelve times the number of inhabitants, the magis-
trates do not grant licences to more than about 4000,
although, taking in the towns and villages in the
vicinity, we have upwards of 5000 in the whole. I
have been at great pains, in forming and enforcing
rules and orders for the proper regulation of publi-
cans, in different districts of the metropolis, where I
have acted as a magistrate—a copy of which I will
send you. The indiscriminate mixture of young and
old offenders, in the same prison, I observe, is men-
tioned with great propriety in your last report. I
have always considered this practice (which also
prevails here) as one of the greatest nurseries of
crimes; and I am glad to find you have brought it
 under the review of your legislature. The remedy
you propose, appears to me to be the wisest and most
effectual that can be devised. Your proposition to authorize the police magis-
trates to try, in a summary way, all persons committing
minor offences, such as petty assaults, drunkenness,
and acts of vagrancy, &c., will prove a great relief to
 juries, and will tend much to the diminution of
crimes. In this country, the legislature finds it
necessary every session, to extend the summary
 jurisdiction of magistrates; and experience has shown,
(as these magistrates are responsible,) that instead of
abridging, it extends the liberty of the innocent part
of the community; and I can safely affirm, that had
it not been for these summary jurisdictions, it would
have been impossible, in any degree, to have kept
the vices and crimes of the people within any mode-
rate bounds. The present state of society and morals,
in what is called the civilized world, render a species
of energy necessary, which can only be attained by
summary proceedings. The great inlets to vice,
idleness, and crimes, are, ill regulated public houses,
 gaming, horse-racing, cock-fighting, profane swearing,
and a contempt of religious duties on a Sunday: to
which may be added, generally, every species of dis-
sipation, which has a tendency to congregate multi-
tudes of people on the same spot. In a new country
like America, where the general prosperity of the
nation depends, in so eminent a degree, on the morals
of the people, the legislature cannot promote the true
welfare of the state, in a greater degree, than by
 authorizing magistrates to correct these evils, by
inflicting mild punishments in a summary way, and
by commuting, in various instances that will occur,
the punishment of imprisonment by pecuniary penal-
ties, to be applied to the expenses of the police.
Female prostitution, particularly in the cities in
America, also requires appropriate laws, which will
apply to both sexes; and those should be adminis-
tered in a summary way by the magistrates, by
imprisonment, or mild pecuniary fines. In like man-
ner, brothels ought not to be prosecuted by the tedious
and circuitous process of indictment and trial by
jury. The expense of such prosecutions in this
country, tend much to the increase of the evils of
prostitution, while, through the medium of the chi-
cane of the law, many notorious delinquents escape
justice. I could not have conceived, until I perused your
accurate reports, that such a number of larcenies
could have been committed in the city of New York.
It is impossible that depredations to such an extent
should be committed, unless there were many receiv-
ers of stolen goods; such as purchasers of old metals,
old apparel, ships stores, rags, and hand stuff &c.
These classes of dealers require the watchful eye of
the legislature, and much advantage would be derived,
from restraining them from dealing, unless under the
 authority of a licence, with power to the magistrates
to withhold it on the succeeding year, in case of any
 information of improper conduct, and to forfeit it,
in case of conviction—a power also to constables, to
stop and examine the persons who convey parcels,
&c. after dark, and to punish the offenders if they
 cannot give a satisfactory account to the magistrate,
how they obtained the same, would tend much to
the prevention of crimes. It is by these precau-
tions, and by mild summary punishments, that the
calendars of delinquency are to be diminished in
every country, and a wise legislature will look to
prevention as a primary object, that there may be
occasion as seldom as possible, to resort to punish-
ment. As temperance operates powerfully in preventing
diseases in the human body, so will preventives tend
to diminish the evils in the body politic. In America,
where old prejudices do not exist, and where the
laws in their progress are verging towards maturity,
this preventive system can be much easier accom
plished than in Europe, and if the legislature is true
to itself, it will see the vast importance of establish-
ing, in the first instance, every safe-guard to the
innocent part of the community, by shutting up, as
far as circumstances will permit, every avenue to
 crimes. The true interests of the state requires it,
and humanity to the unhappy individuals, who are
tempted to perpetrate offences, from the temptations
which assail them, plead strongly for the adoption of
an appropriate preventive system, applicable to the
local and peculiar state of the country. Did I not know that I was addressing myself to a
man of true philanthropy, who glories in his country's
 prosperity, and anxiously seeks for opportunities of
doing good, I should make an apology for the length
of this letter; but to you, sir, it is not necessary.
That you may be long spared to society, and blessed
 with health and vigour of mind, to enable you to
prosecute the good work, which you and your wor-
thy colleagues have so successfully began, is the
sincere and earnest wish of, Sir, your most obedient, and humble servant, P. COLQUHOUN .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. P.S. I refer you to the annexed copy of my letter
written from Eastbourne in Sussex, on the 28th
of August. I find since my return home, that Mr.
Wilkes is still absent in the country, but I am never-
theless making progression, collecting various publi-
cations to be sent you; and as soon as I have the
pleasure of seeing him, I will take measures for the
 purpose of conveying them to you. London, 16th February, 1803. SIR, Your excellent work on the state prison of New
York, has been considered of so much interest and
importance, by several very elevated characters in this
country, that a proposition has been made to reprint
it. It is now in the hands of the members for the
Home Department, through whose medium, I trust,
 and ardently hope, it may be rendered useful in this
country. According to your desire, I have occasion-
ally been employed, for some time past, in collecting
every publication which appears to me to bear on
subjects of this nature, as well as on other topics of
political economy, which have appeared to me to be
analogous. The whole are sent in a box addressed
to you, by this opportunity, in conformity to a list
 now inclosed; and I have particularly to request that
you will accept of them from me, as a mark of my
 esteem and regard. You will trace in these various tracts a very great
portion of zeal and genuine philanthropy, as well as
strong marks of extensive reading and profound
knowledge, on subjects calculated to promote the com-
fort and happiness of society, in every part of the
civilized world. The first object to be attended to, with a view to
the comfort, happiness, and security of a nation, is a
proper provision for the education of youth. That
country is the happiest, (says a great writer,) where there
is the most virtue. To suffer the youth of both sexes
to be ill educated, and to be reared to maturity with-
out a proper sense of religion and virtue, and an
 abhorrence of vice, is to establish a nursery for
crimes. In a new country like America, where the popula-
tion increases so fast, it becomes an important deside-
ratum, that the means and facilities to obtain a
virtuous and proper education, should keep pace with
the constant increase of the youth of both sexes.
Where national institutions of this nature have been
established in Scotland and in Switzerland, the hap-
piest effects have been produced. On the contrary,
 where this great measure of state policy has been
neglected, the manners of the people have exhibited
strong instances of a deficiency, manifested by
extreme ignorance and immoral conduct, as it respects
a considerable proportion of the lower classes of
society; and hence it is that crimes multiply, and
that the adult becomes often enervated and useless to
society at that period of life, when labour ought to
be most productive. Upon the subject of education, the reports which I
have transmitted, published by the society for better-
ing the condition of the poor, furnish many excellent
hints and suggestions. The next object, as it relates to criminal offences,
and which is of the highest importance to civil
society, is a proper attention to those, whose indi-
gence or idleness render them burdens upon the
other classes of society. This evil becomes a hydra
in every nation, where appropriate regulations do not
exist for educating the offspring of indigent and
 profligate parents, or orphans who are cast upon the
public; and also for propping up adults, reduced to a
state of extreme poverty and wretchedness, so as to
compel them, at least to the extent of their abilities,
to assist themselves. The want of appropriate regu-
lations, under an accurate and correct management,
as it applies to this very difficult branch of political
economy, is one of the chief causes of the numerous
criminal offences which afflict society in Europe.
It is one of the greatest nurseries of crimes, from which
you are already not exempted in the larger societies
in America, perhaps from this scene of turpitude;
this gangrene, not having as yet sufficiently attracted
the notice of your government. Upon this important branch of political economy,
much useful information will be found in the reports
of the society of the poor, exhibiting a vast scope for
the exertion both of public and private benevolence,
particularly the latter; as it respects the former, the
preliminary sketches on the poor, by Jeremy Bentham ,
Esq., furnish much curious and important matter,
which will be read with great interest by the philo-
sopher, the statesman, and the philanthropist. Periods of scarcity are not so likely to happen in
America as in Europe: yet as the food of man rises
to an enormous price in the United States, as often
as extraordinary demands are made upon you, the
condition of your poor, in the large cities, must, in a
certain degree, claim the occasional attention of the
benevolent; and therefore, as it may be interesting to
 know what has been accomplished in this country,
and particularly in this great metropolis, during the
recent periods of scarcity, I have taken the liberty
to send you several tracts, and other papers, upon this
subject, which have been chiefly compiled by myself
for the use of the public, and the various societies
with which I was connected, where I generally had
the labouring oar. These papers are the more inte-
resting, as they tend to prove how much may be
gained by an economizing system, and at how small
an expense, under proper management, it is possible
to feed and to prop up families in distress. The
attention and labour are indeed excessive; and the
reward to the numerous benevolent individuals*
On this interesting occasion, the public were under infinite obligations to
 the Society of Friends resident in London; without their assistance and
 steady perseverance, we could not have accomplished the relief which was
 afforded. who
came forward on this occasion, was felt to be com-
plete, since it produced the wished for effect. On other effects immediately connected with objects
of beneficence, I beg leave to refer you to Doctor
 Lettsom's recent work, which I also send you, by his
 particular desire, in which you will find much useful
and interesting information, calculated to improve
 the state of civil society, as it relates to the poor,
and to analogous distempers, &c. &c. On the last
subject, namely, analogous fevers, and particularly
the typhus or jail distemper, you will find some
new and interesting information, in a tract detailing
a variety of successful experiments, which has been
published and circulated by the society for bettering
the condition of the poor, by which it appears emer-
sion in water, or the shower bath, is a certain cure. Turning from this subject, to that which relates to
the preservation of morals, and the prevention of
criminal offences, I must refer you to my observations
on public houses, (of which I send you two copies,)
and also my treatise, recently published, on the duty
of a constable. The first will furnish some useful
hints relative to regulations which, ere long, will be
found necessary in America, (particularly in the large
towns,) with respect to dram shops, and the excessive
and unrestrained use of spirituous liquors, than which,
when indulged in to excess, nothing can be more
pernicious, both to the health and morals of the
labouring people. It is the chief source of the multi-
plication of crimes, which afflict society in the city
of New-York;—to which I might add, those persons
who are permitted, without control or inspection, to
deal in old metals, old ships stores, and apparel and
furniture bought at second hand. The first, namely,
dram shops, corrupt the morals; while the second, by
holding out facilities to thieves, by purchasing what-
ever may be offered for sale, without asking questions,
and that too at an under price, become the fosterers of
crimes. In the tract on constables, you will see, under
 various heads, what provisions our laws have made
for the prevention of the corruption of morals, and
the commission of crimes. By the adoption of the
farther regulations recommended in my treatise on
the police of the metropolis, and also by the select
committee of the House of Commons, much might be
done in this country to diminish the number of
 offenders of all descriptions. Not being able to pro-
cure a copy of this very interesting report in a separate
volume, an opportunity is afforded me of requesting
your acceptance of the whole of the interesting reports
 of the select committee on finance, from which the
statesman, the politician, the financier, and the poli-
tical economist, will be able to acquire much useful
information, highly beneficial to America. The
 twenty-eighth report in the second volume, treats on
the general police, where, on this subject, you will find
details highly interesting, as they relate to the mea-
sures proposed for the prevention of crimes, and the
punishment of offenders. On the subject of penitentiary punishment, I send
you Mr. Bentham 's two volumes, explaining the con-
struction and general currency of his Ponoplicon; also,
a parcel containing the annual reports of the peni-
tentiary house in Dorsetshire, with other papers
delivered to me by that distinguished senator, William
 Morton Pitt, Esq., member of Parliament for the county
of Dorset, to whose indefatigable attention this estab-
lishment owes its superiority over every similar
institution m this country. Mr. Morton Pitt has been
much fascinated by your work, and as I have already
mentioned, is anxious it should be reprinted in Eng-
land; but as this desideratum may not be attained, it
would be very gratifying if I could have it in my
 power to present to the Speaker of the House of
Commons, to him, and to some other distinguished
characters in this country, a copy of the work. I
have inquired at different booksellers, and also of
Mr. Wilkes , but I do not find that it is to be pur-
chased. On the subject of prisons in this country, I have
only farther to call your attention to a work just
 published by James Nield , Esq., who, following the
 example of the great, the benevolent Howard , em-
ploys an easy fortune, and much of his time, in visit-
ing the different prisons in Great Britain. His chief
 attention, however, has been directed to the situation
of poor persons confined for civil debts, to whom, as
you will observe from his work, and also from his
exertions as treasurer of the society, he has been a
 friend indeed. On the subject of punishments, I send you inclosed
the last statement of the delivery of the gaol at New-
 gate, which has been recently sent me by the Secre-
tary of State, and contains a general view of the
disposal of prisoners for the last year, for the more
aggravated offences tried at the Court of Oyer and
Terminer at the Old Bailey. In this statement, how-
ever, neither the numerous persons tried at the London,
 Westminster, and Middlesex Sessions, nor at the
Assizes and Sessions in Southwark, which makes a
part of the metropolis, are included. I have no
means at present of ascertaining the amount of these;
but I have reason to believe they are equal, or per-
haps exceed, the number stated in the last (sixth
edition) of the treatise on the police. The only use which can be made of this melan-
choly catalogue of depravity, is to stimulate those in
power, in every country, to the adoption of such
measures, as shall forewarn the unwary, arrest the
hands of evil doers, and thereby lessen the demand
for punishment. To you, sir, and to many other
benevolent characters, the United States are under
 great obligations; but your labours are not yet
terminated. Since by punishment alone, we are not
to look for that amelioration in the state of society,
which is to arise from the diminution of crimes,
the minds of your chief magistrates and active
senators, ought ever to be alive to the means of
prevention. To those who are likely to commit
offences, there cannot be a greater act of humanity;
while on society at large, a greater benefit cannot be
conferred. It is not the mere loss of property that
is to be deplored. In the ramifications of vice extend-
ed broad and wide, a nation bleeds at every pore in
that general contamination, which poisons the mind,
renders the corporeal functions useless, and abridges
 that industry and exertion in beneficial labour, which
constitutes the support of every state and body
politic. It is not enough to frame excellent laws to punish
delinquents. The history of all civilized countries,
has proved how inefficacious they are in the improve-
ment of morals. With every attention which human
wisdom can bestow, where multitudes are congre-
gated together in gaols, who have long been apostates
from virtue, vice must in general be triumphant.
As you advance in population, under the unavoidable
hazard of contamination by frequent importations
of depraved characters, who have fled, in many
 instances, from the punishment due to their crimes
in Europe, a vigilant and active preventive police
becomes necessary. Nor should a free country com-
plain of such a system, since crimes and criminal
people constantly abridge the privileges of innocence.
Restraints which attach only to evil doers, can never
disturb the proceedings of the peaceful citizen in the
general intercourse of society. Let the American
 government, before it becomes too unwieldy, guard
the morals of its people as its best prop. What may
be found easy and practicable in the yet infant state
of society, may become difficult, and perhaps impossi-
ble, when evil habits descend from generation to
 generation, until at length it becomes too gigantic for
human exertion. Comparatively speaking, the country
is yet virtuous. To permit it to retrograde, as it
becomes more wealthy and more populous, by an
 inattention to the general progress of evil habits,
would be to entail upon posterity an excessive
calamity. The task is certainly not difficult at
present, since in the country there is little to fear, and
 hence it would seem, that the energy of police would
only be necessary in the great towns, checking and
restraining those propensities, which lead to the cor-
ruption of morals. Nor ought it to be forgotten, that
an indulgence in many propensities, which half a
century ago were divested of their evil consequences,
from the then infant state of society, became noxious
as population increases. It is then drunkenness,
gaming, lewdness, and other offences, leading to the
corruption of morals, acquire their sting. They pro-
mote idleness; while want of employment, where
labour is necessary for subsistence, is the never failing
inroad to crimes. I am induced to enlarge upon this subject, from
the facts you have disclosed, relative to the criminal
offences committed in the city of New York. They
appear to me to be of a magnitude to excite a con-
siderable degree of alarm with respect to the increase
of criminality in the American towns; inasmuch as
it would appear that they greatly exceed the number
 of larcenies and misdemeanours, committed in towns
in Great Britain, of an equal or even a greater popu-
lation; and although I have not had an opportunity
of ascertaining the fact, I have an impression on my
mind, that the annual convictions in the whole of
Scotland, where the population approaches two
millions of people, are short of those which take
place yearly in the state of New York; and yet that
country, from the rapid influx of riches and luxury,
and extensive manufactures, cannot be said to be
improving in morals. I fear the reverse is the case;
since I have been recently applied to by some of the
first public characters in that country, to suggest
means for the improvement of their police. Arrange-
ments and checks upon evil propensities, must be
 accommodated gradually to the existing state of
society. The intention of all governments is to render
human nature as perfect as possible, since from this
perfection results the security and the comfort of the
 whole; but errors and imperfections incident to
human nature are unfavourable, and ever will be so,
to such a state of things, which can only be main-
tained by good and appropriate laws, wisely and
prudently administered. If the information I have transmitted, or what I
have communicated in this and my former letter,
(which I hope you have received,) can be of use in
promoting any of your benevolent objects for the
benefit of your country, it will afford me the sincerest
pleasure. I am, with great respect and esteem, Sir,
Your most obedient and
Very faithful servant, P. COLQUHOUN . A List of Books and Pamphlets transmitted to THOMAS EDDY . Tracts on the Education of Youth, and the Poor.—
 Two volumes containing a series of reports, of the
 Society for Bettering the Condition of the Poor in
London, &c. A series of numbers containing the
remaining reports, down to the present period, thirteen
in all. Tracts on the means of supporting the Poor, and pre-
venting Idleness and Vagrancy.—Preliminary sketches
on the Poor, by Jeremy Bentham , Esq. sent by the 
 desire of the author. Letters to P. Colquhoun , Esq.,
 on the subject of the Jewish poor in the metropolis. Tracts and papers written during the late scarcity in
Great Britain and Ireland.—Suggestions for econo-
mizing human subsistence, during the scarcity, with
 various Tracts and Addresses written by P. Colquhoun ,
Esq., during that eventful period. Hints on Beneficence, and Tracts on Analogous
 Fevers.—Hints on beneficence, in three volumes
by Doctor Lettsom , sent by the author's desire.—
Tracts on Analogous Fevers, and Fever Hospital in
Dublin. Tracts applicable to the Police, to the Corruption of
Morals, and the prevention of Crimes.—Observations on
 public houses in the metropolis, (two copies,) by P.
Colquhoun. A Treatise on the functions and duties
of a Constable, explaining in what manner the police
of England is at present conducted, by P. Colquhoun .
This work, with a few alterations, will apply to
every part of the United States. Nothing upon the
same plan has ever been published. Financial and Police Reports.—Two volumes con-
taining a history of the finances of Great Britain,
and the system of public offices, &c. The twenty-
eighth report in the second volume relates to police. Penitentiary Establishments.—Ponoplicon system
for reforming criminals, by Jeremy Bentham , Esq.
Two letters by the same author, drawing a compari-
son between his system and the present mode of
transportation to New South Wales. Reports on the
penitentiary establishment in the county of Dorset,
sent by William Morton Pitt , Esq., member of Par-
liament. Rules and orders proposed for the better
management of the House of Correction for the
county of Middlesex, situated in Cold Bathfields,
Clerkenwell. Prisons in England.—A survey of the prisons in
England, with a view to the relief of Poor Debtors,
by James Nield , Esq. Commercial Police.—Regulations of the port of
London, and instructions to Reve Constables, by P.
Colquhoun. A packet from Jeremy Bentham Esq. to Mr. Eddy .
—Mr. Eddy will see that Mr. Bentham has read his work
on the New York state prison. List of papers inclosed—also pamphlets.—1. A state-
ment or summary view of the prisoners committed
to Newgate for trial in the year 1802, with the
various results. 2. Introductory letter to the fourth
volume of the reports of the Society for Bettering the
Condition of the Poor. 3. Extracts from Doctor
Williams' publication on the effects of dram-drinking,
three copies. 4. Extracts of cases of the typhus
fever, recovered by affusion in cold water. 5. Hints
for making straw hats, &c. The letter, to which the annexed is an answer, is
missing. It related to the agency here spoken of,
respecting the Constable estate. New-York, 5th mo. 22d, 1803. ESTEEMED FRIEND, Almost immediately after receiving thy esteemed
favour, of the 10th February last, business called me
from the city, from which I have been absent several
weeks. This must be my apology for not sooner
replying to thy letter. During my absence, I have
been to Philadelphia, and have made some inquiries
concerning the matters to which thou hast requested
 my attention. It would afford me very sincere pleasure to be of
service to one, for whom, though personally un-
known, I cherish the highest respect and esteem, and
whose benevolent and active exertions, to diminish
the evils of civil society, claims the gratitude of every
 citizen of the world. In consenting to take upon me the agency of thy
 lands here, it is proper for me to state, that, having
devoted the last seven years wholly to the promotion
of a favourite object, the amelioration of the penal
laws, and the establishment of a penitentiary house
in this state, I have been prevented from bestowing
the necessary attention to my private affairs. This object, which I have had so much at heart,
being now so far accomplished, and put into a train
of successful experiment, as to permit me to with-
draw from that close application which has been
hitherto requisite, I shall have leisure to attend to
other things. Some property which I have in Vermont, and Penn-
sylvania, will demand my earliest regard. Not in-
tending to return again to mercantile pursuits, I
mean to give some portion of the remainder of my
life (as Providence may spare it) to the service of the
poorer classes of society.—It would not, therefore, be
agreeable to have any considerable obstacle inter-
posed, which may impede the course I wish to pur-
sue.—But the scheme of action I have proposed to
myself, will not prevent my using every exertion to
promote thy interests, and to fulfil thy wishes. In whatever I do for thee, I beg to be clearly under-
stood, as disclaiming every pecuniary compensation,
beyond the actual and necessary expense attending
the transactions; but I may find it for thy interest,
and my own satisfaction, to use the advice and assist-
ance of my particular and valuable friend, William
Johnson, Esquire, of this city, whose disposition will
prompt him to feel an equal and lively interest in
whatever concerns thee, as he has read thy works
with singular avidity and pleasure, and has conceived
the highest respect for thee; and if he can be induced
to accept it, I should cheerfully relinquish to him
every compensation which thee may feel disposed,
in the result of the business to bestow.—I should pre-
fer, if it meets thy approbation, to have his name in-
serted with mine, in thy power of attorney, as from
 my intimacy with him, founded on a clear knowledge
of his integrity, his philanthropy, and excellent
talents, that it would decidedly be to thy interest and
advantage. I intend to send this letter by the Juliana, Captain
Brown, and shall deliver to his care a small box,
(marked Patrick Colquhoun , Esquire, London,) con-
taining twelve copies of the Account of New-York
 State Prison, and an equal number of the last report.
A packet contains two, which thou wilt be so good
as to send to William M. Pitt , Esquire, whose obliging
letter and reports merit my warmest thanks.—To
the politeness of Jeremy Bentham , I feel much in-
debted, and request his acceptance of two copies of
the same book, the residue are intended for thyself,
and other friends. I have not yet time to read all the books which
thou sent me; but intend to do so very soon, and
shall write to William M. Pitt , and Jeremy Bentham .
 This is intended as a letter of business; in my next
I shall speak to thee on the subjects mentioned in thy
most valuable interesting letters, received in answer
to mine, by Charles Wilkes . Should an edition of the work, I have sent, be
printed in London, it would add much to its value, if
the last report (now sent) was printed with the ap-
pendix, as it contains results more flattering than
those of any former; some preliminary remarks, by
thyself, or Jeremy Bentham , would stamp a greater
value on the work, and give it a wider circulation. I am, with very great regard and esteem,
 Truly,
 Thy assured friend, THOMAS EDDY . New York, 7th mo. 15th, 1803. ESTEEMED FRIEND, I have the pleasure to acknowledge the receipt of
thy very acceptable and instructive letter, of 16th
February, and to request thee to accept my sincere
thanks for the information it contains; and, particu-
larly, for the truly valuable and interesting collection
of books and pamphlets, with which it was accom-
panied. These productions display, in a most stri-
king manner, the zeal of the English nation (distin-
guished above all others for its extensive practice of
Christian charity) in the great cause of benevolence
and humanity. The perusal of them will furnish
many valuable hints to myself and others, in this
 country, and animate us to follow the illustrious
example which you have set before us. Happy for
us, many of the evils which afflict and deform the
more populous societies in Europe, either do not exist
among us, or only appear in a small degree. This
exemption is the result of the peculiar state of the
country, where the wants of men are easily supplied,
the incentives to industry and enterprise numerous
and powerful, and temptations to vice comparatively
few. Thy excellent remarks, however, on public
education, and the preventive system of police, are
applicable to America, as well as every other nation;
and I have thought them of so much importance,
and so likely to do good, that I have taken the liberty
to make thy letter public; coming from one so dis-
tinguished for his knowledge on the subjects, and
whose character and station claims the highest re-
spect, they will have much greater weight than any
thing that could be said by one of our own citizens.
I trust the motives which have actuated me, will be
a sufficient apology for the freedom I have taken in
giving thy letter to the world. Your society for bettering the condition of the poor,
is a most excellent institution, and cannot fail to pro-
duce the most happy effect. This, and similar asso-
ciations, reflect the highest honour on your country.
 The immense sums bestowed in charity, and the
active exertions of so many enlightened and digni-
fied characters, in works of benevolence, is indeed
without example. If the good produced be, in any
degree, proportionate to the extent of the means em-
ployed, much misery must be prevented, and many
evils be exterminated. Your efforts in establishing a
 preventive system, and in diffusing a knowledge of
the means of self-correction to the lower classes of
society, are the wisest that can be imagined; you
strike at once at the root of the tree of evil, instead
 of lopping a branch here and there, which, sooner
or later, shoots out again in new vigour. The United States, particularly those states in
 which slavery is unknown, or almost eradicated,
possess signal advantages for securing themselves
from the dreadful evils which oppress society in Eu-
rope; happy will they be, if they have foresight and
wisdom enough rightly to estimate, and use, the
means that Providence has been pleased thus to put
into their hands. A law passed our state legislature, authorizing the
corporation of this city to erect a prison for solitary
confinement, to be solely for the punishment of petty
offenders, to be kept on low diet, and in solitary
 apartments, for a term not exceeding ninety days;
 some accounts of this plan may be seen in the
account of the State Prison, page 62. From observing
the effects of this mode of punishment, in the State
Prison, where it is used to correct those who violate
the rules of the prison, by profane swearing, quar-
relling, want of cleanliness, or neglect of their alloted
task of labour, &c., I have been led to believe it is
the most efficacious that can possibly be adopted.
The average number of convicts is nearly 400, most
of whom observe a uniform, regular, and peaceable
course of conduct; the hardened and refractory are
kept in good order, by occasional punishment in the
cells, which strikes such a terror on their minds, that
it often happens, that not a single person has been
punished for eight or ten days. Certain I am, that a
punishment of this kind will be far more beneficial
than that of the Bridewell, or even the State Prison,
for a short term; nothing so effectually subdues the
intemperate and ungovernable passions of men, and
checks the growth of depraved habits. I am appre-
hensive the prison will not be erected the present
year, but I retain a strong hope that the plan will
be carried into effect. By the Juliana, Captain Brown , I sent a small
box, containing a number of copies of the account of
the State Prison, and reports for 1802, for thyself and
friends. The flattering result of this institution, to
be found in this report, constitutes one of the most
pleasing circumstances of my life, since it not only
exhibits the practicability of a system calculated to
produce the greatest good to society, but has entirely
 removed those strong prejudices against it, in the
minds of many good men, who often treated me as
an enthusiast, and visionary, but who now are ad-
mirers of the establishment, and the warmest ad-
vocates for the present penal code. I have the farther pleasure to state, that there is
 abundant reason to conclude, that the profits on the
labour of the convicts, for tile current year, will be
considerably greater than at the time of the last
report. I inclose an abstract of the accounts for six
months, ending the 1st of the present month. Should
it be thought expedient to reprint the Account of
the Prison in London, it would add very much to
the value of the new edition, if the report last print-
ed was subjoined; and it would give it additional
credit and circulation, if some remarks were prefixed
by thee, such as would naturally occur to thy mind,
and which thy leisure might permit thee to make.
If this is undertaken, I should be glad if the book-
seller might be directed to send me one or two hun-
dred copies, to be distributed in this country, and I
will remit to him the cost. On a late visit which I made to the Penitentiary
house in New Jersey, I was disappointed to find
that the plan of the building was bad, and little
adapted to answer the design of such an establish-
ment; the Keeper appears to he a decent and respect-
able man, and well qualified for his station; the
apartments are not so cleanly as I expected to find
them. There are fifty-nine convicts confined, fifty-
seven men, and two women, who appeared decent,
orderly, and industrious; they were employed in the
 manufacture of nails, shoes, and cloth. The Inspec-
tors are very worthy citizens, who reside in the neigh-
bourhood of Trenton. They informed me, that the
profit on the labour of the convicts, was sufficient to
defray the expenses of the prison. It is about four
years since its estabishment. I also visited several times the prison of Phila-
delphia. This building was erected before the alter-
ations were made in their penal code, and is, there-
fore, not well calculated for the purpose of a peniten-
tiary. Prisoners before conviction, vagabonds, and
disorderly persons, are also kept there, and the sys-
tem of order, &c. does not appear equal to that of
New York prison. This difference is not to be im-
puted to any inability, or want of attention, of the
Inspectors of the former, but to circumstances not in
their power to control. Unfortunately for Pennsyl-
vania, the vast number of emigrants, from every
country, who have settled there, and the violence of
party spirit, tend much to distract the government,
and destroy the influence of its best citizens. The
political changes in the administration, caused by
 this spirit, have also been extended to the peniten-
tiary, and those who have most contributed to its
establishment and support, are displaced to make
way for new men, wholly unfit to manage its con-
cerns. The friends of the institution feel apprehen-
sive of the effects of this change on its future pros-
perity. It is, indeed, to be lamented, that the spirit
 of political parties should be so violent, as to check
the progress of improvement, in what so essentially
concerns the safety and happiness of all. But I must
apologize for touching on subjects of a political na-
ture, so foreign to the design of this letter, and the
 habits and pursuits of my life. The penitentiary house in Virginia has been estab-
lished about three years. The Inspectors are respecta-
ble, good men, and are appointed by the Governor and
Council, who also appoint the principal Keeper. I
am informed, political reasons influenced the Governor
and Council, in the appointment of a principal Keeper,
who disagreed with the Inspectors, and refused to
submit to their directions, and is said to be a very im-
proper person for his place. This proves the propriety
of vesting in the Inspectors the power of appointing
the Keeper, and making them responsible for his con-
duct. On the 5th January last, there were sixty-eight
convicts, who were employed mostly at making nails
and shoes. They are allowed meat only two days
in the week; other days, mush, with a small portion
of molasses and potatoes. The laws of Virginia
direct, that the male convicts shall have their heads
and beards close shaven, at least once in every week.
The foundation of a similar prison, has been laid,
this year, at Boston. The state of society in Mas-
sachusetts, is so very favourable to good order and
improvement, the opinions and habits of the people,
so consonant to the true principles of liberty and good
 government, that there is every reason to expect that
this establishment will be equal, in every respect, to
any in America, and, I have no doubt, will reflect
great honor on the state which formed it, and on the
 Inspectors who may have the management of its
internal government. The comparison made by thee, between the num-
ber of convicts in Scotland, and this state, is extreme-
ly unfavourable to the latter, and I am unwilling to
admit the inference that might be made from it. As
to the state of society here, I am certain, that a much
less number of criminals escape conviction here, than
in Great Britain, an effect that may be ascribed to
the smallness of population, the facility of detection,
great vigilance in the police, and the mildness of our
punishments. If this be true, the calendar of our
convicts may appear comparatively larger here,
while the number of crimes may be, in part, much
less than in Scotland. But, on this point, I do not
 possess sufficient information concerning that coun-
try, to draw any satisfactory conclusion. Both there
and here, spirituous liquors are, undoubtedly, the
great corrupters of morals. Alcohol, in all its modi-
fications, is the insidious enemy of virtue and happi-
ness ; it saps the foundation of all the useful qualities
that belong to man, and is the great cause of the
increase of vice and criminality. How is this wide
spreading mischief to be destroyed? By an entire
prohibition of home distillation, and a heavy impost
and excise on foreign spirits. But this is impractica-
ble here; no legislature would dare to pass such a
law, and no administration could carry it into exe-
cution. A partial application of impost and excise
has produced some effect, yet no great, in diminish-
ing the consumption in the country. It is painful
to reflect, that it is only in our power to attempt par-
tial remedies, and to endeavour to regulate what we
cannot prevent. I hope, with the assistance of
others, to procure the adoption of a plan to prevent the
 increase of taverns and dram shops in this city, and
to lessen the number of those which already exist. I regret that it is not in my power to make an ade-
quate return for the large fund of valuable informa-
tion which thou hast been so kind as to send me.
I can only reiterate my grateful thanks to thee for
thy liberal communications, and to assure thee, that
I am, with sentiments of great respect and esteem,
thy very obliged friend, THOMAS EDDY . New York, 6th month, 20th, 1804. ESTEEMED FRIEND, I have to thank thee for thy kind favour, of inclos-
ing me Lancaster 's pamphlet on education, which
has afforded me a considerable degree of satisfaction,
and I have been so much pleased with the outlines
of it, that I have had one thousand copies printed
in this city and Philadelphia. I flatter myself his
plan will be adopted in our schools, when it becomes
more generally known; and I hope to introduce it
in a very large school, which I expect soon to get
 established under the protection of our city corpora-
tion, for the benefit of poor children, who are at
present under the care of our alms house. I should
be much gratified to obtain such printed accounts as
 have been published of your schools, established on
the plan of promoting industry, as well as useful
learning. In the course of last year, some persons were
appointed inspectors of our state prison, who, in my
opinion, were no way qualified to promote the design
of the institution, and whose opinions respecting the
general management and economy were widely
different from mine, in consequence of which, my
situation there became so unpleasant, that I was
induced, in January last, to resign my place as an
inspector. I devoted seven years in endeavouring to
establish this excellent institution, and am not a
little mortified, that there is some reason to appre-
hend all my labours are like to be lost. I have,
however, the consolation of having the most satisfac-
tory and pleasing proofs of the marked approbation
of every officer in our government, and of all my
friends. Some of the convicts, about three weeks
since, set fire to the prison, and destroyed the whole
of the roof of the north wing; it is now repairing,
and will soon be under cover. This circumstance hap-
pened, in consequence of neglect in the assistant
keepers, who have all been appointed lately, as all
the old ones resigned immediately after myself and
the old inspectors. I have delivered to Captain Matlock , of the ship
Hardware, a small packet, containing reports of the
inspectors for last year, and also an account of the
New York Hospital, which has been lately published
under my direction. I am, with the greatest regard and esteem,
Thy assured friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To P. COLQUHOUN , London . London, 8th August, 1804. MY DEAR SIR, I am quite ashamed to discover, on recurring to
my correspondence on the affairs of philanthropy and
humanity, that I have been so long your debtor for
a reply to your favour of the fifteenth of July last
year, which reached me on the twenty-first of Sep-
tember following; since which period, even until
 this hour, my time has been so constantly occu-
pied, by a necessary attention to a great variety
of public business as a magistrate, a deputy lieutenant,
&c., that I have had scarce any time for those pur-
suits, to which I am so much inclined to direct my
attention. This circumstance, however, has not
prevented me from establishing two schools in the
city of Westminster, where I reside; the one for 200
boys, who, with the assistance of monitors, selected
from the most acute of the pupils, act as ushers under
one master; and I have also establised since, a school
for 200 girls, who are taught agreeably to the same
 system, by one mistress. Inclosed I send you one of the proof sheets con-
taining an account of our proceedings, by which you
will perceive the vast disparity on the score of
expense, between the new and old method of com-
municating appropriate instruction to the lower
classes of the people. I likewise send you one of
my reports, which were circulated early in the pre-
sent year, which procured us, as you will observe,
the countenance and support of the first characters
residing in this quarter of the metropolis. Mr. Lancaster has received from me every counte-
nance and protection in his laudable exertions, which
I could afford, either by advice or recommendation;
and the result has been, that many of our philan-
thropists, as well as some of our first nobility, have
visited him, and now afford him both their counte-
nance and protection; and you will perceive from the
inclosed advertisement, that he has attempted the
gigantic task of teaching by his own efforts, no less
than one thousand boys, with the assistance of monitors.
I consider his system as a great and important dis-
covery, favourable to the improvement of the rising
generation, in habits of religion and morality; and
I trust and hope, it will become universal all over
Great Britain, Ireland, and the United States; as a
means of ameliorating the state of society in future
times, and of diminishing the mass of crimes, and
the demand for punishment, among those who are to
succeed the adults of the present age, whose irregu-
larities and turpitude cannot easily be kept within
due bounds. And it is a matter of no little regret,
that where efforts are used upon proper and correct
principles, for checking crimes and penal offences,
 that we find in America, as well as here, cabals, and
individuals disposed to place obstructions in the way
of the due and proper execution of every good
measure. I am very much concerned, (from your letter of the
20th of June recently received,) that you have been
compelled to abandon the superintendence of your
excellent institution of the New York state prison.
I have no doubt, however, but the abuses, irregularities,
and want of economy, which will result from this new
and erroneous principle of management, will become
so prominent and glaring in the view of the com-
munity, as to produce that species of paramount
interference, which will bring back to the aid of this
excellent institution, those individuals who have
acquired so much credit by its original formation, and
whose success and perseverance have procured them
the approbation of all the valuable and right-thinking
part of America, and also those of the same spirit of
benevolent research in Great Britain, who have had
access to know and to admire what has been achieved. I am much obliged to you for the reports sent me
by Captain Matlack , which I hope to receive in a few
days. I have in readiness to be sent you, a series of
reports, published by our Society for bettering the
condition of the Poor, since the last that I forwarded;
and it is my intention to send you the succeeding
numbers, as they are published; also the reports of a
very active society for the suppression of vice, which
was instituted in this metropolis about three years
ago, and which has been productive of a great deal
of good, in disclosing and bringing to punishment
the perpetrators of acts of debauchery and wicked-
ness, which, from the degree of turpitude annexed to
it, almost exceeds credibility. Such are the evils
which affect large societies, that it requires the con-
stant and watchful eye of the moralist and the
philanthropist, to keep them in check. You are hap-
pily free as yet from many of these evils; and an
attention to the education of youth will be the only
means of prevention; since, in the course of time, large
cities will arise in America, and a population equal
to all Europe will cover its forests in less than a
century. I am much gratified to find that my remarks on
public education and preventive police met your
approbation. Notwithstanding the unexampled be-
nevolence and munificence which pervades this
country, the interruptions we experience in obtaining
wise and salutary laws, in consequence of the wars
in which we are unhappily involved, is very great.
This excessive calamity obstructs the adoption of
many wise and salutary regulations, which the state
of society imperiously calls for. I have circulated
your excellent work on prisons among the very first
and most elevated characters in this country and in
Ireland, and I yet indulge a hope, that in the course
of Providence we may enjoy the blessings of peace,
when an opportunity will be offered, ere long, to
follow the good example that is set before us. Your
mode of correction by solitary confinement, under
certain regulations, is excellent; and the result of
 the various experiments which have been made,
prove it to be wise and salutary, and that the measure
did not proceed from visionary or enthusiastic ideas.
Where punishment produces amendment, and restores
 offenders again to society, renovated and reformed; and
where this great desideratum can be obtained, with-
out expense to a nation or to individuals, it may be
truly affirmed, that this great and important branch
of criminal police has arrived at the greatest height
of perfection of which human institutions are sus-
ceptible: but the misfortune is, that in the affairs
of society, every thing depends on the purity, the dis-
cretion, abilities, and zeal, of those who conduct public
institutions. In good hands they flourish; while
under a less careful, zealous, and intelligent manage-
ment, they retrograde and decay. It is to a diversity
of opinion, often among well intentioned men, who
do not well consider the subject, or whose judgments
are deficient, or their passions predominant, that
many excellent institutions are imperfect in their
first concoction, and under these disadvantages, coupled
with want of intelligence and zeal in the manage-
ment, do not succeed. I am happy to hear so good
an account of the penitentiary house in New Jersey. 
That of Philadelphia is well known from the various
accounts which have been given of this excellent
 institution, and it is indeed much to be lamented,
that the spirit of party should extend its influence,
so as to disturb the economy of those establishments,
which have been instituted for the general benefit 
of the community at large. Where any public con-
cern in the minor regulations of the state is going on
well, changes constantly produce evil; and although
men of equal talents and integrity supplant those
that have been heretofore in the management of
gratuitous undertakings, the deficiency of knowledge
and experience never fail to generate evils, and to
check the progress of improvement. It is a pleasing circumstance to hear, that peni-
tentiary houses have been established in Virginia
and in Boston. Various circumstances lead me to
expect that the latter will be well managed. When-
ever political influence is interposed in the appoint-
ment of officers or managers, it rarely happens that
the best selection is made. It is certainly true, that many actual criminals
escape punishment in Great Britain, and many reign
for a number of years, and continue in the pursuit
of crimes by which they support themselves, before
the public justice of the country can be made to
attach to them; and it is also true, that in America,
from the peculiar state of society, crimes by being
easier detected and proved, allow very few culprits
to escape. But this apparent difficulty of conviction
is chiefly confined to this metropolis, and to the popu-
lous towns in different parts of the kingdom. In
Scotland, however, which does not contain one third
of the population of America, it is somewhat similar
to your country, and I am inclined to believe, except-
ing in its capital, and two or three large towns, that
very few who are guilty escape detection and pun-
ishment. The limited number of crimes in that
 country, is to be attributed chiefly to the attention
heretofore paid to the religious and moral education
of the inferior orders of society. I am sorry, however,
to learn from persons of intelligence in that country,
that the progress of wealth, arising from productive
industry, and the extension of manufactures, has
produced changes not favourable to the morals of the
people, which, of course, will have the effect to generate
crimes. Such is the evil consequences of natural
wealth suddenly acquired, that it is always counter-
balanced by evils in the opposite scale. What you have most of all to dread in America, as
a general corrupter of morals, is the want of a due
control on public houses and liquor shops, in your
bung-hole towns. Until publicans of all descriptions
are licensed, and put under strict regulations, the
abuses through this medium will increase, and pro-
duce excessive evils, which will be almost without a
remedy, if not prevented in due time. The prohibition of distillation can never be expect-
ed in any country, and therefore all we can hope for,
is a strong control over those who deal it out to the pro-
fligate and the idle, and to those who are influenced
by their example. At the commencement of the last year, I published
a tract on the duty of a constable, which I first meant
for the instruction of those in Westminster; but
in the progress of the composition, while the press
was going, I was induced to snatch an occasional
hour from public business, and to extend it so as to
apply to all England. In the appendix to this tract,
I have introduced rules and orders for publicans. I
shall send you this work, with others. You will
find in it a tolerable epitome of the manner in which
the general police of England is conducted. I wish
I could say it was conducted according to the true
and genuine spirit of the laws, upon which the sys-
tem is founded. I conclude with my best thanks for the obliging
 communications you have made to me, and the valua-
ble books and papers you have had the goodness to
send me on the interesting subject of Police. And I am, with the greatest respect and esteem,
My dear sir, your very obliged friend, P. COLQUHOUN .
 Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. 
 P.S. I am extremely gratified to hear such
favourable accounts of Francis Kerr . To your friend-
ship and humanity, he owes his being saved from
misery and destruction, and I trust his gratitude will
be commensurate to the extensive obligations he
owes you; although, at the same time, I well know
you consider yourself as amply repaid, in the satis-
faction of witnessing his reform, as the result of
your kind interference in his behalf. Bloomingdale, 9th month, 27th, 1805. ESTEEMED FRIEND, Since I had the pleasure of receiving thy much
esteemed favour of 8th of August in the last year, I
 have been several times absent on distant journeys,
and have not enjoyed my health equal to former
years, but this is not sufficient to excuse my very
great neglect, and particularly in not acknowledging
the receipt of thy very acceptable parcel of books by
the Alexander, for which be pleased accept my sin-
cere thanks. I repeatedly intended writing by dif-
ferent ships that sailed from New York, but unac-
countably put it off from one opportunity to another,
and now not being able to justify my neglect, I have
only to crave thy indulgence in excusing it. The pamphlet on guineas, &c., by Henry Boner ,
Esq., afforded me much entertainment and useful
information. The subject of paper credit is highly
interesting, and particularly so to us on this side the
Atlantic, where paper currency is largely emited by
a great number of banks, spread over almost every
state in the union. The solidity of these establish-
ments are rendered exceedingly hazardous, by dis-
counting mostly what is termed accommodation
notes, which are renewed and continued at the end
 of sixty days, and go on year after year. The bank
notes issued of course must be very considerable,
without any thing solid to represent them, except
the credit of the names of the drawer and endorser.
In my apprehension, the business of banks should be
confined to discounting what is termed business
notes, except only under some peculiar circumstances,
otherways the credit of the banks is liable to be
materially injured. I am not well acquainted with the affairs of our
Prison, since myself and colleagues resigned our
 places. The present inspectors, in my opinion, are
not so suitable characters for the government of that
institution, as might have been selected amongst our
citizens; the mode of treating the prisoners is in
 some respects more severe than was thought neces-
sary by the former board of inspectors, and the profits
on the labour of the convicts are considerably short of
what was produced the year ending 1st July 1803.
Cleanliness and good order throughout the prison, is
perhaps as well observed as formerly, and notwith-
standing the increased expense for supporting the
prison, the legislature remains firmly attached to our
present criminal code, and I trust it will continue an
ornament to our country, and serve as an example
to other governments. The excellent sentiments contained in thy several
letters and the pamphlets thou so kindly sent me, has
so interested me in the subject of affording a suitable
education to the children of the poor, that I have been
much engaged in a new establishment for schooling
poor children, who are not provided for by any
religious society. Our state legislature have passed
an act incorporating this society; the mayor of the
city is president, and the public appear much inte-
rested in its support. I trust the poor will derive
great benefit by means of it, and we expect next
winter our legislature will provide sufficient funds
for supporting it. It must afford great pleasure to
every feeling mind, that the plan of affording reli-
gious and moral instruction to the poor of your
country, has so much engaged the attention of so
great a number of highly respectable characters, and
I sincerely hope the time is not very far distant,
when you will have the countenance and assistance
of your government in improving your poor laws,
which undoubtedly have hitherto tended to increase
the number, and indeed the misery of the poor. I beg thou wilt accept of my most hearty thanks,
for the reports of the Society for Bettering the Condi-
tion of the Poor, which I expect to receive the next
time of my going to the environs of the city. I should be much gratified, if thou wouldst be so
good as to inform me of the present state of the school
under the care of Lancaster . I wrote him about two
years ago, but possibly my letter did not reach him,
as I had not the satisfaction of hearing from him. With great regard and esteem,
 I am, very sincerely,
 Thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY . London, 10th October, 1806. DEAR SIR, I have postponed acknowledging the receipt of
your acceptable favour, of the 9th September, last
year, from month to month, in hopes of being able to
make such communications on the subject of political
economy, as I conceived ought to be acceptable; but
my public duties have become so multifarious, as to
afford me less time than I could wish, although I can
conscientiously say, that I do not waste a moment in
any pursuit that has not public or private utility for
its object. The banking system, if conducted on
a proper principle, has certainly a great tendency to
give efficacy and extension to human labour, which,
you well know, is the only source of wealth in every
 country; and, perhaps, no nation upon earth has
been more indebted to the powerful effect of credit
and confidence than this, in giving a spring to the
industry and enterprise of the people, and thereby
 rendering every species of human labour extremely
 productive. I have been turning my thoughts a good
deal of late to this interesting branch of political
economy, as it relates to the effect produced in Great
Britain, through this medium, and the result of my
 researches have perfectly astonished me. Seeing
that the rapid increase of our taxes, and the enor-
mous public expense, occasioned by the war, did not
appear to diminish, in the smallest degree, the splen-
dour of living, or the general comfort of the people,
I was induced to search for the causes which pro-
duced what appeared to me to be a very extraordi-
nary phenomenon, namely, the sources from whence
have sprung those forty millions, for the purposes of
the state, and five millions and upwards, for the sup-
port of the poor, and other purposes, and to leave
behind a surplus sufficient to enable so considerable
a proportion of our population to live in ease and
affluence. I was apprehensive all was not sound,
because, in order to support this expense, a new pro-
perty from labour must be created yearly; and, the
question to be solved was this, in what manner,
and by what means is it exacted?—I found after
much research, that it arose solely from six branches
of industry, and that these, upon a full investigation
of the subject, upon which I recently occupied myself
 without intermission, for four weeks, secluded in the
country, amounted to the enormous sum of 222,000,000
pounds sterling yearly!-—The produce of the land, in
vegetable and animal productions, has arisen to a
height beyond all belief, while the bowels of the
earth yield a very large sum annually, from mines
and minerals. Our manufactures, of every kind,
 produced from labour and machinery, invigorated
by skill, enterprise, and capital, in working up raw
materials, have so exceedingly augmented, that our
exports alone are ascertained to exceed forty millions
sterling a year. Our foreign commerce exhibits an
export and import, which, together, exceed one hun-
dred millions annually, and all these sources have
been progressively increasing, while our colonial
East India possessions add considerably to the great
mass of property which centres in the country. 1st. The value of what is created by
the produce of the land, including
corn, cattle, horses, sheep, butter,
cheese, hay, wood, &c. &c. turns out,
upon close examination, to exceed
in value 95,000,000l. 2d. The produce of mines and minerals 7,000,000 3d. The net produce of manufactures,
after deducting the cost of the raw
materials, at least 90,000,000 4th. The value of food, obtained by
the coast, for horses, from labour 1,000,000 5th. The profit arising from foreign
commerce, and for horses 25,000,000 6th. The money remitted from colo-
nial and East India possessions, to
individuals residing in this country,
and thereby making a part of the
national income, 4,000,000 Total, 222,000,000l. Such are the resources of the country, by which it
is enabled (exclusively of the resources of Scotland
and Ireland) to oppose itself to one of the most power-
ful tyrants that ever assailed the liberties of man-
kind, or afflicted the nations of Europe.—And, after
all, this income is confined to nine millions of people,
in England and Wales; and, high as the taxes are,
even including 10 per cent. upon income, they do
not exceed 18 per cent. upon the new property annu-
ally created; while the national debt in sterling
money is not yet much above two years value of the
national income, while the sinking fund, applicable to
its reduction, now amounts to twelve millions a year,
and from the accumulating operation which it pos-
sesses, is daily increasing. Such, my good sir, is the effect of well directed
labour, aided by skill, enterprise, and capital; and
such are the means by which England continues to
enjoy that elevated height to which she has attained.
Yet, these advantages are not without their evils,
and disadvantages. In the year 1688, (118 years ago,)
Mr. Gregory King , an eminent political economist of
the 17th century, estimated the national income at
48 millions, on a population of 5,500,000 persons;
now, it is estimated at 222,000,000l. in a population
of somewhat less than nine millions, in England
and Wales. The incovenience we feel, is, that dis-
soluteness of manners, and moral and criminal
offences, increase with the opulence of the country. Our poor, either wholly or partially, maintained at
the public expense, have been found, upon an accu-
rate investigation, to exceed 1,040,000 persons, and
the whole annual expense, applicable to them alone,
is somewhat more than 4,700,000l. a year, which ex-
ceeds the whole revenue of most of the nations of
Europe, and is more than that of Denmark and Swe-
den put together. In order, as far as possible, to counteract this gan-
grene in the body politic, and to give energy and
effect to the industry of the country, and to contri-
bute to its happiness and prosperity, I have publish-
ed, this last Summer, a tract on the education of the
poor, which I send you, under cover. I know you
will read it with avidity, because it is not only a
subject in which you have, on all occasions, very
much interested yourself, but because it is treated in
a manner somewhat new, while it contains many
strong points, calculated not only to excite attention,
 but, I trust, to be useful in America, and in every
civilized country. I am, at present, engaged in com-
piling another work on the subject of the poor, which
is also treated in a manner different from other au-
thors who have written on the subject. I hope, in a
couple of months, to present it to the public, when I
shall not fail to send you a copy; and, I trust, it
may be found to contain matter applicable to Ame-
rica, where the morals in vulgar life are so assimi-
lated to those of England, that the same remedies
will apply in both countries. You will see, however,
in the treatise on education, that I have given some
details, relative to the criminality of the country,
 which I have enlarged upon in the treatise on indi-
gence, which now occupies my attention. The war
eases us of many idle and dissolute characters, who
find employment in the army and navy; yet, the
calendar of delinquency greatly exceeds what could
be wished, and much remains to be done to counter-
act the evils which opulence produces in society,
 joined to a want of proper attention to the religious
and moral instruction of the poor. You will see,
from the subject of this letter, that it is only meant
for your own eye, or that of your private friends.
 I shall soon write you again, and send you the report,
published last year, by our society for bettering the
condition of the poor. I fear nothing but legislative
measures, adapted to the present state of society, will
produce that general amelioration, which is so much
 wanted. I remain, with the greatest regard and esteem,
Dear Sir, your sincere and affectionate friend, P. COLQUHOUN .
Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. London, 26th July, 1808. MY DEAR SIR, I send you a series of the reports which have been
published for Bettering the Condition of the Poor,
since I last had the pleasure of transmitting the
former ones. I shall, in a short time, have the plea-
sure of addressing you on our economical system
here. I lament to say, that the dreadful state of
Europe, I mean the continent, tormented by the decrees
of its extraordinary ruler, excluding all commercial
 intercourse; tearing from the peaceful citizens their best
hopes, their youth, by an anticipated conscription extend-
ing to the year 1810, to fight the battles of ambition to
aggrandize his family; the violence done to the great
body of the catholics on the continent, by the degradation
of the Pope of Rome; and, above all, the treachery by
which the Spanish Government is attempted to be
wrested from its ancient sovereigns, with whom, as it
now appears, the mass of the people were well satisfied,
are features of a nature so atrocious, as when taken
together, and working, all at once, on the minds of
so many millions of people, can scarcely fail to pro-
duce results which must bring this lamentable con-
test, so productive of the effusion of human blood, to
some important crisis. We have indeed lived in an
extraordinary age, which certainly has no parallel
in the history of the whole world. The affairs of
Spain now become extremely interesting, but time
alone can develop the result of this extraordinary
struggle. The Spaniards have now passed the
Rubicon, and can scarcely recede. The eyes of all
Europe are turned towards them, and I verily believe
there is only one wish prevails, if they durst (like
this country) avow it, and that wish is, that they
may be successful. Adieu, my dear sir; believe me always,
Yours, sincerely, P. COLQUHOUN .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. Lymington, Hampshire, 12th Sept., 1808. MY DEAR SIR, I have been waiting from month to month, in con-
sequence of the constant revolving of things in Europe,
in the expectation that the gloom which had over-
cast the political hemisphere would have been dis-
pelled, and that 1 should be able to resume my too
long protracted correspondence, by the contemplation
of subjects more congenial to your feelings and my
own, than those which the present times have gene-
 rated. My constant occupations too, as a magistrate,
presiding in a court of justice every day of my life,
(Sundays only excepted,) while I am in London, joined
to other important occupations, I am sure will plead
my apology for delaying for so long a period, to
notice your two obliging letters of the nineteenth
of March and fifth June, last year, which I am ashamed
to say, that I now find among my unanswered let-
ters. For a good many years past, I have been able
to arrange matters, so as to be able to retire with
my family for a few weeks during the summer sea-
son to some part of the country near the sea; and in
this seclusion, I generally devote my time to that
species of business which my numerous public duties
in the metropolis oblige me to postpone. I have,
therefore, brought to this retired picturesque country
all my unavoidably postponed letters; and among
the rest, your two favours above mentioned. It cannot fail to afford me the most heartfelt satis-
faction to learn, that the works I send you on Indi-
gence, and on the Education of the Poor, are likely,
 under the sanction of your patriotic exertions, to
prove useful in ameliorating the state of society in
America, and of diffusing comfort and happiness
among the inferior orders in the United States, who
constitute the mass of the people in all nations. A
disposition certainly exists in this country, to adopt
many of the public measures I have recommended;
but I have written at an era, when in the rapid
succession of the most extraordinary events, fears
have been generated, even for the security of the
liberties and independence of our own country,
 arising from the growing power of the ruler of
France, and the wreck of nations, and ancient king-
doms and states, which have, in rapid succession, been
brought under his sway; and hence, from an atten-
tion to the primary object of guarding against dan-
gers, which appeared to become more and more
imminent, all considerations connected with internal
economy, are either neglected or postponed—and my
chief, and only consolation, under such circumstances,
 is this, that having put my statements and proofs upon
record, and finding that they meet the approbation of
all good men, that the time will come, (perhaps when
I cease to exist in this world,) when these writings will
be legislated upon: and that essential benefit will be
derived from them to millions of people yet unborn,
not only in my own country, but in many parts of
the civilized world. You and I, my dear sir, have indeed lived in won-
derful times: since the wildest efforts of the most
romantic fancy could not have imaged the extraor-
dinary events, which for the last fifteen years, have
been passing under our review; and it should seem
that Europe is now upon the eve of tracing back the
steps, which have already so much convulsed it.
The events which have recently taken place in Spain,
indicate a complete revolution in the government and
character of the people of that country, who, according
to all human appearance, are likely to succeed in
their arduous struggle; the result of which will be,
that they will secure to themselves a greater portion
of civil liberty, and may become a great and a pow-
erful people: while other nations on the continent,
emulating their example, and stimulated by their
success, may also be able greatly to improve their
existing hard and miserable condition. Towards the
 completion of these great events, under Providence,
England is likely, by her prowess and opulence,
greatly to contribute, and thereby to re-establish her
 influence and preponderance in the scale of Europe.
This state of things cannot escape the penetrating
minds of the rulers of America; and I trust will
 incline them to cling closer to the parent country,
and be less disposed to indulge partialities to foreign
countries, where councils are more insidious, and
where political views and maxims have never, in one
 instance, been directed towards the real interest of
the United States; who, if they concede, or appear
to concede any thing, it is only with a view to make
America an instrument in the hands of France, to
assist her in the ruin and the subjugation of Great
Britain, that she may aftewards, in the plenitude of
her power, also subjugate America. When all hopes of commercial intercourse seemed
to be at an end, with respect to the continent—when
all the powers submitted to the mandates of a
formerly obscure individual—Three short months
have produced most extraordinary events—The great
peninsula of Spain and Portugal have thrown off the
yoke. Their ports are not only open, but they are
 actually now become the allies of Great Britain!—
What a change!—how vain the hopes of men!—
how uncertain the issue of the schemes of the most
powerful and the most fortunate dealer in war. An
all wise Providence frustrates at once the arrogant
pretensions of the boldest, and for a while, the most
successful adventurer. Lamentable to say, it should seem, that the strug-
gle for dominion, and the din and clangour of war
is only commencing. Formerly, it was between an
usurper and ancient sovereigns: now, it is between
the people at large, struggling for liberty, and the
different usurpers of ancient thrones. The shutting
 up the ports of Europe—depriving the Pope of his ter-
ritories—the treacherous conduct of the ruler of France
towards Portugal and Spain, and their respective sove-
reigns—and the forced anticipated conscriptions to the
year 1810, tearing three, instead of one son, from the
bosom of their families, to gratify the ambition of
one individual:—all these measures taking effect
within a few months of each other, and all of them,
either producing immediate distress, or working upon
the religious prejudices of the mass of the people,
could scarcely fail to produce convulsion;—and hence,
already symptoms of the spirit of resistance mani-
fested by Spain, begin to manifest themselves in
Italy, and other parts of Europe, indicating disposition
towards new revolutions, and new scenes of rapine
and bloodshed. It must be so, in order to improve
the state of society, since the result of the measures
 and policy of Buonaparte, has been only to bind the
people faster in chains, and to make his vassal kings
the contemptible instruments whereby these chains
were to be rivetted upon themselves and their people.
It is only, I fear, by new revolutions, therefore, that
the ameliorated state of things, which you conceive
likely to arise out of the troubles in Europe, are to be
effected. In the meantime, England has gained a
great point with respect to her commerce; since, not
only all Spain and Portugal, but their vast posses-
sions in the west and east, will be opened to this
 country; since these countries and their future inde-
pendence have only been saved, under Providence, by
her paramount naval power, and her prompt assist-
ance by armies, military stores, clothing, arms, and
 money. Let us hope that these evils will determine America
to enter into a close alliance with this country—she
has nothing to fear from France. Her embargo has
rather been of service than otherwise to England.
 It will probably throw into the hands of the British
the French colonies of Guadeloupe and Martinique.
It will compel this country to call forth all the ener-
gies of the British American colonies, by large boun-
ties and other encouragements, to cultivate, in a greater
degree, those articles which the United States were
accustomed to send to the British West Indies, in
order to be secured against the recurrence of a similar
measure—another embargo. The privations suffered
by a temporary suspension of trade between Britain
 and America, will be useful to both countries. It
will enable the people to pay their old debts, with-
out, at the same time, commencing new ones, and will
cause a great capital to enter with the British credi-
tor. I declare to you, I never could view the embar-
go in the light of a misfortune to this country—I
rather consider it as an advantage. My treatise on
indigence will show you how small a proportion of
the national wealth is derived from commerce, great
and unexampled in point of extent as it unquestion-
ably is—perhaps equal to all the nations of Europe
put together. In another point of view, it may be considered, under
Providence, to be the only bar that existed to the
 total subjugation of all Europe and America to the
yoke of France. If her maritime power had not
existed, and she had abstained from, or waved what
she calls her maritime rights, upon which her power
chiefly depends, what would have become of the
world at this era? The United States, but for this
 powerful barrier, must have ultimately fallen under
the power of the tyrant of Europe; whose ambition
has no bounds, and who may justly be considered as
a scourge in the hands of the Almighty, to punish the
offences of the nations of Europe, and permitted to
reign for a time. Let us hope that his career is
nearly at a close; and that the nations of Europe,
convinced of the folly and the great calamities of
war, will resolve to cling to the olive branch, and
cultivate the arts of peace. America, above all
 countries in the world, ought to avoid war—she is
every way vulnerable, without the means of defence.
England is not what she was during the war of the
revolution. Her unexampled naval power has ban-
ished the belligerent flag every where from the ocean;
and powerful as the French are on land, yet when
they come in contact with British troops on that
 element, they are compelled (as has been seen almost
in every instance) to yield the palm to British valour
and discipline. Let us, therefore, hope that England
and America will form a permanent union, as the
best means of preserving the peace of the world, and
promoting the best interests of the human species. The attainment of this great object now that
men's minds are becoming more enlightened, would
open an extensive field among the higher ranks of
society, for diffusing those blessings which would be
 conferred upon mankind by good laws, and useful
regulations in civil polity. Much as has been done,
it is yet but little in comparison to what is still
required to complete this great work. I would wil-
lingly flatter myself, when the happy period of peace
arrives, that the improvements will not be confined
to the British dominions, but will extend over all
Europe, and the civilized world. The lower orders of the people, from whose labour
we derive all that we possess, have never been
 proper objects of attention in any country. Much
might be done to render them better subjects and
citizens—to extend to them greater comforts, by a
stronger sense of religious and moral duties; and to
add much to the means of subsisting themselves and
families in a better manner. The wise and benevo-
lent rulers and statesmen in every country, have much
in their power in this respect; whereby a nation
may be rendered happy and contented with its
government, indisposed to changes and revolutions,
 and prone by industry and sober habits to add to the
state of national happiness. Perhaps, at no period
in the history of this country, has there existed so
great a disposition among the well educated ranks
to promote these benevolent views. But war—fatal
war—checks the progress of every thing that is good.
Let me hope so great a calamity will never afflict
the United States. The efforts of individuals are
useful in promoting all benevolent purposes: but the
aid and countenance of the State is necessary, to give
permanency and consistency to all measures tending
to ameliorate the condition of the labouring people;
and to check, where it is necessary, the zeal of indi-
viduals, when not accompanied by good judgment.
Hence the immense sums bequeathed in England for
benevolent purposes, under circumstances often so
crude, indigested, and whimsical, as to be productive of
more injury than benefit. Hence, the injuries arising
from these excellent institutions, the Friendly Socie-
ties, as now constituted in this country. We have
resources within our grasp, capable of compassing
any thing, and every thing, that is good, praiseworthy,
and benevolent, if we could be made to see how we
 should avail ourselves of our powers. I trust that
period is fast approaching, and that new and better
prospects will enliven our declining years. I rejoice exceedingly, to find that the schools you
 have benevolently established through the medium
of a society in New York, assisted by my publication
on the education of the poor, according to Doctor
Bell's excellent plan, has succeeded to an extent equal
to your most sanguine expectations. I will be very
thankful to you for a copy of the report, which the
trustees proposed to publish, as soon as it is printed.
It occurs to me that an account of the origin, use, and
progress of these schools, with the advantages which
have resulted from them, accompanied by some useful
reflections, would form an excellent article in the
periodical reports of our society for bettering the con-
dition of the poor: and if you will have the goodness
to draw up a paper on the subject, with that particu-
lar view, I will take care to get it inserted. It may
induce many in this country to follow your laudable
 example. The bill brought in to the Commons' House of Par-
liament, for the establishment of parochial schools in
England and Wales, was lost in the house of lords.
The system proposed had by no means the approba-
tion of many respectable persons, who had bestowed
much time in considering the subject; but when
peace is restored, the question will no doubt be again
agitated—or perhaps sooner. On the twenty-sixth July, I wrote you a short letter,
with the reports of the society for bettering the con-
dition of the poor which have been published since 
the former series of reports were sent you. I shall
be glad to hear that they have reached you in safety.
Soon after, I retired with my family for a couple of
months for the benefit of sea-bathing, several of them
having enjoyed bad health for a considerable length
of time, and 1 found a little relaxation necessary for
myself, in consequence of the fatigues of business.
I brought as usual with me, your letters, with many
others, which the pressure of public business in town
would not permit me to attend to; and these, with
my daily correspondents on official and other busi-
ness, joined to some important state papers, which
required to be drawn up by me with that degree of
attention which could be best done in solitude, has
kept me constantly employed. I am happy to say,
that my family are considerably improved in health,
and I feel myself better of the country air, necessary
at my time of life, being now in my sixty-fourth year,
 and not enjoying very good health. Mrs. Eddy has not called on me as 1 expected she
would do, and the truth is, that having received your
 letter when at Brighton last year, and endorsing it
with other letters which did not require an immedi-
ate reply, and having a great deal of business on my
hands after my return home, I was prevented from
 referring to it, and under the pressure of other affairs
it totally escaped me; but 1 have now taken down
Mrs. Eddy 's direction in my common place book, and
the moment I return to town, and can find a vacant
hour (of which I have very few) 1 will make a point
of calling upon her, and shall rejoice to have it in my
power to render her any acceptable services, either
by my advice or otherwise. On the subject of the Brantingham Tract, I have
addressed a separate letter to you and Mr. Johnson
jointly, to which 1 beg leave to refer yoti. I remain, with great regard and esteem,
My dear sir, your very affectionate friend, P. COLQUHOUN . New York, 5th month, 19th, 1815. MY DEAR FRIEND, A number of benevolent persons of the city of
Hartford, in Connecticut, have formed an association,
with a view to establish an institution for the instruc-
tion of the deaf and dumb; and being desirous of
availing themselves of the information gained by
those who have conducted similar establishments in
Europe, they have deputed the bearer, Thomas H.
Gallaudet, to make a visit to England and France.
 I beg leave to introduce him to thy kind notice, and
shall esteem it as a peculiar favour, if thou wilt afford
him such advice and assistance, as may aid him in
prosecuting the great and good work in which he has
embarked. I send by my friend Gallaudet , a packet contain-
ing a few pamphlets. A view of New York state prison, published the
present year. Hints for introducing an improved mode of
 treating the insane, by T. Eddy . Report of the Philadelphia Association of Friends
for the instruction of poor children. Report of the governors of the New York Hospital. Report of the Free School Society of New York. A solemn review of the custom of war, showing
 that war is the effect of popular delusion, &c. I do not know who wrote the view of our state
prison; it appears to me the information it contains
is very correct. The institution is now conducted
by persons who are very capable of managing its
concerns. The great benefits derived to the public,
by the alterations of our present system, is acknow-
ledged by all our citizens, and similar establishments
of prisons have taken place in almost every state. I am, with much respect and esteem,
Thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To P. COLQUHOUN , London. Hold gate, near York, 20th of 7th month, 1815. DEAR FRIEND, It was pleasing to me to receive a letter from thee,
with the testimony of thy continued remembrance
and regard; and it afforded me additional satisfac-
tion to believe, that as life advances, and its close
 approaches, thy solicitude for the welfare of thy fel-
low creatures, and a preparation for thy own final
well being, is more and more ardent and impressive.
A little longer period will manifest to us both, the
 infinite importance of this solicitude and preparation. I am pleased to perceive by thy letter, that many
of you at New York, are deeply interested in pro-
moting the recovery and relief of insane persons; and
I hope you will be encouraged in the pursuit of this
benevolent and good work. I did not know how I could better answer thy
views and wishes, respecting your proposed asylum,
than by putting thy pamphlet and letter into the
 hands of my benevolent and zealous friend, Samuel
Tuke, who has paid great attention to this subject;
and I am gratified with introducing you to the
acquaintance of each other. Thy request to me respecting the plan for an asy-
lum, came very seasonably. The magistrates for the
West Riding of Yorkshire, intending to erect an insti-
tution for pauper lunatics, advertised for plans, and
gave out correspondent instructions. The result was,
the production of a great number and variety of
plans. That one which obtained the preference and
the highest premium, thou will find delineated in
the Practical Hints of Samuel Tuke , which I send
to thee with this letter. This pamphlet was very
lately published, and was composed by him, to satisfy
the justices on several important points; and I believe
it received their warm approbation. The work will,
 I doubt not, be very gratifying to thee. Thou will
perceive that, in order to adapt the plan to your
views at New York, he has introduced into it some 
modifications. On the whole, I venture to presume,
that the Practical Hints, the letter of my friend
Samuel Tuke to thee, and the modified plan of the
intended Wakefield Asylum, will very materially
assist you in adopting such a building and establish-
ment, as will answer the end you have in view. I have pleasure in being the instrument of convey-
ing to thee these subjects of information; and remain Thy sincere and affectionate friend, LINDLEY MURRAY .
 To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. 
 P.S.—My wife joins me in kind remembrance to
thy dear wife. Remember me also kindly to thy
ingenious son, who obligingly sent me copies of his
very neatly executed maps. New York, 11th month, 23th, 1815. MY DEAR FRIEND, Inclosed is the copy of a letter, addressed by me
to Barent Bleecker , of Albany. I beg to claim thy
attention to the subject of this letter, and if, in thy
opinion, it would be advisable for the Board of Direc-
tors of our Canal Company to offer a memorial to
the legislature, embracing the several matters con-
tained in the letter, it is probable it will be adopted
by the Board; if any thing further occurs to thy
mind on the subject, please inform me. Thou wilt recollect that, when I had the pleasure
of seeing thee at Albany, we agreed, that it would
be highly proper for the people in the western part
of the State, to send to the legislature, this winter, a
memorial, urging in strong terms the necessity of
adopting some plan, for improving the internal navi-
gation of this State, by means of Canals, &c., and
proposing one to be made from Rome to Salina.
 Benjamin Wright engaged to correspond with thee
on the subject of such a memorial; he is very active
in endeavouring to promote the plan of beginning
at Rome. I am perfectly satisfied, that unless you 
in the western country will come forward, and by a
memorial press the subject on the legislature, we
 shall not be likely to get any thing done. Please
write me as soon as convenient; and believe me, very
respectfully and truly, thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To ROBERT TROUP , ESQ. New York, 11th month, 11th, 1815. RESPECTED FRIEND, My friend, Judah Colt , Esq. of Erie, proposed for
me to send the inclosed letter for Samuel Huntington ,
Esq. to thy care, as he could not inform me to what
place to direct it; thou wilt please forward it to our
 friend, Samuel Huntington , as soon as in thy power.
I have left the letter open for thy perusal, and should
be glad if thou wouldst take a copy of it, which may
serve to show to thy friends, as you are all equally
interested in the subject alluded to in the letter—and
if it meets thy approbation, I should be glad if thou
would act in the same manner, as if it was addressed
immediately to thyself. This important subject, I
trust, will claim thy most serious and close attention,
and that with our friend Huntington , you will jointly
adopt some plan, to excite an interest in the minds
of your most intelligent and influential characters,
in different parts of the State. I am, however, well
satisfied, that nothing would so effectually hasten the
business, as a communication being made on the
 subject from your legislature to ours. Very few of
the members of our legislature are acquainted with
the geography of your country, and the close con-
nexion of your waters with Lake Erie, by which a
communication may be easily opened extending to
the Hudson, binding together the interests of both
States, by means of a close friendship, and extended
trade and commerce. I shall be much pleased to hear
from thee by mail, and am, &c. THOMAS EDDY .
To E. AUSTIN , Ohio. New York, 11th mo., 11th, 1815. RESPECTED FRIEND, I have had considerable conversation with our
mutual friend, Judah Colt , Esq. of the town of Erie,
on the subject of the proposed Canal from Erie to
the Hudson, and being extremely desirous of know-
ing the sentiments of the citizens of your State rela-
ting to a plan, that appears to me, so interesting to
you as well as to us, I take the liberty, in conformity
to the recommendation of my friend Colt , to crave of
thee, to give me such information as may be in thy
power. I have been, for twenty years, a Director in
the West Inland Canal Company of this State, and
have frequently visited our western country; and as
one of the Commissioners appointed by our legisla-
ture, for the consideration of all matters relating to
the improvement of the internal navigation of the
State, I explored in company with the said Com-
missioners all our western waters, as far as Lake
Erie. I mention these circumstances, merely to
account for the zeal I may discover, in wishing to
promote an object of the highest importance, and
incalculable value, as it regards the state of New
York, and most of the other States in the Union.
No person who has sufficiently reflected on the sub-
ject, would hesitate one moment on account of the
cost, as it is a well known fact, that the resources of
this State alone, are fully equal to the undertaking.
During the late war, the subject of course did not
command much public attention, but since we have
enjoyed the blessings of peace, the minds of most of
our citizens appear to be anxious to have it accom-
plished. Still we shall have many difficulties to en-
counter—with the timid, who are afraid of the expense
—and the ignorant, who are incapable of apprecia-
ting its importance and advantages. I have lately
 received a letter from a gentleman, who resides on the
Allegany River in this State, who states he has lately
been in the State of Ohio, as far as the falls of the 
Ohio, and that your citizens appear to take a very
decided part in favour of promoting the contemplated
 connexion of the waters of Lake Erie with the Hud-
son River; and he adds, that many persons expressed
an anxious desire, that your legislature should make
a communication to our legislature on the subject,
stating the great advantages that would be afforded
to the State of New York, if this grand project was
once accommplished. On this I crave to remark, and
beg thy particular attention. If your legislature
could be induced to make such a communication,
there is not the least doubt to be entertained, but
that it would have so much weight with our legis-
lature, as to induce them immediately to commence
the work. It is true, the commissioners, as well
as others, have endeavoured to make the legislature
understand, that the Canal of course would draw
 your trade to New York, but owing to a want of
knowledge of the geography of the country, they are,
many of them, incapable of forming a correct judg-
ment on the subject. It will then be readily con-
ceived, how much it might enlighten their minds,
and influence their judgments, if a suitable commu-
nication was made in the manner before mentioned.
I beg leave to refer this part of the subject to thy
serious attention, and possibly it may correspond
with thy views, to use thy influence, and unite it
with other influential characters in your State, to
introduce it before your legislature. Our sessions
commence at Albany in January. Congress have
large tracts of land in your State—suppose your
legislature should apply for a grant of a portion of
 land, expressly for the purpose of promoting the com-
pletion of the Canal, and then you were to offer it to
the legislature of New York, on condition that the citi-
zens and produce of the State of Ohio, should pass
through the Canal and Locks without paying toll.
This is offered as a hint for your examination; you
are more capable of judging as to the mode and man-
 ner of making the communication. I will add, that
if it should he concluded, that such a communication
ought to be made, it would have an incalculable good
effect, if it could be presented to our legislature
about the time that the Commissioners offer their
annual report. This may be done, if your legisla-
ture meets in January, as I am informed it will. I send by the mail, two copies of our reports to
the legislature, and a letter from Robert Fulton to
G. Morris , on the advantage of Canal navigation. I
shall be very glad to hear from thee soon by mail, And am, &c., THOMAS EDDY .
To SAMUEL HUNTINGTON , Ohio. Geneva, Ontario County, 29th December, 1815. MY DEAR SIR, I was favoured, about ten days ago, with your
letter of the 28th ultimo, enclosing the copy of one
from you, of a prior date, to Mr. Barent Bleecker . The shortness of the days, and the pressure of my
agency business, with some other circumstances, not
necessary to be mentioned, have prevented me from
returning you an earlier answer. As yet, I have received no communication from
Mr. Wright , on the subject of the memorial, which
he was to set on foot, at Rome, and other places. Last week there was a meeting of the Directors
of the Seneca Canal Company, in this village; and
I embraced the opportunity, which the meeting
afforded, of consulting the Directors on the expediency
of the proposed Canal, from Rome to Salina. I found
them unanimously of opinion, that the measure was
well calculated to improve the navigation—that it
ought to be zealously pursued—and that they would
individually contribute their best endeavours to pro-
mote its success. The work of canalling the Seneca Falls, is pro-
gressing with every prospect of being completed by 
next October, if sufficient additional funds can be
procured for the purpose. The contractor for the
 work is a Mr. Marshal Lewis ; this gentleman seems
to unite rare talents, with uncommon application,
and exemplary integrity; and he has thus far
brought forward the work in a style supposed to
surpass, as well in durability as in appearance, any
canal work in the United States. This fortunate
 result, however, is in great part to be ascribed to a
species of stone, discovered by Mr. Lewis , at the head
of the Seneca Lake; which is taken from the quarry
in large masses, is of a blueish colour, and though of
solid texture, yet it is sufficiently soft to yield, with
ease, to the stroke of the hammer. Mr. Lewis has
gone so far beyond his contract, in the good quality
of his work, that the sum he is to receive will fall
near ten thousand dollars short of what is requisite
to finish it; to supply which deficiency the Directors
intend to apply to the liberality of the legislature. All our accounts from the settlers in the neigh-
bourhood of Lake Ontario, and from the traders re-
siding within our territory, but doing more or less
business in Montreal, agree that the British have their
eyes wide open, to the importance of the trade of
this country, and are adopting measures to secure it.
Among other means, they have put in train the build-
ing of steam boats on the Lake, to carry freight to
and from Fort Wellington, late Prescott; and they
are, moreover, contemplating the improvement of the
navigation of the St. Lawrence, by canalling the
rapids; which, it is said, will not be a very difficult
undertaking. Such being the policy of the British, it behooves
our state to wake from its slumber—to be active,
and to strain every sinew of its ability, to counter-
act it. I need not observe, on the almost wonderful
increase of wealth, which the state would derive
from a constant and uninterrupted flow of the pro-
ducts of this large and fertile district, into the cities 
of Albany and New-York. The very idea of part-
ing with this wealth, by suffering the products to
be carried to Montreal, there to nourish and fatten
the commerce of a rival nation, cannot fail to excite
 painful reflections in the minds of every man whose
heart is warmed with the love of country. I say,
that the state ought to strain every nerve of its ability,
to counteract the policy of the British, because the
 magnitude of the object utterly forbids all hope of
accomplishing it by the money contributions of
individuals What renders it more imperiously the duty of the
state to interpose with its ability, is the absolute neces-
sity of regulating the rates of toll by a scale so mode-
rate, as to make the expense of transportation to Albany
palpably less than the expense of transportation to
Montreal. This is the grand desideratum to be aimed
at in every scheme for improving the Lake navigation
between the Lakes and Hudson's River. If the expense
of carriage to Albany exceeds the expense of car-
riage to Montreal, the trader will be sure to send his
produce to the latter only ; and, if the expense be
equal, he will be apt to do the same, in as much as
the Lake, and its outlet, form the natural highway
for conveying the products of this country to an
 Atlantic market, and the use of this highway is at-
tended with less trouble and risk, and with greater
despatch. At all times, and under all circumstances,
it is difficult to change the course of nature, with
 success; and, in the present case, it can only be done
by giving the trader a deep interest in preferring the
Eastern to the Northern route. The expense of transporting a barrel of flour from
this village to Montreal, is one dollar and seventy-five
cents; whereas the expense of transportation to
Albany is two dollars and fifty cents; and, as long
as this difference continues, Montreal will be likely
to maintain a successful competition with Albany and
New York. You will readily perceive, my dear sir, from what
has been said, that I place no confidence whatever,
in the power of any company, incorporated on the
basis of private credit, to rescue us from the criminal
act of permitting the British to sever from the body
of our commerce what may be truly called its right
arm. I conceive that the stream of our western
 trade can only be forced into the Hudson by the
mighty power of our legislature. It is, therefore,
my clear opinion, that it will be the true policy of
our company to lay the axe to the root of the evil,
by going to the legislature with a frank and manly
memorial, representing the immense value of our
western trade—the measures which the British ap-
pear to be contemplating to monopolize it—the high
importance of defeating those measures—the utter
impracticability of effecting this great object, by the
efforts of any incorporated companies, relying on the
funds and credit of individuals—and praying the
legislature to put in requisition its vast resources,
and by exerting them, to save the state from the dis-
honour and the mischiefs it will incur, by sitting
 with folded arms, and seeing the dismemberment of
its commerce. I have it in purpose immediately to begin draw-
ing a memorial to the legislature, corresponding with
the sentiments herein expressed, and to put it into
general circulation for signatures. With the most unfeigned regard,
I am, my dear sir,
Your humble servant, ROBERT TROUP .
To THOMAS EDDY . 
 P.S. I have read this letter to a number of respect-
able gentlemen in this village, as well merchants as
others, and they highly approve of its sentiments.
R. T. Geneva, Ontario county, 11th January, 1816. MY DEAR SIR, I have been absent a few days, at Canandai-
gua, which has prevented my attention to the impor-
tant business of improving our canal navigation.
Last night we had a meeting of the citizens of this
village, and we agreed on a petition to the legisla-
ture, and appointed a committee of correspondence,
to communicate with the other towns in this county,
and with the towns in the other counties more im-
mediately interested in the navigation. I think we
shall, by our proceedings, put this county in motion. We have just learnt the proceedings in New-York,
on the subject of the canal, and are much gratified
to find they are alive to the importance of another
 application to the legislature. Now is the accepted time—now is the day for adopt-
ing, and carrying into effect, a policy which is likely
to be productive of incalculable advantages to the
commerce of our state. I hope our friends in Albany will also be awaken-
ed to see their interest, and that our applications to
 the legislature will also be sanctioned with one
from the great body of its citizens. Our proceedings are in the hands of the printer;
and as soon as they are published, I will send you a
copy of them. It may be pleasing to our fellow
citizens in New York to see that, in this country,
we are not unmindful of our duty to them, or to our-
selves. In great haste, very sincerely your's, ROBERT TROUP .
To THOMAS EDDY . Geneva, Ontario county, 10th February, 1816. DEAR FRIEND, I have been favoured with your letter of the 3d
instant, and I am not a little pleased at learning,
that our Western Lock Navigation Company, has 
lately so much improved in strength, as, not only to
walk, but even to run, nearly as fast as any of the
bank companies; in proof of which, I readily admit
a declared dividend of eight per cent, for the last
year, to be very good evidence. We sent our circular letters, with copies of our
proceedings, to Mr. Wright, Mr. Geddes , Mr. Forman ,
and to various persons in other quarters. On the 6th
instant, I received a letter from Mr. Wright , dated at
Rome, on the 3d instant, in which he says, When
I had the pleasure of seeing you in Albany, in No-
vember, I promised to write upon the subject of the
canal from Erie. I have delayed until now, be-
cause we, in this part of the country, have delayed
acting; and the memorial from New York, and the
doings of the meeting at Geneva, has aroused to
exertions; and, yesterday, Mr. G. Huntington , and
myself, made a visit to Utica, for the purpose of
 meeting the gentlemen there, and conferring on
this very important subject. Those gentlemen met
us, and a rough draft of a memorial was drawn
up, and will be circulated rapidly, and soon be laid
before the legislature. From this extract it appears that Mr. Wright , and
his friends, were in a profound sleep, until awak-
ened by the proceedings in New York, and in this
village. I fear there is too much apathy every where, in
regard to this great state object; and that I shall be
disappointed in my expectations of the quantity of
public opinion that will be carried into the legisla-
ture. We are collecting the petitions, circulated for
signature in this neighbourhood, and, in a day or
two, they will be forwarded to Albany.
The expense that would attend the appointment
of a committee to go to Albany, and there act as
lobby members, in favour of the canal, utterly for-
bids the adoption of such a measure in this county. I think I shall be able to procure the information
you wish, relative to the canal work at the Seneca
Falls; and I shall, accordingly, apply for it, and,
when obtained, no time shall be lost in transmitting
it to you. I cannot express to you, in terms sufficiently strong,
my grateful feelings for the New-York memorial.
Being now in.the number of old men, it is almost
a matter of course that my opinion should have
little or no weight; but I assure you, it is my
solemn belief, that if the legislature should not be
able to rise so far above the paltry considerations of
party spirit, and local interests, as to come to a level
with the magnanimous policy of undertaking the
canal, as a state work, we may bid adieu to the
object, and most probably forever! With the most perfect regard,
I remain, dear sir,
Your humble servant, ROBERT TROUP .
To THOMAS EDDY . New York, 2d mo. 14th, 1816. DEAR FRIEND, By direction of the Governors of the New-York
 Hospital, I now send the petition, annual report, and
 annual account of patients admitted and discharged,
for the year 1815. The House (as customary) will,
on a motion being made for that purpose, order these
documents to be printed. The printed account of
patients will be tedious, and take much time; I
would, therefore, take the liberty to suggest to thee,
to direct the printer to serve each member with the
Petition and Report, immediately as they are printed.
I mention this, as it is important to bring the busi-
ness before the legislature, before other business
crowd on them. Our cause is a noble one, and I cannot but enter-
tain full confidence, that our application will be
favourably received, and acted on with promptness,
and a spirit of liberality. I believe thou wilt agree
with me, that we ought not to expect a sum sufficient
to erect all the necessary buildings (say $70,000)
would readily be granted us, but I am of opinion
they would cheerfully allow us $10,000 a year, to be
paid out of the fund arising out of the sales of goods
sold at vendue; and, they may more readily do this,
as the amount from this source, for 1815, will be
very considerable. A part of this fund is to be paid
to our corporation for the support of foreign poor,
some of this part might possibly be diverted for our
use, if we cannot otherwise succeed. If we could complete this establishment, all the
insane in the state might be accommodated; and
the number at this moment in the several counties
 must be very considerable. If this city contains one
tenth of the inhabitants of the whole state, and has
one hundred and twenty lunatics, the number in
the country must be very great; but, it is very pos-
sible, it may not be in the same proportion, owing
to the use of spirituous liquors being more prevalent
in the city than in the country. If we could obtain 10,000 dollars a year, I would
propose, that the Governors should open a loan, to
borrow 70,000 dollars, at six per cent; this would
require 4,200 dollars to pay the interest, and the
remainder, 5,800, might be appropriated towards the
expense of supporting the establishment. If we can
obtain this annuity, it will be highly important that
we should have it for as long a period as possible.
Suppose (in order to keep the time out of sight) thee
should move to fill up the blank that will be left in
the draft of the bill, thus: Ten thousand dollars,
annually, in quarter yearly payments, the first quar-
ter to be paid the 1st of May next, and the same to
be paid every year hereafter, during the period men-
tioned in the first section of the act, passed 14th
March, 1806, entitled, an act for the better and
more permanent support of the Hospital in the city 
of New York, limiting the period for the payment
of an annuity therein expressed. The crowded situation of our state prison makes
it necessary, either to enlarge the present building
or to erect a new one at Albany, Utica, or some other
place. The plan of the present prison was entirely my
own, and, although I visited Philadelphia, and ex-
amined many of Howard 's plans, and was furnished
with several by my friend William M. Pitt , a member
of Parliament for Dorchester, of prisons in England,
yet a most striking error was committed in our
 plan;—it should have contained 500 rooms, 7 feet by
9 feet, in order to keep the prisoners separate at
night—in the day they are at work, and have keep-
ers constantly with them, so that they have no oppor-
tunity to corrupt each other;—this entirely destroys
the designs of a penitentiary establishment, intended
to amend and improve the habits of the convicts.
A few years since, one of the commissioners appoint-
ed to build a penitentiary at Boston, came to New-
York, with a view to get information as to the plan
for them to adopt; I urged them to have a separate
room for each prisoner, and had such a plan drawn
under my direction; this was adopted, and it is the
only prison in this country calculated to answer the
design of forming such establishments. Having so
many rooms, does not increase the expense, as the
prison need not be built so strong, because there is
less danger of escape. If another prison should be
 erected, I sincerely hope it may be on the plan of
having a separate room for each convict. The number of convicts are considerably increased
 (at least in this city) on account of the sum which
makes grand larceny—this is twelve dollars and
a half; it was fixed at fifty dollars, it would con-
siderably lessen the number of prisoners in the state
prison. I respectfully offer these hints, as some sub-
ject relating to the state prison, or the existing penal
laws, may be presented to the legislature. I, also
send thee a work published some years ago, contain-
ing an account of the prisons. D. A. Ogden , and others, have purchased of the Hol-
land Company, the presumptive rights to all the
Indian reservations in this state, and they are con-
triving to get the Indians to sell to them for a small
sum; the poor Indians have been always cheated,
except by William Penn , who uniformly done them
justice, and thus preserved the high esteem and
regard of the natives, by which means peace was
 preserved in his province, and no war or bloodshed
for seventy years; and this would have continued, if his
grand children, in 1756, had not attempted to cheat
the Indians, in purchasing their land. In short, I am
perfectly satisfied, that in every war that has occur-
red between the whites (Christians!) and Indians,
the former has been aggressors. The condition of
these poor people is shamefully neglected, and is
truly deserving our sympathy and commiseration.
We enjoy, in a full extent, every blessing of Heaven,
on the very land they formerly occupied, in security,
peace, and plenty, as to game, fish, &c.; we have
 abundance, whilst they often suffer for want of food,
clothing, &c. Under these considerations, it appears
to me, we ought to do all in our power to meliorate
their condition, to protect them from the violence and
imposition of the white people, and generally to con-
tribute to their comfort and happiness, as far as cir-
cumstances will permit. I will take the liberty to
state hints of a plan, that, in my opinion, might be
productive of lasting benefit to the Indians. A board of seven or eight commissioners, to be
selected from the different religious societies, and
appointed to take into consideration all matters and
 things relative to the Indians within the state, with-
out salary. 1st. To meet annually during the sitting of the
Legislature. 2nd. To appoint a committee of two, who should
visit, yearly, every nation of Indians in the state—
inquire into their situation and wants, improve-
ment in religion and morals, school learning, and
agriculture; and use their best endeavours to prevail
on them to consent to divide their lands into farms
of 100 acres each, not to be alienated or leased, but
to descend to nearest relations, &c.; hear their com-
plaints of whites attempting to defraud them, as to
their lands, &c.; and report to the Board at their
annual meeting. 3d. The Board to employ suitable religious cha-
racters, to reside among the Indians, to instruct them
in agriculture, the useful arts, and school learning. 4th. The Board to report annually to the Legisla-
ture, and recommend the enacting such laws as they
might deem necessary. 5th. The Commissioners to be allowed the same
pay (when on duty) as members of the Legislature. 6th. To be allowed 3000 dollars yearly, to be ap-
propriated as they might judge proper for the bene-
fit of the several tribes, in order to carry into effect
the design of this plan. As to the sublime project of uniting the Western
Lakes with the Hudson River—but am fearful thou
will think me already tiresome—I shall, therefore,
leave this subject for a separate letter. I am, &c. THOMAS EDDY .
To P. A. JAY , Albany. 3d mo. 2d, 1816. ESTEEMED FRIEND, We have lately been informed by some of our
friends who reside near the Stockbridge Indians,
that near one hundred white persons have settled on
the lands belonging to the said Indians—that,
although they have been proceeded against, as the
law directs, yet, by their influence with the chiefs,
the matter has been so represented to the Governor, 
that he and the Attorney General have directed
 that further proceedings against them be stopped
for the present, and the probability is, that the
chiefs may address the Legislature, requesting a
law to permit them to remain. We are part of a committee of our society, appoint-
ed for the purpose of promoting, among the Indians,
a disposition of improvement in agriculture, and gene-
rally to meliorate their condition; and we have al-
ways found, that they have been exceedingly injured
in their morals, &c. by the whites getting on their
lands, and mixing with them. From the conferences which some of us have had
with thee, relative to the Indians, we have been in-
duced to believe thou feel an interest in the welfare
of that people, and disposed to exert, not only thy
private influence, as an individual, but thy official
powers, as chief magistrate of the state, in promoting
a redress of any grievances they may labour under—as
well as co-operating with the well meant endeavours
of others, so that every proper step may be taken
which justice and humanity may dictate in the
 premises. We have a confidence that every thing on thy part
has, and will be done, for the welfare of the Indians;
but, as an application may be made by the white
people to the Legislature, for some law to be passed,
by which they may unjustly get an advantage over
the Indians, and as thou art, likely, very much occu-
pied at this time, it is possible the subject may escape
thy memory; and we, therefore, take the liberty to
make the present communication, and respectfully to
solicit a continuation of thy friendly regard, to a de-
scription of our fellow men, who seem incapable of
taking care of their own interest, and whose peculiar
situation and circumstances seem to demand our
sympathy, and require our assistance. THOMAS EDDY .
To Governor TOMPKINS . London, 19th April, 1816. MY DEAR FRIEND, I much fear that I have hitherto omitted to thank
you (which I now do most cordially) for the very
interesting pamphlets, which you had the goodness
to send me by Mr. Gallaudet , who I had not the plea-
sure of seeing, until after he had received all the
information he required, respecting the institution
established here, for instructing the Deaf and Dumb.
I only saw that gentleman for a few moments, while
I was engaged in my magisterial duties on the
bench; and I regretted much that I had not the plea-
sure of seeing him afterwards, as I fully expected,
since it was my wish to have shown him all those
civilities which are justly due to any friend recom-
mended by you. I had, also, the pleasure of receiving your letter by
Doctor Francis , who did me the favour of dining
with me, and which afforded me the opportunity of
introducing him to a very intelligent physician, my
son in law, Doctor Yates , from whom he received
much of that species of information, of which his
very active and intelligent mind was so eagerly in
pursuit. Doctor Francis has gone to Paris, but will
soon return, when I shall be happy to show him
every attention in my power. Among other philanthropic establishments which
are yearly rising in the great metropolis, we are
 now anxiously engaged in forming a Provident In-
stitution, or Saving Bank, in the western district of
the city, upon the principle suggested and explained
in my Treatise on Indigence, published in 1806, but
on a far more limited scale. The practical effect
of these establishments, was first manifested in Scot-
land, since which they have been extended to several
towns in England, and are likely to become very
general. Their utility scarcely requires explanation.
The object is, to assist the labouring poor to preserve
a portion of their earnings for old age, and to give
them provident habits. I send you, under cover, the
plan of our institution, which has just commenced,
and which has been the result of much discussion
and deliberation. When Doctor Francis returns, I
shall trouble him with a few of such publications as
you may wish to possess. My various occupations,
joined to an advanced period of life, render me less
able than I could wish, to take an active share in
the management of many institutions of a charitable
nature, to which I must be satisfied only to be a
contributor. Many of them are excellent, while not
a few have been established without the aid of that
 caution and good judgment which is calculated to
produce utility, which tends to reduce the funds of
others, whose beneficial efforts are obvious and cer-
tain; and hence it is, that much money is expended
 where little practical benefit results. Our Free
Schools, for the education of the poor, are now be-
come very general all over the country, which, I trust,
will give a new and improved character to the rising
generation among the poor, which is so much want-
ed in England. Referring you to my next, I remain
always, My dear friend,
Your's affectionately, P. COLQUHOUN .
MR. THOMAS EDDY , New York New York, 5th mo. 2nd, 1816. ESTEEMED FRIEND, Thy very kind favour of 9th mo. 17th, was receiv-
ed some time since—its interesting details have
afforded considerable satisfaction, and, with the work
on the constitution of Lunatic Asylums, will be highly
useful to us. I should have replied to thy letter sooner
than this date, but the Governors having applied to
 our Legislature for aid towards completing the pro-
posed establishment, I waited to know the result, in
order that I might inform thee. I have now the
pleasure of stating, that a law was passed, 17th ult.
to pay the Governors of the New-York Hospital, ten
thousand dollars a year, in quarter yearly payments,
for and during the term of forty-one years. This
generous and liberal grant, is fully equal to our ex-
pectations, and will be amply sufficient to enable us
to erect extensive buildings, and every other improve-
ment. We purchased thirty-eight acres of land, six
miles from the city—it is on high ground, and com-
mands a most delightful and very extensive view of
the village of Haerlem, Long Island, and the surround-
ing country. As to health, and good water, it is
equal to any in the state of New-York. Some have
fears, that it is too far from the city; but on that
account, it appears to me, there is no cause to be
afraid that it will not be duly inspected—it is true,
the Governors all reside in the city, but in the vicinity
of the premises there are a number of very respecta-
ble suitable persons, (members of the Corporation of
the Hospital) who would very cheerfully undertake
the charge of visiting, &c. so humane an institution. Several of the Governors have seats in the neigh-
bourhood, and are out one half the year. It is pro-
posed, the intended building shall accommodate two
hundred patients, calculated for all ranks of life—as
 well those of affluent as indigent circumstances, and,
also, paupers, who are supported by the city, and the
respective counties throughout the state—the latter
to be paid for at the rate of two dollars per week,
 and others from three to ten dollars, according to
their circumstances, and the accommodations they
may require. In my opinion, if it is well conducted, and managed
with prudence, it will, not only essentially serve, and
be a great blessing to the state at large, but may be
very profitable, and produce a considerable revenue
to our hospital. I have no doubt, we shall have it
full in two years after it is ready to receive patients.
On one part of the premises there is abundance of
valuable good stone, but it may not be of a suitable
or handsome quality, to make a good face for the
front or outside walls; if so, I was thinking we may
put on a coat of rough cast, or plaster—this has been
done on some of our public buildings, but, in some
instances, it is apt to peel, or fall off, owing (likely)
to severe frosts, or the want of knowing how to make
a strong and good cement. In the north of Europe,
and, I believe, in England, they make a plaster that
would stand our climate, and would answer the pur-
pose effectually. I have been told they mix tarras,
(which we have imported from Amsterdam,) or
Welsh lime, that is considerably exported from Bris-
tol. If thou could procure for me a receipt, from
some distinguished mechanic, to make a suitable plas-
ter that would answer the purpose, it might very
much serve us, and I should esteem it as a particular
favour. It is not probable we shall do more this
year, than lay the foundation of the building. The
remarks in thy letter to me, and thy work, entitled,
Hints on the construction of Lunatic Asylums, will
very much assist us in forming our plan, and when
this is drawn, and concluded on, I propose sending
thee a copy, in hopes thou wilt furnish us with thy
observations for our government in improving of it. If any thing farther occurs to thee, that would pro-
bably improve our plan, or aid us in executing it, I
should be much obliged by thy communications.
Do be pleased to present my wife's love, in the most
 affectionate manner, in which I most heartily unite,
to Ann Alexander, and very particularly to our be-
loved friends, Lindley Murray and wife. I send
 thee the last Report of our Hospital.—Lindley Murray 
would be pleased to peruse it. I am, thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY .
SAMUEL TUKE . New York, 5th mo. 4th, 1816. MY GOOD FRIEND, I scarce know how to begin this letter, as I feel
ashamed and mortified that I have so long neglected
replying to thy last very acceptable communication. I rejoice to find such a number of your good people
in England are engaged so devotedly in improving
the condition of the lower classes in society; your
Bible Society, and the immense sums raised for the
poor, who have suffered by the calamity of war on
the continent, is truly astonishing, and I sincerely
trust and believe, will procure the blessing of Divine
Providence on your nation. The communications of the
 British and Foreign Bible Society, show that genuine
religion is held in veneration, in many parts of the
continent, to a much greater extent than many here-
tofore believed. I trust it will yet appear more fully
in France, notwithstanding that deluded nation seem-
ed to have been dead as to any sense of it. As the
spirit of our most holy religion spreads over the
world, the condition of mankind will be meliorated—
the minds of men will be softened, instead of being
 filled with bitterness, revenge, and hatred—they will
learn of Christ to love each other, and thus, in God's
own time, an end be put to war and bloodshed.
Owing to the late war, the morals of the people of this
 country have been (as was reasonably to be expected)
much injured. Notwithstanding this, there is a ge-
neral religious improvement evidently increasing
amongst all denominations of Christians—so that I
 entertain a hope, which, I trust, is well grounded,
that, on the whole, we are growing better. Bible
Societies are established in all directions of the United
States, except Virginia, and other slave states,*
 * In most of these states, Auxiliary Bible Societies have since been estab-
lished. and
great attention is paid to schools, and otherwise to
improve the state of the common people. Prisons, on the plan of our state prison, are estab-
lished nearly in every state. The affairs of our
prisons have been, ef late years, sadly mismanaged,
otherwise the avails of the labour of the convicts
would be sufficient to defray the annual expenses. I have been, for some time, much engaged in im-
proving a plan of an establishment for the accommo-
dation of insane persons; the mode of treatment that
ought to be pursued, (and which was recommended
by me to the Governors of the New-York Hospital,
in April last year, of which communication I now
send a copy) is the one adopted at the Retreat, by the
Society of Friends, near New York. The Governors have purchased thirty-eight acres
of land, about six miles from the city, and propose
to erect a building to accommodate two hundred
lunatic patients—the thirty-eight acres to be divided,
and laid out in walks, gardens, &c. for the amuse-
ment and exercise of the patients who are fit to par-
take of useful employment and recreation. Our
Legislature has acted very liberally, and generously
granted us 10,000 dollars a year, payable quarterly;
one half of this sum will enable us to make a loan
of 80,000 dollars, so that we shall have very ample
funds for erecting suitable buildings, and making
every necessary improvement. I send thee the last
Report of the Governors, which contains a memorial to
the Legislature on the subject, and fully explains the
plan we propose to pursue. About a month ago, I
attended the Legislature, at Albany, for the purpose
of aiding our application, and obtained the loan
alluded to, granting us the above-mentioned annuity,
for and during the term of forty-one years. It is a considerable time since, that I met with, in
 the Quarterly Review, an account of thy very impor-
tant publication on the wealth, power, resources, &c.
of the British nation, and I have been extremely
anxious to procure a copy; it is highly spoken of by
those who have met with it in England, and it is
wonderfully strange, that I cannot meet with a single
copy in this city, or Philadelphia. Our Free School Society, under the patronage of
the state, is in a flourishing situation; we have two
schools under our care in this city, containing about
one thousand scholars; we have ample funds, and
propose to erect two other school houses next year. There are now a school in every town in each of
the counties throughout the state, all under the
patronage of the state; the sum of 60,000 dollars is
now divided among them, according to the number
of scholars in each school, and this fund, in a few
years, will reach 200,000 dollars; besides this, they
are obliged, each town, to raise, by tax, a sum equal
to what they respectively receive from the state. I shall esteem it as a very particular favour, if thou
will be so good as to continue thy correspondence on
the general state and improvements of the numerous
 benevolent establishments in England. It is owing to thy very valuable correspondence
with me, that our New-York Free School is in so
flourishing a situation as it is at present, and that the
 condition of the poor, in many respects, have been
considerably improved. I am, with the warmest sentiments of esteem and
regard, thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY . 
 To P. COLQUHOUN . 
 P.S. Inclosed in a packet, per Jeremiah Thomp-
son, to be sent by him from Liverpool, per coach: Memorial on Canal, from Erie to the Hudson. Report of Female Association. An act concerning Common Schools. Report of Free School Society, for 1814. Hints respecting improving the treatment of the
Insane. Report of New York Hospital, for 1815. Account of New York Free School Society. London, 14th June, 1816. MY DEAR SIR, On the 3d instant, I had the pleasure of receiv-
ing your esteemed and acceptable letter of the 5th
ultimo.—No doubt can be entertained of the benevo-
lence and good disposition of our nation, where the
 charity of all ranks, who have any thing to spare,
ramifies in all directions. Besides the relief afforded
at home, nearly half a million of money has been sent
to Spain, Portugal, Germany, and Russia, during and
since the war, for the relief of the sufferers. In the
course of the last and the present year, nearly a mil-
lion more has been raised from individuals for the re-
lief of the wives, and families, and relations, of the
soldiers who fell at the great battle of Waterloo; be-
sides a reward to those who survived this great strug-
gle, which terminated a war of unexampled length,
and which desolated the greatest part of Europe.
But this benevolence is not confined to one object.
It has ramified in all directions. The sums subscri-
bed to the Bible Society, has been immense; and no
doubt is entertained of its being supported in prefer-
ence to charities of every kind. I trust that you and I shall never, in our days, see
the sword of war unsheathed. There appears now
a strong disposition on the part of the sovereigns and
rulers of all the great powers in Europe, to cultivate
the arts of peace. The still perturbed and unhappy
state of France is now the only circumstance that is
likely to disturb our tranquillity. Our legislature, now freed from the distresses of
war, is sedulously devoting itself to the state of our
police and internal policy. Mendicity, mad houses,
saving banks, the pauper system, &c. &c., at present
engage their attention: and the leading object is to
promote humanity, and to improve the state of soci-
ety by education, provident habits, and good laws, for
the prevention of moral and criminal offences. A penitentiary house, on a very large scale, is part-
ly finished, in fields within the liberty of Westmin-
ster, at the public expense, with all the improvements
which experience has suggested, and a bill is now
in the house, for regulating insane establishments,
and appointing periodical visitants for the purpose of
promoting humanity and preventing abuses. But,
after all, much remains to be done. A continuance
of peace may do much. The legislature, however, is
perhaps very properly slow in adopting new mea-
sures and in abolishing old customs. These feelings
do not operate with the same force in a new country. I am surprised to find that my last work on the
Population, Power, and Revenue of the British Empire,
 had not been on sale in America; as the first edition
went off in eight months, although a very expensive
book on account of the number of tables. I have no
doubt of its being reprinted in America. Already there
are two translations of the work in German, and I
believe also in French. I believe Mr. Clay , when here,
carried out a copy of it. He told me he intended to
do so. I send you under cover an epitome of this
work. It has been purchased by the ministers of all
the nations of Europe, as well as many other foreign-
ers. Through the medium of this work, much has
been disclosed on subjects tending to promote the
happiness of nations, and to prevent many of those
errors by which their decline has been effected. It is a pleasing circumstance, to find your country
is following our example, with respect to free schools.
We, at last, discover here, that the general education
of youth is not only the best prop to the state, but to
the happiness and prosperity of the people. I trust
your schools are established on a stable basis, which
can undergo no unfavourable change by the death or
removal of the first benevolent founders. For want
of this, many excellent institutions have fallen into
 decay, when their original founders were no more.
As yet, our legislature has afforded no pecuniary aid
to the numerous schools established in this country;
they are entirely supported by the benevolence of the
public. I trust, ere long, their permanence will be
secured by a national institution, embracing the whole
population. I feel much gratified by the opportunity you afford-
ed me, of making the acquaintance of Dr. Francis .
A mind more ardent in the pursuit of useful know
ledge, perhaps, never existed; and, I have no doubt
he will, in a few years, stand at the head of his pro-
fession. I introduced him to my son-in-law, Dr. Yeats ,
who is an able and learned physician,; he entertains
a high opinion of your friend's talents, and, I am
sure, will, at all times, be happy in the opportunity of
being useful to him. My health declines, as may naturally be expected,
as old age approaches; but, upon the whole, I have
no reason to complain. Regularity and temperance
are my chief and best medicine for all complaints. I shall always be happy to hear from you, and to
make such communications as I conceive may be
useful to mankind in general; but let me entreat of
you, my good friend, not to make my letters public.
Engaged, as I constantly am, in a great variety of
 pursuits, I can only snatch a moment occasionally for
private correspondence, which can never be sufficiently
correct for the public eye. I send by Dr. Francis , a parcel, containing such
publications as are likely to prove interesting to you.
A list of them you will find hereunto annexed. With every sentiment of esteem and respect,
I remain always, dear Sir,
Yours, truly and affectionately, P. COLQUHOUN .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. An Account of the different Saving Banks re-
cently established. Hand and Posting Bills, relative to the Bank in
 Westminster. The 35th and 36th Report of the Society for Bet-
tering the Condition of the Poor. The New School for Education. The Barrington School. Report—Indigent Blind. Report—Refuge for the Destitute. Report—Relief of the Working Manufacturers. Report—Relief of the Poor in the City of Lon-
don. House of Recovery in Typhus Fever. Society for the Encouragement of Sunday
Schools. Scheme of Finance. Geneva, Ontario County, 9th December, 1816. SIR, The letters, dated on the 18th July last, and
which, as Secretary of the Board of Commissioners,
constituted by the act, entitled, an act to provide for
the improvement of the internal navigation of this
 state, you addressed to us, respectively, came to hand,
with their enclosures, in due season. We have forborne advertising our appointment, or
taking any step to procure and receive subscriptions
in lands, or money, to be applied to the construction
of the contemplated canals, from a conviction that
an appeal to our fellow citizens for voluntary aid,
under existing circumstances, would be premature.
Until the Legislature has passed an act, whereby the
public faith is pledged for beginning and complet-
ing the canal, we apprehend no discreet citizen will
be disposed to deprive himself of the use of his land,
or money, for a considerable period of time. The
sole object of the act appointing the Commissioners,
is to obtain, from their report, a mass of useful in-
formation, for the purpose of guiding the judgment
of the Legislature, in deciding on the expediency of
 undertaking, or rejecting, the proposed enterprise.
Although we are well persuaded that the trusts re- 
posed in the Commissioners will appear to have been
executed with great ability, and the utmost fidelity,
yet, their report, from the novelty and magnitude of
its subject, may induce the Legislature to seek fur-
ther information, before it finally decides on the
course to be pursued. Thus, a final decision may
be delayed longer than the ensuing session of the
 Legislature; and, when every proper source of inform-
ation has been exhausted, that decision may be
against the enterprise. There is nothing in the pre-
sent act to preclude such decision; and hence we
are of opinion, that the act furnishes no adequate
motives for private subscriptions, either in lands or
money. We submit these sentiments to the Commissioners,
with all deference, and we remain, with respect, ROBERT TROUP .
JOHN NICHOLS .
S. YOUNG , Esq. New York, 12th mo. 10th, 1816. ESTEEMED FRIENDS, Your favour of 28th ult. was last evening laid
before our Committee on Indian Affairs, and we
were directed to communicate to you such remarks
as we might judge suitable, relating to the subject
alluded to in your letter. Many of our Committee have been, for some time,
 attentive to the situation of the Seneca nation, and
have had great fears lest they might be sadly im-
posed on, by the person who has purchased the pre-
emption right of the Holland Company. It may be
useful to state, that all the land on the west side of
the River Genesee, belonged originally to the state of
Massachusetts—that is, the right of soil, or the exclu-
sive right of purchasing the same of the Indians; the
right of jurisdiction has always been considered to
be in the state of New York. The state of Massachu-
setts sold their pre-emption right to the whole coun-
try, to Gorham & Phelps, and they sold to Robert
Morris, and he to the Holland Company ; the latter
(several years ago) purchased all the said land of the
Indians, except certain tracts which they reserved,
one situated at the Cattaraugus, one at Buffaloe, one
on Allegany, and one on Genesee; possibly there
may be more. The Holland Company sold their pre-
emption right, for the whole of these reservations,
(we are told at 50 cents per acre,) to a person who is
now a member of Congress, and resides at Hamilton,
on the St. Lawrence. About three years ago, he
 employed Joseph Richardson (formerly of Perkcom-
ing, Philadelphia county,) to hold a treaty at Buffaloe,
for the purpose of trying to persuade the Indians to
exchange their reservations for lands (which he said
he owned) on White River, in Illinois Territory; you
know the result of that treaty, and are, likely, ac-
quainted with the remarkable speech of Red Jacket .
This treaty was unlawful, as the laws of the United
States prohibit any treaty being held with the In-
dians, for the purpose of purchasing their lands,
unless a Commissioner appointed by the President should
be present. All the reservations are said to be lands
of the very first quality, and particularly the one at
Buffaloe, which is very valuable; a part of it, adjoining
the village, is said to be worth from 100 to 200 dollars
 per acre, if the Indian title was extinguished. It
has been said, that on an average, that reservation
would sell for more than thirty dollars per acre—
possibly this may be estimating it too high. The
present holder of the pre-emption right is esteemed
a respectable man, and, perhaps, would be more
scrupulous in the means he might use, in effecting
his purchase of the Indians, than some others might;
yet, as the temptation is powerful, and as in the
general practice of men, (who are commonly called
honest,) it is really considered not to be criminal to
impose on Indians, advantage has been taken of
their ignorance and credulity;—a man's character
seems not to be lessened in the esteem of his acquaint-
ance, if he should endeavour to get the chiefs in a
state of intoxication, in order to gain their influence
over the nation, with a view that he may make a
profitable bargain. It is, we believe, true, that the
consent, or act of the chiefs, binds the whole nation,
in sales of their lands; but, generally, the whole are
consulted, yet often (mostly) the chiefs are bribed to
consent, in order to influence the others. Although
no treaty can be held for purchasing without a Com-
missioner, appointed by the President, be present, to
prevent the Indians being imposed on, yet it would
probably not be difficult for him to get such a man
appointed as would answer his purposes. Many per-
sons, (high in office in this state,) who profess, and,
indeed, seem to be well disposed and friendly to the
Indians, have openly and decidedly given their opi-
nions, that it would be better for them to sell their
 reservations, and remove to some remote situation to
the Westward; they say that now they are exposed
to a constant intercourse with bad whites, who sup-
ply them with rum, and in every way try to cheat
them, and corrupt their principles, and, if they re-
main, the consequence will be, that they will be soon
extinct. They add, that the Christian party, at
 Oneida, owing to their having more intercourse with
the whites, are more depraved than the Pagan party.
It is, perhaps, not in our power to say, whether such
removal would, eventually, be better for the Indians
or not; but it appears to us, that if they should go
far West, they will still be exposed to the same evil,
and would suffer still worse, from a kind of white
people, who are not so much under the restraints of
law as the same description of whites who now
surround them. At present, the influence of many
respectable persons, who reside near them, serves
much to protect them from frequent injury and im-
position, and the assistance they would, from time to
time, receive from Friends, might, at least, preserve
them from going backwards, and possibly tend to
advance them in agriculture, &c. Taking a view of
the whole subject, in all its various ramifications, we
cannot but believe it would be most for the advan-
tage of the Indians, to remain on their respective
 reservations. It may be useful to examine, 1st. Suppose the In-
dians should conclude to sell their present posses-
sions, is it expedient for Friends to offer them assist-
ance and advice? 2nd. If it is deemed proper for
Friends to interfere, then what course would be most
 advisable? 3rd. What advice should be given to
them, in case the Indians should ask for it? In reply to the first proposition, we are of opinion,
that if they should conclude to sell, it would not be ex-
pedient to offer assistance, or advice, unsolicited, as
it would irritate the person who holds the pre-emp-
tion right, and the conduct of Friends might be
wrongly represented to both Indians and whites, and
in many ways it might prove injurious to the cause
in which we are engaged. In reply to the second proposition, we think Friends
cannot be indifferent spectators, if the Indians should
agree to dispose of their lands, as our minds are im-
pressed with a belief, that great unfairness would
most probably be shown towards them. It might
be right to interfere, so far as that a sub-committee,
from your general committee, might wait on the
President, and confidentially communicate to him
the propriety of his being on his guard in selecting
a person as Commissioner, urging to him the neces-
sity of appointing a person of established good repu-
tation, of undoubted integrity, and purity of charac-
ter. If the Indians are induced to make application,
and solicit the advice of Friends, it appears to us
Friends might (and perhaps ought to) afford every
assistance and advice they might require; but, even
then, it would be necessary to exercise great pru-
dence and circumspection in every movement. In reply to the third proposition—If the Indians ask
for advice, after they may have determined on a sale,
the advice proper to be given them must depend
upon circumstances that may then be unfolded. If
they ask for advice, whether they had best remove
to the westward, or, if it would be best for them to
remain on their reservations, the sentiments of
Friends might then be communicated to them, and,
if they should be fixed in their intention to make
sale, perhaps it might be well to propose to them to
sell one of their reservations, or, if each reservation
belongs to a particular tribe, then each tribe to sell a
portion of their respective reservation; for the remain-
der, (not sold,) they might, perhaps, be persuaded to
employ a surveyor, and have it divided into lots of
100 acres each—a lot to be the separate property of
each Indian family—to go by descent to nearest kin,
in the same manner as estates with us. We have thus far, in freedom, endeavoured to ex-
hibit to your view, our sentiments, as they have
occurred; and have been more particular, as the lands
are in this state, and, therefore, thought, perhaps,
you might not be acquainted with all the circum-
stances connected with the subject; but as you have
 been longer conversant with Indian affairs than our-
selves, we leave the subject to your farther investiga-
tion, and, if at any time we can be useful, we will
very readily attend to any farther communications
you may think proper to make to us. As to the situation of the Brothertown Indians,
we may inform you, that many years ago, (perhaps
thirty,) the Oneidas, taking into consideration the
situation of the remains of several tribes of Indians
on the east end of Long Island, Narraganset, and
other parts near the sea shore, concluded to make
them a present of a piece of land, (now called Bro-
thertown,) six miles square, without the power of
alienation. Some families of those Indians moved
on to this tract, and the white people soon got in
among them, persuaded the Indians, when in a state
of intoxication, to sell them their improvement, with
several lots of 100 and 200 acres. About the year
 1794, a deputation of Indians, from Brothertown,
came to some Friends of this city, and stated their
situation to be very deplorable, owing to the imposi-
tion and very bad conduct of the white people, whom
they had admitted into their settlement. Two
Friends went with these deputies to the Governor,
and the situation of the Indians were represented to
him. Agreeably to the orders of the Governor, the
sheriff took a number of civil officers, and turned off
the intruders. In two years after this, the Indians
came again to New York, and represented that the
white people had returned with additional numbers.
and that their situation was now much more deplo-
rable. The subject was referred to the Legislature,
then in session. An act passed, appointing three
 Commissioners to proceed to Brothertown, and adjust
the business, with the concurrence of the Indians, in
any way they might be of opinion would be most to
their advantage. It was agreed by the Commis-
sioners, with the consent of the Indians, to set off in
one corner of the tract, about 6000 acres, and settle
the same in lots of 50 to 100 acres to each of the in-
truders, who were to pay the state for the same five
or six dollars per acre, the state to pay the interest
(seven per cent.) on the proceeds of the sale (amount-
ing to 2169 dollars a year) to three persons, to be
appointed superintendents of the affairs of the Bro-
thertown Indians, to be laid out by them, for sup-
porting a school, and other purposes, for the benefit
 of the Indians. The remainder of the land was divi-
ded into 100 and 50 acre lots, and allotted, 100 to a
family, and 50 to a young man. By an act confirm-
ing the acts of the Commissioners, five Indians were
to be annually appointed, called peace makers, who
were to act the same as justices of the peace, to hold
a court monthly, to settle differences, and issue exe-
cution to an Indian constable, for debts under ten
dollars, &c. This act you may find in the revised
laws of New-York, passed 1813. (See 2d vol. page 160.)
You may, likely, meet with it at the Mayor's office,
or with some lawyer in your city. We are your affectionate friends, THOMAS EDDY .
And for SAMUEL PARSONS , by his request,
R. R. LAWRENCE . New York, 4th mo. 9th, 1817. MY DEAR FRIEND, I return thee my most sincere and warmest thanks
for thy kind letter and valuable pamphlets, sent me
by Dr. Francis , and should, before this time, have
made my acknowledgments for these favours, had I
met with a suitable opportunity of a person by whom
I could have sent some tracts. I have the pleasure to state, that at Hartford, in
Connecticut, they have formed a valuable and exten-
sive establishment for instructing the deaf and dumb,
which has been aided by their legislature, and con-
siderable subscriptions of private individuals of that
State, and citizens of this and other adjoining
 States. The Institution is to be under the superin-
tendance and management of my friend, Gallaudet ,
who will have, as an assistant, a Frenchman who is
deaf and dumb, and who was a professor, several
years, in the institution at Paris. Nothing of the
kind exists in any other part of the United States;
and, in my opinion, the Hartford establishment will
be sufficient to serve all the states north of Pennsyl-
vania. Among the many philanthropic institutions with
which your country abounds, there is none that ap-
pears to me more likely to be useful than saving
banks. They are certainly most admirably calculated
 to be beneficial to the poor, by promoting amongst
them a spirit of independence, economy, and industry.
Immediately on receiving from thee an account of
the provident institution in your metropolis, I pro-
posed to a number of my friends to establish a simi-
lar one in this city. A plan was formed, and a
number of our most respectable citizens agreed to
undertake the management of it; but we found that
we could not go into operation without an act of
 incorporation, for which we made an application to
the legislature, and the result is not yet known. An act is now before our legislature, for comple-
ting a canal from Lake Erie to the Hudson. Our
mutual friend, John Grieg , Esq., has with him a map
and profile of the track of the canal, the inspection
of which will be interesting to thee. We have now, in this city, twenty-seven Sunday
 schools, at which 5000 scholars are instructed. I
lately visited two of them, kept for black people,
adults; at one of them, I noticed two black women,
one of them seventy, and the other ninety years old.
They both seemed to please themselves very much
with the prospect of being soon able to read the
Bible. Our legislature passed a law about two weeks ago,
declaring that every person now held in slavery, shall
be free after 4th July, 1827. In the eastern States,
and in the State of Ohio, slavery is prohibited. Free schools and Sunday schools are spread, and
 are increasing throughout our State, and our govern-
ment have made very liberal provision for their sup-
port ; and Bible Societies receive great patronage, and
are established in almost every part of the United
 States. I have lately lost thy excellent and very valuable
work on Indigence, published in 1806, and shall es-
teem it as a particular favour, if thou wilt be pleased
to send me another copy. The asylum for lunatics, mentioned in my letter
of 4th May, is intended to be commenced building
this season. The plan being adopted through my
recommendation, I feel myself under an obligation
to pay attention to it, and this occupies, at present,
a great portion of my time. We propose to have
separate buildings for men and women patients,
about 300 feet distant from each other, besides one
other building, remote from these, for violent noisy
patients; this will be a great improvement on the old
system, of having them all under one roof. There is no one evil prevalent in this country, we
have so much reason to lament and deplore, as the
intemperate use of ardent spirits. It is distilled
mostly from grain, in every part of the United States,
and sold at about seventy-five cents per gallon. The
quantity of brandy, gin, and rum imported from
Europe and the West Indies, and whiskey, &c., made
in this country, is equal to twenty-four millions of
gallons, so that, supposing the population of the Uni-
ted States to be eight millions, this gives to each man,
woman, and child, three gallons a-year! In the late
 war, it is supposed six thousand persons lost their
lives, owing to that dreadful calamity, and that a
greater number of persons were destroyed during
that period by the use of spirituous liquors. This
vice enervates the mind to such a degree, that of the
individuals whose habits are fixed in the use of it,
scarcely one in one thousand leave it off; attention
to wives, children, friends, their own interest, health,
 character, rank in life, and reputation, are all sacri-
ficed to gratify their inclination for this most dreadful
poison. There appears no remedy sufficient to cure
this disease of the mind, but the operation of the
 power of religion. I am, with sentiments of great regard and esteem,
Thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To PATRICK COLQUHOUN , Esq. Report, &c. of Committee on Subject of Spirit-
uous Liquors. Seven numbers of Friend of Peace. Annual Account of Hospital. Account of Massachusetts State Prison. Constitution of American Bible Society. 5th mo. 16th, 1817. RESPECTED FRIEND, The Commissioners to connect the navigable
waters of Lake Erie and the Hudson River, have not
yet appointed an engineer, and it is difficult to select
a person for so important and responsible a situa-
tion. The appointment will be a very honourable
one, and it is very desirable it should be conferred
on a man fully competent, and deserving entire con-
fidence; to direct the manner in which the various
 parts of the work should be executed—to make con-
tracts with the workmen, &c. &c. requires a combina-
tion of talents, industry, and intelligence, that is rare-
ly to be found in an individual. I have been long
acquainted with the general character of Thomas
Moore, of Maryland, and it occurred to me, that he
would answer the views of the Commissioners, but
having no personal acquaintance with him, and not
being possessed of a knowledge of his abilities, suf-
ficient to justify one to recommend him to the Com-
missioners, I am induced, by the recommendation of
my friend I. B. , who has just been appointed to the
mathematical department, as surveyor, to take the
 liberty of making application to thee for information. Not having the pleasure of an acquaintance, I must
confide in thy well known public character, and dis-
position to aid every improvement interesting to our
 common country, to excuse the liberty of addressing
thee on the above subject, and beg thee to believe me,
with great respect and esteem, Thy assured friend, THOMAS EDDY .
 THOMAS JEFFERSON . New-York, 5th month, 15th, 1817. MY DEAR FRIEND, I arrived here the day before yesterday, and I
have this day received the appointment of surveyor
for the contemplated grand canal. My friend, Thomas
Eddy, of this city, has generally been in the first
rank amongst his fellow citizens, as an active and
 efficient promoter of useful and benevolent works,
has long been one of the Commissioners for this par-
ticular object, and though he is not now one, still
retains all his wishes for its success, and the ener-
gies of his mind are still in full activity for its accom-
plishment. He has mentioned, in conversation with
me, his views, that the task of the ascertainment of
lines, and the superintendence of the work of making
the canal, would be too burdensome for one man—
that the magnitude of the object, would not only
render expedient, but necessary, the employment of
two Superintendents, an Engineer, and a Mathema-
tician, each in his appropriate department. I per-
fectly accord with him in these views. I mentioned
to him Thomas Moore , a man whom I know to be
eminently qualified for the undertaking—of a sound
and discriminating mind—a judicious and practical
engineer, and one with whom I shall be glad to act.
I remarked, that thou wast well acquainted with his
qualifications and talents, and suggested the proprie-
ty of his addressing thee on the subject, and request-
ing thy opinion. He alleged he had no acquaintance
 with thee, but if I would write, he would enclose
my letter in a few lines from himself. I know not whether Thomas Moore would accept
such an appointment, but I am induced to believe the
Commissioners would be liberal in their offer; and I
also believe his correctness and economy to be such
in the application of public money, that more would
be saved by giving him a salary of 10,000 dollars a
year, than employing one less qualified for nothing. Accept, dear friend, my love and affectionate salu-
tations. ISAAC BRIGGS .
THOMAS JEFFERSON . New York, 9th mo. 24th, 1817. RESPECTED FRIEND, I return thee my most sincere thanks for thy very
polite and friendly letter, by Captain Brown , dated
17th May. I have been prevented from sooner ac-
knowledging the favour, by absence from the city
for some months past. I now send some books, which,
I trust, will be interesting, and of which I request
thy acceptance. Amongst them thou wilt find the
last Annual Report of our American Bible Society,
which be pleased to present to your Bible Society.
If that Society would address the American Bible
Society, announcing their formation, and forward a
copy of their constitution, with a sketch of the pros-
pect before them, it would be the means of opening
a correspondence between the two Societies, that
might prove mutually useful. The American Society have printed a number of
French stereotype bibles, containing the Old and New
Testaments, and would cheerfully supply yours, at
the cost of printing and binding. A highly respectable society has been formed at
Washington, for the purpose of colonizing the free
 people of colour in the United States. I send thee a
pamphlet, stating the views of this society; but they
have not yet concluded to what part of the world it
would be most advisable to recommend their emigra-
tion. This society is about sending an agent to
Africa, to endeavour to procure an asylum for them
at Sherbro, near Sierra Leone, or some other part of
the continent. I am of opinion it would not answer
for them to go to your island, unless a permanent
peace was established. When that happy event shall
have taken place, it will certainly be more for their 
interest to remove there, than any other part of the
world. Many of them are sober and industrious, are
well acquainted with agriculture, and are good me-
chanics. A young man left here a few months ago for Port
au Prince, who was sent from England by the British
and Foreign School Society, for the purpose of intro-
ducing schools in your island, on an extensive and
improved plan. I am anxious to know if he is likely
to succeed, and should be much gratified in learning
that you have a number of schools, established in
different parts of thy government. To thy enlight-
ened mind it is unnecessary for me to enlarge on the
importance of this object, to advance which your
 government cannot appropriate too much money. I have also sent thee a volume of the Transactions
of the New York Literary and Philosophical Society.
If you have any pamphlets or other objects, relating
to the natural history of your island, they would be
very acceptable. It would afford me singular pleasure to render thee
any services; and if, in any way, it is in my power
to be useful to thee in this city, I beg thou wilt freely
command me. I am, with sentiments of the greatest
respect and esteem, Thy assured friend, THOMAS EDDY . 
To President PETION . London, 20th February, 1818. MY DEAR SIR, I have to acknowledge the receipt of your obliging
favour of the 9th of April last, with the accompany-
ing books and pamphlets, which were safely deli-
vered by Mr. Greig , and for which I beg you will
accept of my best thanks. I should have done this
 at an earlier period, had I not waited for Mr. Greig 's
return, which has been protracted far beyond the
time either he or I had calculated upon. He has been
so obliging as to take charge of a parcel for you, in
which, according to your desire, you will find a copy
of my Treatise on Indigence, and the three last re-
ports of our Society for bettering the Condition of the
Poor, with several other tracts, which I trust you will
find interesting. It is pleasing to observe the rapid progress you
make in originating, and carrying into effect, useful
 institutions for improving the state of society in your
country, in all which you appear to act a prominent
part; and well may it be said, that you deserve well of
your country, since your whole time and attention are
bestowed in promoting measures tending to the pre-
vention of criminal offences, to the religious and moral
instruction of infants and adults, to the relief of mental
and bodily infirmity, and to the general improvement of
the morals of the people. You will observe, that so far back as the year
1806, I recommended Provident Banks, in my Trea-
tise on Indigence, upon a national plan. The idea
of such institutions originated with me ; but the pub-
lic mind was not then prepared for such institutions,
and I much fear they will not be rendered perma-
nent under the present system, on account of the la-
bour attending the gratuitous management, although
our legislature has afforded them some facilities, with
respect to the deposits. Had my plan been adopted
in 1806, I am certain that not less than seven mil-
lions sterling of the property of the labouring classes
would have now been yielding interest. The insti-
tutions, however, as now constituted, have become
popular, and they are spreading fast all over the
country; but the demand for labour, in consequence
of the happy return of peace, is unfortunately much
less than the supply, and the poor, out of work, or
being only half employed, and wages being generally
reduced, they have little to spare; but, upon the whole,
more money is deposited than could reasonably have
 been expected. In 1816, and part of last year, there
was much distress in the country, in consequence of
the general stagnation of trade and manufactures,
and the low price of agricultural produce; but of
late a favourable change has taken place: the ma-
nufacturers are generally well employed, and the
 agricultural produce makes a fair return to the
farmers. This country has made great efforts, as well as
very considerable pecuniary sacrifices, to induce the
nations of Europe to abandon the odious slave trade,
and they are likely to be successful at last; and,
after the lapse of two years, I trust, it will no longer
exist. We continue to go on here in promoting phi-
lanthropic institutions; but it requires much good
judgment, and a perfect knowledge of the world, to
select those which, in their practical effect, shall pro-
duce that good to the community, which will com-
pensate the expense and gratuitous labour which is
required. Theories are often fallacious, although of
much promise, and it is only in their practical effect
that their real utility is discovered. Our London hospitals have undergone much im-
provement of late, especially since they have attracted
the notice of the legislature; and, I trust, they will
be farther ameliorated. We find here the same corruption of morals, arising
from the immoderate use of ardent spirits in vulgar
life, which you experience at New York. It is a
 malady in the moral world which is difficult to cure,
and our only hope is, that the rising generation, from
being better taught, in consequence of the general
dissemination of free schools, will conduct themselves
 with more propriety. The quantity of gin drank by
the lower orders of society in this great and over-
grown metropolis, in which so many loose and dis-
solute characters are congregated, exceeds all calcu-
lation, and there is no doubt of many thousands
being sent prematurely to the grave, by indulging in
this odious vice. I have for twenty-five years, as a 
magistrate, exerted myself to the utmost to check the
progress of this crying evil, by suppressing liquor
shops; but, as those licensed to sell ale and beer, or
porter, are also entitled to retail spirits, the task
became extremely difficult. In this country it is a
productive source of revenue. Referring you to our
mutual good friend for further particulars, I remain
always, with the most genuine regard, My dear sir,
Yours, very affectionately and sincerely, P. COLQUHOUN .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. New York, 6th mo. 7th, 1818. DEAR FRIEND, I have to acknowledge the receipt of thy ac-
ceptable favour of 3d mo. 5th, which has been com-
municated to the Board of Trustees of our Free
 School Society. They were highly pleased with the
care and attention of the British and Foreign Society,
in procuring a person, by thy account, so suitably
qualified to take charge of the schools under their
care, as Charles Picton . We hope he is now on his
passage to this country, and that he will soon be with
us. Our annual report is now printing, and I hope
to get a copy in time to send thee by this opportunity.
We have just established a third school near this city,
of about two hundred scholars, and we are about
erecting a school house, (No. 4,) to accommodate six
hundred, so that at the close of this year the Society
 will have under their charge about two thousand
children. The system is spreading in a most remark-
able manner in every part of this state, and indeed
very generally through the United States. The slave
states are much behind all others in every thing that
relates to religious or moral improvements. The
Sunday School Society in this city have succeeded
in a most wonderful manner. They have thirty-six
schools open every first day, and in the whole about
three thousand five hundred children are regularly
instructed in school learning, and much pains taken
in their religious and moral instruction. The best
school in this city is the African Free School, under
the care of our Abolition Society. They have in this
school from two hundred and fifty to three hundred
children ; besides this, some young women (Friends)
have a first day school for black women. I lately
visited it, and noticed one woman seventy-two years
of age, and another ninety-one!—Including these
 schools, and Sunday schools, there are about six hun-
dred people of colour who receive the benefits of edu-
cation in this city. I should esteem it a particular favour if thou
wouldst send me a number of your last Annual Report
of the British and Foreign School Society, and also
 some of the former years. If you have published a
historical account of that society, it would also be
very acceptable. Inclosed is a letter from Mary Knight , handed me
by a valuable friend, left open for thy perusal; he
requests thy kind attention to have it safely delivered
as directed. During the last sitting of our Legislature, I sent to
a member the following resolution, and proposed to
his consideration to offer it to the House of Assembly: Resolved, If the Hon. the Senate concur therein,
that the Governor be empowered, and he is hereby
empowered, to appoint three discreet and competent
persons, citizens of the state, as Commissioners, for
the purpose of considering what amendments, if any,
 are necessary in the existing penal laws, and to de-
vise the best plan for the management of the State
Prisons; and that the Commissioners, so appointed,
after due consideration of all matters and things
relative to the present penal code, report to the next
Legislature, such alterations and amendments of the
existing laws relative to crimes and their punish-
ments, as in their opinion may best conduce to the
welfare of the state, by the prevention of crimes,
with such reasons and observations as they may
deem requisite to explain and elucidate the al-
terations or improvements they may recommend;
and to inquire into and examine the first and
present administration of the State Prison, and to
point out the defects, if any exist, in the manage-
ment and government thereof, and what alterations
and improvements in their opinion may be necessary;
and also to devise and propose a plan of prisons to
be erected in different parts of the state, for the con-
finement of persons convicted of minor offences; and
 generally to suggest all such other matters, as in their
opinion may conduce to the improvement and per-
fection of the penal code. And that the Commis-
sioners so appointed, be authorized and empowered,
and are hereby authorized and empowered, to send
for persons and papers, and to reduce all examina-
tions and evidences taken by them to writing, and
 annex the same to their report. The foregoing resolution was presented to the As-
sembly, passed that House, and was sent to the Se-
nate. I believe it also passed that branch of the
Legislature, but am not informed if Commissioners
have been appointed; if they should be, their report,
I think, might afford interesting matter for your So-
ciety, on the melioration of the penal system. It has
been a favourite object with me for some years past,
to have prisons built in districts throughout the state,
two or three counties to form a district, for solitary
 confinement, and divided into rooms six feet by nine,
and to be appropriated solely for the punishment of
minor offences—to be kept perfectly clean and neat,
and the term of confinement not to exceed sixty or
ninety days; their friends not to be permitted to visit
them, except by special permission in writing, direct-
ed to the keeper of the prison. They should not be
employed at any kind of work, and no book allowed
them except the Bible, or some suitable religious tract. 
The plan mentioned by thee of a Reformatory for six
hundred boys, is the wisest and best ever proposed,
provided it be so built as that each boy be lodged in
a separate room; in the day, when at work, they will
have keepers constantly with them, and then it will
 be very easy to prevent them talking or having
any improper communication with each other;—if
more than one is in a room at night, they would as-
suredly corrupt each other, and thus your design, or
 reformation, must be defeated. The administration of the New York State Prison
has been very badly managed for many years; the
amount of expenditures are from twenty to thirty
thousand dollars yearly more than the amount pro-
duced by the labour of the convicts. When Friends
had the management, it was entirely different, as
will be seen by my book, published in 1804, a copy
of which was sent thee some time ago. In Philadel-
phia, the affairs of their State Prison are managed
with much care and prudence, and the profit on the
labour of the convicts is several thousand dollars
more than the cost of support and maintenance.
The friends to the penitentiary system have been
in some degree disappointed as it regards reforma-
tion of the convicts, and this, in my opinion, is entire-
ly owing to the improper construction of our prisons.
The rooms are calculated too large, and in conse-
quence of this, twelve to fifteen are put in each room
at night, and of course they corrupt each other, and
it is not unreasonable to believe that many become
more wicked and incorrigible from their impri-
sonment. The only wise plan then is, for keepers
to be constantly with them during the day whilst
at labour, and at night, let each one be lodged in
separate cells. I have many numbers of the Philanthropist, and
would be thankful if thou wouldst direct them to be
regularly sent me. The pamphlets, and Montague on Punishments, &c.,
came safe, and am much obliged by thy kind care
and attention. 15th.—We have just been informed of the safe arri-
val of John Griscom ; it is pleasing that he may
reach London in time to attend the yearly meeting,
and the annual meeting of the British and Foreign
Bible Society. I wrote him a few weeks ago, but it
is out of my power, by this conveyance, as I am just
warned that the vessel is about sailing; please to
remember me in the most affectionate manner to
him. I beg him to write me very frequently, respect-
ing his movements, prospects, &c. I am, very truly,
thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To WILLIAM ALLEN . 
 List of pamphlets directed for William Allen .—Chris-
tian Herald; Monthly Magazine; Annual Report of
the Philadelphia School Society; Memorial from the
Virginia yearly meeting to the Legislature; Two
Annual Reports of New York Free School Society,
1818; Evening Post, containing the Report of the
Society for the Deaf and Dumb, in Connecticut;
Gleaner, containing an Indian Speech; Annual Re-
port of the Female Association in the city of New
York, 1818; Description and Historical Sketch of the
State Prison of Massachusetts, 1816. London, 20th June, 1818. DEAR SIR, I had the pleasure of writing you on the 20th of
February, by my friend Mr. Greig , and I have recent-
ly had the satisfaction of learning from him, that the
papers he was so good as to take charge of, were
safely delivered into your hands, and that you were
in good health. You will see by referring to my
Treatise on Indigence, which I sent you, that I was
the first to suggest the establishment of saving banks,
so far back as the year 1806. Happy would it have
been for this country, if this, and my various other
suggestions for the amelioration of society, had been
attended to at the time they were brought forward;
but the public mind in this country, and particularly
 the Parliament, do not see good objects quickly. The
proposition was made, when a leading member
brought in a bill for amending the Poor Laws in 1806,
which did not pass the Lower House. Three years
ago, the establishment of local banks for savings
originated in Scotland, and their utility being (as I
had predicted) rendered manifest, they got a footing
in this country. They have recently been recognized
by government, and there are now about two hun-
dred establishments in different parts of Great Britain
and Ireland: but as the superintendence is gratui-
tous, and the organization of a nature not to ensure
permanency, (which was the main feature in my
plan,) I doubt their success on the present footing. A gentleman of the name of Woodson , has propo-
sed an improvement. He sent me his pamphlet, (a
copy of which I inclose you,) requesting at the same
time, that my assistance and influence might be
exerted in his behalf. He thought he had made a
 new discovery, but was surprised when I showed
him that I had brought forward a similar plan
twelve years ago. I assured him, however, of my
 co-operation, and he is now attempting to carry his
plan into effect. If it succeeds, it will be one of the
best establishments which was ever made, for the
purpose of giving provident habits to the poor, and
of rendering them independent of parish relief, which
adds greatly in other respects to their comfort. Having now reached the seventy-fourth year of my
age, and having resolved, as soon as I can, in conse-
quence of declining health, to resign all my public
laborious situations, and to devote my remaining life
to charitable objects only; in the contemplation of
this retirement, a friend of mine wished to possess
my papers, that he might give a brief view of my
public life. This he has done, and I hasten to send
you a copy of it, from which you will see that I have
not devoted any time to what is called the pleasurable
amusements of life. In my progress I have encounter-
ed many difficulties, and have subjected myself to
the most excessive labour, stimulated thereto by a
conviction, that success would generate pleasing
reflections. You too, my good sir, have pursued the
same track, perhaps in a greater degree, although you
 had not so wide a field: but you exceed me by far,
since to charitable objects you have devoted your
whole time, while mine has been occupied by a
great variety of objects. I trust, however, most of
them have been useful to my fellow citizens. I had resisted the solicitations of the editor of the
European Magazine, to set forth my portrait, and to
permit him to introduce my biography into his work
for more than twenty years, promising at the same
time, that at a future period (meaning at the close of
life) I would comply with his request. I have now
redeemed the pledge, and the biography now sent
you, will be found in the Magazine for March, April,
May, and June, in the present year. Probably the
three first numbers may have found their way to the
United States before this reaches you, the fourth is
not yet published. Nothing, in my opinion, will cure the excessive
evils arising from the immoderate use of ardent
spirits in your country, (which is even worse than
here,) than the universal diffusion of properly organi-
zed Savings Banks in each of the states, sanctioned
by legislative regulations. They are calculated
beyond all other institutions, to give provident habits
to the labouring people. Provident habits never fail
to generate industry, and to promote moral and reli-
gious feelings. In my treatise on Indigence, you
will perceive that I call it to be a god-like work. All
the regulations and restraints of the legislature, and
all the efforts of the clergy, will, without this great
auxiliary, be of little avail. Our free schools go on prosperously: but until they
are made completely national, and not made to de-
pend on voluntary subscriptions, and voluntary super-
intendence, I have my fears as to their permanency.
They should be placed on the footing of those in Scot-
land, established in every parish more than a century
and a half ago, to which is to be attributed the
superior moral habits of the labouring classes in that
 country beyond all others in Europe. We expended
4000l. raised by subscription, in erecting a new
school in this quarter of Westminster, for the educa-
tion of 1000 male and female children, which school
I founded in 1803. I send you our last report. We have in this great metropolis, many useful, and
I am sorry to say, many useless charities, suggested
by benevolent well-meaning persons, whose minds
are not sufficiently enlarged to foresee that the expense
produces little practical results; while others, such as
the hospitals for the sick and diseased, (where the
benefits are unquestionable) are overlooked. Many
 of the wards, in the different establishments, are occa-
sionally empty for want of funds; and the admission
of patients, from this circumstance, is precluded. Inclosed I send you the under noted publications,
which I hope may prove interesting. With great regard and esteem,
I remain always, my dear Sir,
 Yours very affectionately and sincerely, P. COLQUHOUN . 
To THOMAS EDDY . 
 List of Pamphlets enclosed. Biography of P. Colquhoun. Mr. Woodson on Savings Banks, by Mr. Wood-
son. Minutes of a public meeting to promote his
plan. Dialogue to promote Savings Banks. Report on the Fever Institution. Report of the Westminster National School. London, 24th June, 1818. SIR, I have the pleasure to acquaint you, that the com-
mittee for the improvement of prison discipline, &c.,
have unanimously elected you an honorary member
of the society. I request your acceptance of a few copies of their
report, recently published, containing an account of
 their past proceedings, and explanatory of their
future objects; and I shall be happy to forward to
you, from time to time, the future publications of the
society. I am, Sir, your obedient servant, SAMUEL HOARE , junr.,
Chairman of the Committee.
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. New York, 7th month, 8th, 1818. MY DEAR FRIEND, I wrote thee soon after thy departure from this
country, and once since, and about ten days ago
received thy esteemed favour, dated, Liverpool, 5th
month, 7th, which gave the pleasing intelligence of
thy safe arrival. How highly gratified I should be,
by being with thee for a few months, and mixing
with that kind of society, that thou wilt be constant-
ly meeting in thy tour through England. As this is
not to be my lot, it would be the next most pleasing
enjoyment, to hear frequently from thee, with very
full details of thy observations on men and things,
in the course of thy travels. I was much pleased
with thy account of William Roscoe , and in conse-
quence of thy recommendation, have put up a large
bundle of pamphlets, amongst which are accounts of
 Philadelphia, New York, and Boston Prisons. Such
a man, engaging with zeal in the cause of humanity,
particularly as it relates to a melioration of the penal
laws of Great Britain, might do wonders. To effect
this, requires patience and perseverance;—the whole
 work may be ruined by men, who in England are
called Oppositionists or Reformers, (in America, De-
mocrats,) and who, actuated by an overstrained zeal,
do not know how to take hold of things at the right
time; like many religious zealots, they press on the
people more than they are able to bear. The light
with which Providence has been pleased to enlight-
en the minds of men, as it regards moral or reli-
gious truths, is gradual—as was the commencement
of the abolition of slavery. If the good people in
England, who are now engaged in endeavouring to
effect an alteration in the penal system, act wisely,
they will be exceedingly prudent and cautious not
to press for too much in their first application—
eventually they must succeed in so righteous a cause. I expect thou wilt procure a fund of information,
relating to public institutions, particularly Lunatic
Asylums. I requested of thee, if thou shouldst visit
York, to find out, if in thy power, on what account
it is, that Samuel Tuke seems offended with me—it
may be for my publishing one of his letters to me,
 in doing which I conceived it was promoting the
public good by using his name. I am very sorry, if
in any way, his feelings have been hurt, owing to any
part of my conduct. I hope thou arrived in London in time for the
 Annual Meeting of the Bible Society, and also for our
yearly meeting—do they manage their matters bet-
ter in London than with us? The last London print-
ed epistle, was not printed by our yearly meeting as
usual; this was opposed by E. Hicks , Willet , and
others of his disciples, on account of it containing
some pointed good remarks, on the observance of the
First Day—it was advocated by G. Dillwyn , &c. &c.,
but they were obliged to yield, in order to preserve
peace and harmony. For some days past, we have had the company of
J. Wistar , T. Stewardson , William Newbould , Samuel
 Bettle, and R. Hartshorn , appointed by the Indian com-
mittee of Philadelphia, on the subject of Indian affairs,
but particularly respecting the purchase made by D. A.
Ogden and others, of all the Indian reservations. Our Pauper Society does not get forward with any
spirit, and, in my opinion will cease, till thee return
to revive it. I wish W. Allen would direct the Phi-
lanthropist to be regularly forwarded to me—I have
had no numbers since those received from thee—I
wrote him about two weeks ago, and sent him some
pamphlets—please return to him my thanks for a
parcel he sent me, which came safe to hand, and
were very acceptable. R. Mott and wife propose to
spend the summer mostly at his farm—S. Hopkins and
D. Sands , deceased. Our friends generally are well as
usual—R. Bowne 's health unexpectedly improving. Last First Day, Samuel Bettle preached for us at
Pearl-street about an hour, equal to the best, if not
the best sermon I ever heard delivered—truly ortho-
dox on important doctrines—the language was excel-
lent—his manner of delivery extremely agreeable,—
and a most uncommon solemnity seemed to cover
the whole meeting, equal to any thing of the kind I
ever witnessed. 8th month, 5th. Absence from the city, and other circumstances,
prevented me sending this as soon as intended. I
have now to mention the decease of our mutual
 valuable friend, R. Bowne , on First Day evening last,
in the seventy-fourth year of his age—the funeral at
5 o'clock this day. Reuben and Jane got here last
evening from Philadelphia—I intend writing again
soon, and shall send the last report of the American
Bible Society—I have been anxiously expecting a 
letter after thee reached London—pray do not omit
writing me often—Eastburn &. Co. are about pub-
lishing a third edition of Professor Silliman's Travels. I am, very truly, thine, &c. THOMAS EDDY . J. GRISCOM . New York, 8th month, 8th, 1818. RESPECTED FRIEND, In a late letter from my particular and valuable
friend, John Griscom , he informed me of the peculiar
gratification he enjoyed in thy company at Liver-
pool, and of thy being a warm advocate in favour
of obtaining an alteration of your penal code, and
requested me to forward thee some printed accounts
of the Penitentiary system in this country. It is with
much pleasure that I comply with my friends request,
and now send to care of Cropper, Benson, & Co., a
bundle containing several pamphlets relating to our
prisons, and have added some others that I conceived
would be interesting to thee. We have in this state
two large prisons, one in this city that has about 750
convicts, and one at Auburn, (about 150 miles west
of Albany,) built last year, that will accommodate
about the same number. The affairs of the prison
in this city have been badly managed for some years.
That punishments mild and certain will more effect-
ually prevent crimes, than those which are sangui-
nary and severe, there can be no doubt; and this
would have been most completely verified, if the
plan of our prisons had been adapted to the design
and intention of our Penitentiary system; they should
have been so built, that each convict might be con-
fined at night in a separate room—say six by eight
 feet—but unfortunately the rooms, in all our prisons
are calculated for eight to fourteen prisoners, so that
when they are lodged together at night, they have
full opportunity to corrupt each other, and most fre-
quently come out of prison more hardened and
depraved than when they entered it. During the
day, whilst employed at work, and at their meals,
 as keepers are constantly with them, it is very easy
to prevent them conversing with each other; and if,
at night, each of them were confined in a separate
room, there would be some good chance for reforma-
tion; indeed, in this way the punishment would be
more severely felt, and the term of imprisonment
might be shortened. I interested myself in vain
with our government, to have the prison lately built
at Auburn, divided throughout into rooms, to accom-
modate only one prisoner; they however agreed to
have 140 such rooms, in order to keep separate the
most abandoned characters. In a late conversation
with our Governor, he regretted very much that the
 prison had not been built agreeably to the plan
recommended by me. I am perfectly satisfied that
until all our prisons are on this plan, the expecta-
tions of those who are desirous of a rational reform
will not be answered. If you should succeed in
obtaining an alteration of your penal laws, it would
be a fortunate circumstance, if your prisons should
be calculated throughout on the plan of rooms to
lodge one person. I inclose thee a printed copy of a paper read before
the Governors of the New York Hospital, in which
I recommended them to erect an extensive Asylum
 for Lunatics, and have now the satisfaction to state,
that they have purchased thirty-four acres of land,
near the city, and have commenced ereting a build-
 ing for the accommodation of 300 insane patients, and
intend to pursue the same mild plan of treatment
as adopted at the retreat, near York, in England. One section of the grand canal, intended to con-
nect the waters of Lake Erie with the Hudson River,
will be completed this year—this section commences
at Utica, on the Mohawk River, and extends to Sene-
ca River, about fifteen miles west of Onondaga Lake,
a distance of seventy miles. Thy affectionate friend,THOMAS EDDY .
WILLIAM ROSCOE , Esq. 
 A List of Pamphlets sent William Roscoe , Esq. A Memorial and Petition of the Society of Friends,
by B. Bates . A Discourse on the death of Captain Paul Cuffee . The Report of the Committee on Pauperism. Report of the Society of Philadelphia on Charity
Schools. Information of the progress of the Asylum near
 Philadelphia. Governor Clinton 's Discourse before the New York
 Historical Society. Report of the New York Hospital Society—1817. Report of the Female Association—1818. Historical Sketch of Massachusetts State Prison. Report of the Commissioners on Internal Naviga
tion, state of New York—1811, 1812, 1817. Account of the New York State Prison, by Thomas
Eddy—1801. View of New York State Prison—1815. Account of Massachusetts State Prison. Statistical view of the operation of the penal code
of Pennsylvania. Map of the Western part of the State of New York. Map of Niagara River. Map of the countries between the Great Lakes,
and the Atlantic Ocean. Hints for introducing an improved mode of treat-
ing the Insane. American Bible Society Report—1818. Liverpool, 30th September, 1818. DEAR SIR, I avail myself of this opportunity to express my
grateful acknowledgments for your valuable commu-
nication of Reports and Documents respecting your
state prisons and other institutions, which have
arrived at a moment when they will be of important
service to me, in a publication which I intend short-
ly to send to press, on the state of our criminal law,
and the reformation of offenders. I have observed with great concern, the unfavoura-
ble change which seems to have taken place in these
establishments on your side the Atlantic, and am
convinced, from the best consideration I can give the
subject, that they are occasioned, in a great degree,
by the causes mentioned in your letter—the inade-
quacy of the buildings, and the want of separate
apartments at night for the convicts; but, independ-
ent of this, there are other circumstances which
appear to me to be of great importance, and which
I intend to state pretty much at large. I hope in
the course of six or eight weeks to be enabled to
send you a copy of my publication, in which I have
the pleasure to think you will find a close conformity
to your own opinions and recommendations, so
clearly stated, and so strikingly enforced, in some of
the works with which you have favoured me. I shall only at present beg leave further to observe,
that I am sorry to find some indications of an inten-
tion on the part of your managers, to abolish the
power of pardoning criminals, and to render punish-
ment certain as to duration—a measure which, as it
appears to me, would put an end to Penitentiary
establishments altogether. That this power may
have been indiscreetly used, is possible, but it is not
the sending convicts out, but the receiving them in again,
that occasions the evil complained of, as I hope you
will see stated in the sheets I shall send you. Our good friend, Mr. Griscom , is travelling on the
continent of Europe, with another friend of mine,
and I believe intends to make a visit to Italy. I think myself happy in being favoured with this
 friendly interchange of opinion, with one whose
attention has been so long, and so successfully devo
ted to the subject. And with sincere esteem and
attachment, remain, Dear Sir, your much obliged
and faithful friend, W. ROSCOE .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. New York, 12th month, 28th, 1818. To THOMAS ELLICOTT & PHILIP E. THOMAS . David A. Ogden holds the pre-emption right of pur-
chasing all the Indian reservations in our state. He
is very desirous the Indians should remove to the
Westward, and sell to him their reservations. These
Indians west of Genessee River, have heen under
the care of Friends in Philadelphia, and they have
uniformly advised the Indians not to remove. Ogden 
prevailed on Calhoun to address to him a letter
which he then communicated to the Indians. One Jabez Hyde , a Presbyterian minister or school-
master, residing among them, published the letter.
 When we met our Friends in Philadelphia, we found
their minds much soured and prejudiced against
government, and particularly against the Secretary
at War; they asked, why should any confidence be
placed in men who would talk so smooth to us, and
at the same time write a letter, with a view to have
it shown to the Indians, stating that Friends were
their worst enemies. It did not serve to alter the
opinion so strongly taken up by them, that we urged
our own belief, and that of T. McKenney , that Cal-
houn did not intend any way to allude to Friends.
We believed, we told them, that Ogden had stated to
Calhoun , that a number of whites residing near the
Indians, constantly urged them not to remove, and
who, by trade and artifice, got from the Indians, every
 year, the amount of the annuities paid them by go-
vernment; and thus it became the interest of this class
of people, to use every means in their power to per-
suade the Indians not to remove. In making such
a representation, Ogden induced Calhoun to write
this letter. I am satisfied that he (Ogden ) never
mentioned to the Secretary that Friends had advised
the Indians to remain on their lands—it would have
been bad policy for him to have urged such senti-
ments. In short, I do not believe Calhoun thought
of Friends when he wrote the letter. It is probably
true, that at that time, government supposed it would
be for the interest of the Indians of New York to
remove to the borders of the Mississippi; but I am
 well convinced they have changed their sentiments,
and that now they agree most decidedly with us, that
the Indians ought to remain on their reservations. We found that Friends, at their last meeting for
sufferings, held in Philadelphia, appointed a commit-
tee to draft a Memorial, which is prepared, and some
Friends in a few days will be appointed to attend
Congress with it. From the representation we made
to them of our kind reception at Washington, and
our urging that we had full confidence in the assu-
rance given to us of the kind disposition of the Presi-
dent, Calhoun , McKenney , &c., their minds seemed to
be in some degree softened—still they seemed as if
they could not be reconciled to Calhoun 's letter to
Ogden . Owing to people coming in, and constantly
interrupting me, it is with difficulty I write, but
thought it was best to give you these hints—you may
consider if it would be proper for you to address a
confidential letter to McKenney , requesting an expla-
nation of Calhoun 's letter, and probably our Phila-
delphia Friends prejudices might be removed. Not time to add, &c. THOMAS EDDY . P.S. We pressed very earnestly on our Friends in
Philadelphia, to forward you such matter, as would
enable you to furnish the committee of Congress the
proofs they required—but we are fearful they will
put it off till the committee goes to Washington. I
hope you will, without delay, further to Southard 
your own materials, with what we left with you. Liverpool, 20th February, 1819. DEAR SIR, With this you will, I hope, receive two copies of
my promised Treatise on Penal Jurisprudence, and
the Reformation of Offenders, which I submit with
great diffidence to your judgment and experience;
and should feel still more, if I had not, in almost
every respect, conformed to your views, and availed
myself of your excellent writings on this subject,
which do the greatest credit both to yourself and your
country; on which account, you will find I have not
only occasionally quoted you, but have given the Re-
port of the State Prison of New York for 1815 (which
contains so many of your excellent remarks) entire. From the portion of my tract which relates to this
country, you will perceive, that we are not insensible
to the great importance of the penitentiary system,
and that some idea of such a plan has been enter-
tained, even from a remote period; but that which has
always been wanting, has been to place it on a pro-
per ground, and to substitute a system of benevolence
and reformation for one of revenge and punishment. If this can be fully effected, every thing else will
naturally flow from it, as from a parent stream; and
from the united efforts that are making in almost
every civilized part of the world, and the free com-
munication of sentiments between those who are
earnest in the cause, I trust that such a foundation
will be laid for the moral improvement of mankind,
as may allow us to indulge the warmest hopes of a
speedy and happy result. The publications you were so good as to send me,
were of the highest value, as they show, by a variety
of experiments, not only what ought to be done in
establishing a penitentiary system, but what ought
to be avoided. On this head, you will see I have
expressed myself with great freedom, and will, per-
haps, think I have been more ready to blame than
to commend. If, however, I have written without
reserve, I have also endeavoured to give reasons for
my opinions; and it would give me the greatest plea-
sure, if any suggestions of mine should be thought
 worthy the attention of those in your country, who
interest themselves in the promotion of these most
important and benevolent plans. Accept, once more, my sincere thanks for your kind
 attentions, and believe me, with the most grateful
respect and attachment, Dear Sir, Your faithful friend,
And humble fellow-labourer, W. ROSCOE .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. New York, 8th mo. 9th, 1819. ESTEEMED FRIEND, I duly received thy kind favour, dated 20th Febru-
ary, accompanied with two copies of thy Treatise on
Penal Jurisprudence, &c., which were truly accept-
able; and, from a careful perusal of the work, am
well satisfied it will be extensively useful in your
country, and also in the United States. I had some
 expectation that an edition would have been printed
here, but in this have I been disappointed. If a few
copies could be sent by Robinson, bookseller, Liver-
pool, to James Eastburn & Co., booksellers in this
city, they might be readily sold, and I am well satis-
fied would be of great use, as they would, no doubt,
be generally read by the members of our legislature,
at their next session in January. The subject relating
to the affairs of our penitentiary system, &c., will
then be before them. The success of the establish-
ments in Boston, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, Baltimore,
and, I believe, in Virginia, has been equal to the
warmest expectations of our friends; but, in this
state, every thing has been sadly mismanaged for
some years past. In Pennsylvania, a prison is build-
ing, calculated to lodge each convict in a separate
 room, and I am in hopes we shall have one erected
on this plan in this state. I am satisfied, that until
our prisons are all so built, we shall never have the
system pei feet. My sentiments on this are fully men-
tioned in the first letter I had the pleasure of address-
ing to thee. I expect shortly a communication from
Cadwallader D. Colden , Esq., mayor of New York,
on the effects of our present code of penal laws, as
to the increase or diminution of crimes. There is no
person more capable of forming a correct judgment,
and none whose opinions would have more extensive
influence on the minds of our citizens. He has been
a warm friend to the system for many years. As
 soon as I get this communication, a copy shall be sent
thee, and also some other materials that I expect to
procure. I am, very truly, Thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To WILLIAM ROSCOE . Weston, George Town, March 19th, 1819. RESPECTED FRIEND, I am gratified at the interest you take in our In-
dian concerns, and thank you for your letter of the
3d inst., and for the pamphlet which accompanied it. I have not yet learned the views of the President,
respecting the application of the 10,000 dollars, ap-
propriated near the close of the late session of Con-
gress, to aid in the business of Indian improvement.
My own opinion is, (and it is only my opinion,) that
it will be applied through the benevolent agencies
which are, or may be, put in operation; and at such
 points as it shall be likely to do the most good, ac-
cording to the intentions of the act of Congress.
Those establishments, so it strikes me, will be recog-
nized as most in accordance with this view, that are,
 or may be, organized in the Indian country; and
which embrace the two branches of improvement,
implied in letters and the agricultural arts, united
also with a system of moral improvement. This par-
ticular application, it strikes me, will be, as the sum
is, to the number of Indian children taken in by
these liberal associations of men for education. Thus,
if there be ten schools of instruction, for example, in
the Indian country, averaging each one hundred chil-
dren, there will be one thousand dollars for each
establishment. The amount appropriated is so small, when com-
pared with the object of general or universal im-
provement, that, to make it useful, it can be used
only as an auxiliary to the resources which indivi-
dual bounty has provided. I will just name one
school in the Cherokee country, in charge of the good
Mr. Gambold . He is labouring, and has been for
fourteen years, in this generous cause; and his plans
have not been developed, nor his scale of usefulness
extended to its limits, for lack of pecuniary resources.
Five and six children are as many as his means have
ever enabled him to instruct. I don't know what his
 resources are, but I will suppose them to be at the
rate of fifty dollars per annum for each child; and,
suppose he can educate and instruct out of his own
means, in the various branches of improvement which
his school embraces, only five children; and suppose
it shall turn out, in the general estimate, that a hun-
dred dollars can be applied, out of the 10,000 appro-
priated, for each child,—that would enable Mr. Gam-
bold to take fifteen children, or ten more than the
number to which, I suppose, he has been hitherto
 confined. I merely refer to this case, as being the
first that has struck me; and to this mode of illus-
tration, without knowing what plan the President
may adopt. I incline to the opinion, however, that
his contemplated tour may prevent him from doing
more than acquire a collection of information appli-
cable to the case, against his return. It seems you have, in the state of New York, 4976
Indians, and that these Indians have 271,323 acres of
land as reservations. I am glad they are so well off
in the land way. How would it sort with your con-
venience to let me know, how many schools for im-
provement are organized in their settlements, exclu-
sively for Indian education? and where located?—
and how many children are attached to each of them?
and, as far as you may be able, what state of im-
provement they are in. In truth, my good friend, I
look to the Indian children for the realization of
 Indian civilization. The main efforts should be made
to apply to them. The old ones are like the moun-
tain oaks, (here and there some exceptions,) and it
were an almost hopeless task to attempt their con-
formity with civilized life. But they must soon die
off—such is nature's decree; and if vigorous measures
be adopted for the children, they will, when they
arrive at maturity, appear like the vernal year, in
 contrast with the barrenness of a recent winter pros-
pect. My wish is, that the principles of improvement
be extended to as many Indian children as they can
be made to reach. They are the virgin soil—the seeds
sown in them will grow, be they bad or good. I am sure the President would be gratified to recog-
nize your recommendation of agents to go amongst
the New York Indians, if it shall come within his
scheme to make such appointments. It is certain you
would name none, but such as would promote the
great object of their civilization and improvement. The Indians at Allegany and Onondago are in a
fair way. They have banished the greatest evil, the
small-pox not excepted, that ever desolated any peo-
ple. It is literally the Indians' curse. In excluding
ardent spirits, they have got the top upon Pandora's
box, and may a kind Providence help them to keep
 it there! It would be gratifying all round, no doubt, to pro-
mote the views embraced in your suggestions; and,
if the principle of distribution shall be adopted, the
New York Indians will get, through the benevolent
channels, where I think it likely it will be all made
to flow, some portion of this small sum. The appoint-
ment of an agent or two, as you suggest, is a good
plan; especially as the New York Indians are in so
many separate clans; for then the agent could super-
intend the improvement of them all more generally,
by going amongst them, and counselling them accord-
ing to your plan. But will it not cost an over pro-
portion of the appropriation in that direction, if $1600
be necessary?—especially as these Indians are doing
 so much better than many others, in every way. Or
would not $1600 for 4976 Indians, leave too small a
sum to go to the four nations on our borders, whose
numbers may be estimated at 100,000? This may go
to show the propriety of using this appropriation as
an auxiliary to existing organizations, where its
effects may tell upon a congregation of children, and
give means to increase their numbers, or power to
confer additional improvements upon those already
 admitted. For I think (for myself) the children should
be the subjects of our special care. This, however, is
not intended to exclude the Indian children in New
York from their proportion of benefits; and hence,
I have suggested that you favour me with the infor-
mation I have referred to. But all this is my own
first thinking, very hastily thrown together, not one
point of which may be adopted in the regulations
which shall be finally made. I will cheerfully lay any communication you may
make on this subject before the Secretary of War,
 who will be the organ to the President in this matter. I have sent after a copy of Heckwelder 's book. No
doubt I shall enjoy it, and derive benefit from it, in
the way of information. With regard,
I am, dear sir, your friend, &c., T.L. McKENNEY. 
Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. 
 N.B. This letter is in the hand-writing of the Choc-
taw boy, whom you saw at my house, and for whom I
am gratified to have it in my power to state, Mr. Cal-
houn has authorized an extension of benefits, in the
way of scholastic acquirements. His promise is great. Schenectady, November 8, 1819. MY GOOD FRIEND, I have thought much on the great subjects talked
over at our late interesting and very pleasant inter-
view at your house. I have since conversed with
many distinguished gentlemen in your city, on board
the steam boat, and in the city of Albany, particu-
larly with the Governor , Lieutenant Governor , and
Mr. Van Rensselaer , (the Patroon)—all enter very
heartily into our views. The Governor , and Mr. Van
Rensselaer, are both going in a few days to New
York, on a visit of several weeks. I expect to meet
them there. They will be pleased to have a con-
ference with you on the subjects which interests us,
and them also. The Governor suggested the idea of
having a meeting, after my return to your city, of a
number of gentlemen, who are like minded with our-
selves, and of intelligence and influence, to confer on
 the best measures to ripen our plans, and to carry
them into effect. Mr. Van Rensselaer will be present,
and will probably be willing to go on to Washing-
ton this winter, and aid in effecting our purposes
there, particularly in forming a new association
which you suggested, of all denominations, to do
every thing for the Indians, except introducing parti-
cular religious instruction. This plan, I think, will
take. I think I shall make an effort to go myself
to Washington, and hope, by all means, you, my
friend, will calculate to go—and then we shall feel
strong. The object is a great and good one, and
worthy a great effort. It opens here very auspicious-
ly, and I am full of hope. I write after the fatigues of the day, in the bustle of
a public house—but I will make no farther apology. With kind regard to your good family, believe me,
very sincerely, Your friend, JEDEDIAH MORSE . 
THOMAS EDDY . New York, 11th mo. 15th, 1819. RESPECTED FRIEND, Thy very obliging favour of June 24th, 1818, was
received some time since, and to which I should have
replied before this, but delayed, because I wished to
make some communication relating to the objects
that particularly claim the attention of your respecta-
ble society. Some of the prisons established in Ame-
rica have not answered the expectation of the advo-
cates for the penitentiary system, most of whom
were led to believe, that the avails of the labour of
the convicts would be sufficient to defray all the ex-
penses of their maintenance, &c. This has certainly
not been the fact as to the State Prison in New York,
owing entirely to the appointment of persons, who
have had the management of its concerns, not being
rightly qualified for executing the duties required of
them. The consequence of this has been, that the
expense of supporting that prison has been very con-
siderable. However, considering the great advan-
tage contemplated to result from the penitentiary
system, the mere expense is a matter of secondary
consideration. Yet experience has proved in New
Jersey, Philadelphia, Baltimore, and Virginia, that
under prudent direction and good management, the
profits on the labour of the convicts will produce suf-
ficient to pay all the necessary expenses of their sup-
port, &c. I think the best conducted penitentiary
we have in America is at Baltimore. 1 visited that
prison a few months ago, and was highly gratified in
observing the order, cleanliness, regularity, and in-
dustry of the prisoners. I never visited any institu-
tion that exhibited such a perfect degree of cleanli-
ness, decency, and regularity, throughout its whole
concerns, as the Baltimoreprison, the effects of which
were evidently marked in the countenance and gene-
 ral deportment of the convicts. The present very
promising state of the Maryland penitentiary is ow-
ing to the excellent management of their Board of In-
spectors, which is composed of gentlemen of the first
character in the city of Baltimore. The institution
is also much indebted to the judicious care and good
conduct of the present keeper, who is an active and
intelligent man. I requested him to send me a direct
account of the expenditures, &c. of the prison for the
last year, which I have received from him, forward-
ed me by one of the Inspectors a few days ago; and
believing that this document may be interesting to
your Society, I have had it copied, and now inclose it. There is one remark respecting the penitentiary
system, which I beg leave to mention. No benefit, as
it regards reformation, ever has been, nor ever will be
produced, unless our prisons are calculated to have
separate rooms, six feet by eight feet, so as that every
man can be lodged by himself. If, as is common,
twelve to twenty are lodged at night in one room,
they surely will corrupt each other, and leave the
prison far more depraved than when they entered it.
 I think there is good reason to believe that our legis-
lature will direct the state prison in this city to be
sold next year, and order a new one to be built, to
be divided in rooms of six by eight feet each. I
 would further observe, that during the day, when the
prisoners are employed at their work, they are, of
course, constantly under the immediate eye of a
keeper, and no improper intercourse or conversation
 can take place. At Pittsburg, (Pennsylvania,) a pri-
son, on the plan of separate rooms for each convict,
is now building, and I am told they intend erecting
a similar one in Philadelphia. Several years ago, I
mentioned to my friend, P. Colquhoun , of London,
that no reformation could possibly be expected from
the operation of the penitentiary system, unless the
prisons were built on a plan for the convicts to be
 separately lodged at night, and I think he stated that
some in England were on that construction, but in
his late letters to me he is silent on the subject of pri-
sons. I am told that there is a prison in the environs
of London, built to accommodate seven hundred
prisoners, and each lodged in a room seven by nine
feet. If this is a fact, I should be much gratified by
having some account of it. My friend William
Allen, some time since, wrote me that it was propo-
sed to build a prison solely for lads under eighteen
years of age, to be called a Reformatory, but I have
not heard if this has been completed. Our Society for the Prevention of Pauperism, has
 appointed a committee to consider of the present
state of our prisons, &c. The committee will pro-
bably report in a few weeks, when a copy shall be
sent to your society. I am very sensible of the favour conferred on me
by your society, in electing me an honorary member,
and beg leave to return them my sincere thanks for this
mark of their respect. I shall, with much pleasure,
forward any publications on the subject of prisons,
&c. that may appear to me likely to be interesting to
your society. I am, with much esteem
Thy assured friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To SAMUEL HOARE , junr. Chairman of the Committee
for the Improvement of Prison Discipline. Albany, 21st November, 1820. MY WORTHY OLD FRIEND, As you assured me you would write our mutual
friend, Robert Troup , Esq., of Geneva, as to your
recollection about the old Canal affair, and his con-
formity to the letter I left for you in New York—and
as Troup writes me of the 17th instant, he had not
read it, and his pamphlet is suspended, waiting to
receive it; he is anxious on the subject, and wished
me to say to you, he apprehends you have wrote
by some private person, and that the letter has mis-
carried. lie will thank you to take the trouble to
send him a duplicate, by mail, not doubting from
your known habits of punctuality, and a scrupulous
regard to your word, but you must have wrote him. Be assured, in this matter, there is no tincture of
party—we both gave our votes to Clinton in April
last—and you will find by a perusal of the work,
(which I hope you will do me the honour to admit
in your library,) that I did Clinton the most ample
justice. Truth and justice is all our aim to establish—your
just claims will also be speedily noticed—and poste-
rity will not fail to hold your eminent services in
grateful remembrance. I am, my Dear Sir,
With great respect, E. WATSON .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. Geneva, Ontario County, 29th Nov. 1820. MY DEAR FRIEND, I beg leave to return you a thousand thanks for
your very obliging letter of the 14th instant. I am writing an argument on the subject of the
 canal policy of this state, to vindicate myself against
a scandalous charge I met with in the first number
of Tacitus; which is understood to have been either
written by Governor Clinton , or under his eye and 
direction. Your letter speaks of a particular fact, in relation
to the Canal Bill of 1792; and as it tallies with all
my other evidence, I shall take the liberty of using
your letter as far as the particular fact is concerned. My argument will go to the press to-morrow or
next day, but it will not be ready for forwarding to
my friends in a pamphlet form, until the beginning
of December. I shall beg the favour of your accept-
ing one from, My dear friend, yours most fervently, ROBERT TROUP .
Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. New York, 11th month, 3d, 1820. RESPECTED FRIEND, I am extremely desirous of obtaining some inform-
ation of an establishment at Aversa, near Naples,
which, I am told, is solely for the accommodation of
Lunatics. As I have no acquaintance with any per-
son residing at Naples, from whom I could procure
the information wanted, I applied to my friend,
Stephen Grellet , who immediately mentioned to me
thy name, and stated, from his personal acquaint-
ance, he was well assured of thy benevolence and
kindness, and that I might take the liberty of address-
ing a letter to thee on the subject of my inquiry. This,
I hope, will be kindly received, as an apology for my
taking this freedom. It is said, that the mode of treatment towards the
patients at Aversa, is replete with tender and affec-
tionate care and attention, in place of the harsh, cruel,
and rigorous treatment, that has heretofore been
administered towards Lunatic patients. This mode,
called moral treatment, has been pursued with great
success, at an Asylum called the Retreat, near York,
(England,) under the care of the society of Friends,
for the accommodation of the members of their own
society. Near this city we have just completed a
large handsome building, exclusively for Lunatics,
which will accommodate more than 200 patients;
 attached to it is about eighty acres of land, orna-
mented with extensive gravel walks, shrubberies,
gardens, green-house, &c. Here it is intended to
employ the patients in Horticulture and Agriculture,
also to afford them every rational amusement. I
have been one of the governors of the New York
Hospital for many years; and about four years ago,
introduced to them, a proposition to establish an
Asylum about six miles from the city, solely for
Lunatic Patients, on the plan of moral treatment,
as pursued at the Retreat near York. The governors adopted the proposed plan, and
have expended on the building, land, &c., $150,000.
It is very desirable, that the managers of this concern
should be as perfect as possible, and I am therefore
induced to crave thy kind aid, in procuring for me a
general and ample account respecting the establish-
ment at Aversa; as to the general mode of treating
the patients, diet, employment, &c. I am very fear-
ful of giving thee too much trouble, but perhaps much
may be saved, if printed accounts could be procured.
They might readily be translated in this city. I
have made up a package containing accounts of some
of our benevolent institutions of this city. Also
reports relating to the grand canal, which is intend-
ed to open a communication between Lake Erie and
the Hudson River, a distance of 325 miles. It is three years since this great work was com-
menced, and already one hundred miles are comple-
ted; near one hundred more is this year in such a
state of forwardness, that it will also be completed
 early next year. The whole extent, 325 miles, will
probably be finished by the year 1824. The cost of
this great undertaking, (from Erie to the Hudson)
 will be about five millions of dollars. I send thee a
small map, which will serve to show the route of the
canal. There are three American young gentlemen who
expect to visit Naples next spring; William Charning
Woodbridge, Cornelius Tuthill , and Theodore Dwight,
junr.; their connexions in this country are very
respectable. These young men, on getting to Naples
will probably wait on thee, as I have requested their
connexion to desire they would do so, as it will afford
an opportunity for thee to send any dispatches thou
 mayest have for America. Any attention shown by
thee to these young men, will be most gratefully
acknowledged by their friends, and also confer on
me a singular obligation. Our mutual friend, S. Grellet , desires me particu
larly to say, that he wishes to be most kindly and
affectionately remembered to thee and thy good lady. I am, with great respect and esteem,
Thy assured friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To Sir HENRY LUSHINGTON, H.B.M. Consul General, Naples. New York, 11th month, 14th, 1820. MY DEAR FRIEND, Having been informed that it is thy intention to
publish some account of the inland navigation of our
state, and of the progress made in improving it since
1792; and being requested by our mutual friends —,
to communicate to thee, how far, in my opinion, the
statements made by Elkanah Watson , contained in
his book, entitled, the History of the Rise and Progress
of the Western Canals, are correct; I shall submit
the following observations. I have no doubt of the
fact, that it was in consequence of Elkanah Watson 
having communicated to General Schuyler the obser-
vations he had made during his tour to the western
part of the state in 1791, and particularly as to the
great benefits that would result by improving the
Mohawk River, and opening a canal communication
at Fort Stanwix, to Wood Creek, and from thence to
 improve the navigation to the Seneca Lake, that first
turned the attention of General Schuyler to these
important objects, and induced him to offer to the
Senate, the act incorporating the Western and North-
ern Inland Lock Navigation Companies. Indeed,
General Schuyler , about the year 1790, often men-
tioned this fact to me; and during the remainder of
his life, I several times accompanied him, in examin-
ing the Mohawk River, and westward, as far as the
Seneca Lake, with a view to ascertain the practica-
bility of improvements by canal navigation, &c.
The Western Canal Company expended a vast sum
of money in improving the Mohawk, &c. and being
well satisfied that the stockholders would not consent
 to advance any further sums, for making improve-
ments west of the Oneida Lake, I called on Judge
Platt one evening at Albany, in 1810, and mentioned
to him the propriety of proposing to the legislature,
to appoint commissioners to explore the country as
far west as the Seneca Lake, and to report their
opinion, how far it was practicable to connect that lake
by a canal with the Hudson River; and stated, that
from my own knowledge of the face of the country,
I was perfectly satisfied a favourable report would be
 made, and that, considering the immense advantage
that would result to the state by such an undertaking,
there could be no doubt the legislature would readily
be induced to adopt the plan. Judge Platt was at this time a member of the Sen-
ate, and being well acquainted with the geography
of the state, readily agreed with me in sentiment,
but he remarked, that if commissioners were appoint-
ed, they ought to be directed to explore and examine
the country as far as Lake Erie, to ascertain if it was
practicable, to connect that lake by canal naviga-
tion with Hudson River. I replied, that I was fear-
ful the legislature would be deterred from making any
appointment of commissioners, if so great an under-
taking should be proposed, and that by proposing for
them to examine the country only as far as the Sene-
ca Lake, they might then be induced to adopt the
measure. After some farther conversation, it was
 agreed to propose going as far as Lake Erie, and
 Judge Platt immediately drafted a joint resolution,
to be offered to the Senate next morning. The next
morning I was in the Senate chamber, and we called
out De Witt Clinton , communicated to him the sub-
ject we had in view, and handed to him for his
perusal the proposed draft of a joint resolution—he
 expressed himself highly pleased with the project,
said it had his hearty concurrence, and should have
his decided support. Judge Platt immediately return-
ed to his seat, and presented the resolution to the
Senate, which was seconded by De Witt Clinton , and
passed unanimously; it was then immediately sent
to the Assembly, and also passed there without oppo-
sition. These commissioners made several reports,
all which are likely in thy possession; the joint reso-
lution was dated 15th March, 1810. After the war,
it seemed necessary to excite the attention of the
 legislature to the prosecution of the grand canal.
Judge Platt being in the city in 1816, we conversed
on the subject, and were of opinion, that it would
likely produce a good effect, if a general meeting
of our citizens could be had, and they be induced to
present a memorial to the legislature, stating the
advantages that would result, by connecting the
 waters of the Great Western and Northern Lakes
with the Atlantic Ocean. On consulting with De
Witt Clinton and John Swartwout , it was agreed to
 address circular letters to several of our most influ-
ential citizens, requesting them to attend a regular
meeting at the City Hotel. This meeting was large
and respectable, and Judge Platt introduced the object
for which the meeting was convened, and was fol-
lowed by Clinton , Swartwout , and others. A com-
mittee consisting of De Witt Clinton , J. Swartwout ,
and myself , were appointed to draft a memorial—
 this was drawn by De Witt Clinton , and was cer-
tainly one of the most able and best drawn papers,
that has been written on the subject, of the advanta-
ges that would result by completing a canal the
whole route from Erie to the Hudson. Copies of this
memorial were sent to thyself, for the county of
Ontario, and also to several others of the counties,
and when they were presented to the legislature
were signed by many thousands of our citizens
throughout the state; and the prosecution of the
canal is certainly owing to the circumstance of this
memorial being at that time presented to the legisla-
ture. The remarks made in Watson 's book, page 73, as
to the perseverance and efforts of Governor Clinton ,
are certainly correct, hut in speaking of Colles he is
in error. I was well acquainted with Colles , since
the year 1773; about that time he arrived at Phila-
delphia, from Ireland; he was a very honest man,
but did not possess as much knowledge and experi-
ence as many ascribed to him; he was never in our
western country, and certainly never projected a plan
of canal from Erie to the Hudson; but possibly might,
merely by examining the map of the state, have
spoken of it as an event that would, at some future
period, take place. I am, with regard and esteem,
 Thy sincere friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To ROBERT TROUP , ESQ. New Orleans, May 15th, 1821. RESPECTED FRIEND, The reasons which prevented me from doing more
than merely acknowledging your kind letter of Sep-
tember last, and thanking you for the valuable col-
lection of pamphlets which accompanied it, have
continued ever since I wrote; but being now (as you
will perceive by the enclosure) seriously at work in
the formation of a criminal code for this state, I am
 extremely anxious to receive the report of your com-
mittee on the penitentiary system; from which I
have a right to expect so much important informa-
tion, I hope you will not fail to forward a copy to
me as soon as it appears. I regret very much, that for the reasons I formerly
stated, I could not contribute any thing to the work. Unless I hear reasons much stronger than any
which have been presented to me, either by reading,
conversation, or reflection, I shall not give the pun-
ishment of death a place in the code which I shall
present; it appears to me to be a most inefficient pun-
ishment, to say nothing of its irremediable nature;
 almost all writers on the subject, join in a degree to
acknowledge this, and yet almost all recommend it
for some offences; this I cannot understand, unless it
be the effect of a vindictive sensation against atro-
cious crimes, which ought not to be indulged in legis-
lation. I am sorry to find, that an opinion of the ineffica-
cy of the penitentiary system is gaining ground, and
should be still more grieved if I thought it well
founded; but I do not, and am inclined to think, that
all the great defects in the system, arise from parsi-
mony in preparing the establishments. If the build-
ings were sufficiently spacious, the prisoners might
be classed, and reformation reasonably expected,
instead of the corruption which indiscriminate con-
finement produces; and injudicious pardons of old
offenders need not be given to make room for new
convicts;—if they were sufficiently solid and strong,
the hope of escape would never be indulged or reali-
zed—but to erect spacious and strong buildings
 requires large funds, and it is easier to condemn a
whole system, than to lay taxes to execute it. I
trust, however, that a fair experiment will be made
in New York; there, if any where, we must look for
enlarged views and useful institutions. As it is not very probable that I shall ever return
to my native city, my desire to live in the remem-
brance of my friends there has become more import-
ant to me; among them I have always counted you,
 and hope you will still allow me to do so. EDWARD LIVINGSTON .
To THOMAS EDDY . Naples, November 13th, 1821. SIR, On my return to Naples, after an absence of several
months, I found your letter, dated New York, Novem-
ber 3d, 1820. I am not at present sufficiently
acquainted with the system pursued at the Lunatic 
Asylum, at Aversa, to give you the information you
require, but I will make it my business to obtain
every particular in my power, and transmit the
result to you by the first opportunity. I thank you for the package, and the maps which
points out the route of the canal; it is a most magni-
ficent undertaking, and I trust will answer the ex-
pectations of the promoters of it. I am extremely sorry, that my absence from
 Naples, deprived me of seeing the young gentlemen
you mention, and of showing them such little atten-
tions as might have been in my power. Pray remember me most kindly, to our mutual
friend, Grellet ; tell him I regret to say, that all the
good he has so anxiously strove to do to this wretch-
ed country, has vanished into nothing. I hope
Grellet received the books I sent him several months
ago through Allen. Believe me, yours truly, H. LUSHINGTON .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. Albany, 23d December, 1822. DEAR SIR, William S. Burling lately solicited me to recom-
mend to our friend Colven , the introduction of a plan
for laying an excise on spirituous liquors, and I part-
ly promised him that I would; but on further reflec-
tion, I consider it most suitable that the overture
 should emanate from his constituents, and with this
view I now write to you. In some well written essays, published on this sub-
ject in Walsh's paper, it was estimated that fifty
millions of gallons of spirituous liquors are annually
consumed in the United States, at an expense of
 thirty millions of dollars, and with the sacrifice of
thirty thousand lives. If this be only an approxima-
tion to the truth, what a field for reflection does it
open to the moralist and the statesman. After deducting foreign importations of spirits, say
to the amount of six millions of gallons, and allow-
ing for four millions produced from foreign molasses,
there would still remain forty millions of gallons
manufactured from our own materials. Does not
this astound us with its enormity, and alarm us with
its terrific aspect! An excise of one shilling a gallon, would produce
a revenue of five millions of dollars a year. Double
the duty, and you will raise a fund that will pay
 off the national debt, and line and intersect the
country in all directions with canals and roads. Every considerable increase in the price of any
article, tends to check its consumption. And hence,
the revenue of the country would be an auxiliary to
its morality—a noble union in the eye of a great
statesman. I am, Dear Sir, your friend, DE WITT CLINTON .
To THOMAS EDDY . New York, 4th mo. 24th, 1823. RESPECTED FRIEND, I am particularly obliged by thy kind attention,
in sending me a copy of thy last work on penal juris-
prudence. I have read it with peculiar satisfaction,
and, considering that the circulation of it would be
 highly useful in this country, it is intended to have
five hundred copies immediately printed, to be sent to
persons of influence in the different states, who are
known to be friendly to the improvement of the peni-
tentiary system. It is expected the prison in Philadelphia will pro-
bably be completed this year. I am well satisfied
the plan they propose, of having the convicts closely
confined in the cells, to work during the day, is wrong;
and I have no doubt they will abandon it in a year
or two. Let them sleep in their respective cells, and
work during the day in the yard and shops, attended
by a sufficient number of keepers, to prevent all con-
versation and improper intercourse. I well know,
from having had four years' experience in our prison,
from 1800 to 1804, that this can effectually be done.
The cells should only be used as a punishment day
and night. I send thee a report to the legislature of Louisiana,
on the plan of a penal code for that state, by my
friend, Edward Livingston of New Orleans, who is,
at present, a member of Congress. I am, very re-
spectfully, and with much esteem, Thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To WILLIAM ROSCOE , ESQ. New Haven, 24th May, 1824. MY WORTHY AND DEAR FRIEND, I received your kind letter by Mr. Dwight , who is
just the man wanted to engage in the society. His
appointment to the office you mention, can be made
without a doubt, should the seat of the society be
transferred, as it might, and will be, to New York.
I will take care of the business at Washington, on
my return from Boston, a fortnight from this, and will
depend on you, my friend, Doctor Milnor , Doctor Mille-
doler, Mr. Dwight , and his father, with such others
as will heartily engage in the business, to do what-
ever is necessary to be done, in a way of preparation
in New York. I will correspond with you, if agree-
able, on the subject. If Mr. Dwight spends a con-
siderable part of his time in the business, the society
must compensate him. The first report of the society, which is in the
press, and will be out the last of this week, and one
hundred sent to Mr. Dwight and yourself, will be, I
think, a good introduction to the business of the
removal we contemplated. As we have no funds in
our treasury, we are obliged to tax those who receive
the books, and as I am pledged to pay the printer—
I have paid all the past expenses of the society to a
considerable amount, I must ask the favour of your
direction and influence, with the exertions of Mr.
Dwight , who will do the business to dispose of these
one hundred pamphlets, and more, if wanted, at the
price mentioned (twenty-five cents,) and to remit me
the amount for the printer. This report will give
information of the nature, objects, and operations of
the society, and should, therefore, be in the hands of
men who have right feelings on the subject—particu-
larly all the members (ex-officio) of the society—the
clergy of all denominations—officers of Colleges, and
of religious and benevolent institutions, &c. I must
leave this distribution to you, my friend, to direct,
and Mr. Dwight to execute. On this particular sub-
ject, I wish to meet a letter at my house, from you,
on my return, say 4th June. The way we have
done here, is to open a subscription—subscribers to
put down the number of copies they will take; a
number here take twenty, and down to four. Such
a paper, headed by Governor Clinton , is in circulation
through your city. As soon as the reading of this
report shall have informed the influential men of
your city, we will then, if thought advisable, by
those of you who are on the ground, move in the
business of the transfer of the seat of the society. I have written in much haste, being on the wing
for Boston. I am, very truly and affectionately,
Your sincere friend, J. MORSE .
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. 
 P.S. When all matters are ripe for action, I may
make another short trip to your city. Mr. Dwight can help us much in his paper, in the
 proposed transfer, and in the sale and circulation of
the report. Will you confer with him on the sub-
ject; and with my son , Editor of the New York
Observer? I have not time to write them. Will you and Mr. Dwight bethink of a set of que-
ries, embracing the objects of the society, for a circu-
lar from the Secretaries? Philadelphia, January 10th, 1825. I have the pleasure to inform you, that on the 3d inst.
you were unanimously elected an honorary member
of the Pennsylvania Society for promotion of Internal
Improvements in the Commonwealth, of whose Con-
stitution a copy is enclosed. It will give great pleasure to our Society to cultivate a
correspondence with you, on the important subjects in
which you have taken so distinguished a part, and for
the promotion of which we have associated ourselves. We will always be happy to furnish any informa-
tion in our power to advance internal improvements
in our sister States. I am, with the greatest respect,
Your obedient servant, GERALD RALSTON ,
Corresponding Secretary.
To THOMAS EDDY . Toxteth Park, near Liverpool, 31st March, 1825. DEAR SIR, It is with sincere pleasure that I avail myself of
the present opportunity, to transmit you a copy of
the third and last part of my observations on penal
jurisprudence, which is now ready for publication
 here, and in which I have endeavoured, to the best
of my power, to recommend to my countrymen an
improved system of reformatory discipline, similar to
that adopted in the United States of America, and in
the establishment of which you have had so import-
ant a share. I do this with the feelings of a disciple,
who looks up to his master for the approbation of
his labours—there being no person living, whose
ideas on this subject I more implicitly adopt, than
your own. Within these few days, and after my work was
printed and ready for publication, I have received
from Mr. Hopkins , one of the commissioners appoint-
ed by the legislature last year, to examine and report
on the state of the prisons at New York, their report
on that subject, which has given me more surprise
and concern than I can express, as it appears to me
to recommend an entire abandonment of the reform-
atory system, and the introduction of a plan of
compulsory labour, more severe than any that has
ever yet been proposed. On the receipt of this docu-
ment, I lost no time in drawing up a few remarks
upon it, with the view certainly, but scarcely with
the hope, that if they should arrive before the passing
of the proposed act, they might have some effect in
strengthening the opposition which will, I trust, be
made, for preventing, or at least modifying, the
measures proposed. Of these I send you a few copies,
entreating you to put them into the hands of such of
your friends, as you may think proper; as it is my
decided opinion, that if the system now proposed
should be adopted, the United States of America will
forfeit their chief glory, and will be as remarkable
for the cruelty of their penal code, as they have
hitherto been for their enlightened humanity. In the hope of hearing from you on this most inte-
resting subject, and of learning that you continue to
enjoy a good state of health, I remain, with the most
 sincere attachment and affectionate respect, Most truly yours, W.ROSCOE . 
To Mr. THOMAS EDDY , New York. 
 The lines on solitary imprisonment, are by my
youngest daughter. New York, 4th month, 14th, 1825. ESTEEMED FRIEND, I send thee to the care of Cropper, Benson, & Co., a
report of commissioners appointed by our state legis-
lature, to make inquiry respecting our prisons, &c.;
some part of this report I think thou wilt find inte-
resting. The state penitentiary at Auburn, mentioned
in the report, I believe is the best constructed of any
in this country, and the superintendant most remarka-
bly well qualified to conduct such an establishment;
and under his management I think the penitentiary
will succeed, and fully answer the expectations of
those who are friendly to the system of reform. I
sent thee some time ago, a report to the legislature of
Louisiana, by Edward Livingston , on the plan of a
penal code for said state. I have been informed this
report has been printed in London. I now send
thee, as above, a system of penal law, prepared by
my friend Livingston , containing codes of offences
and punishments, &c. &c. I am, with great regard and respect,
Thy affectionate friend, THOMAS EDDY .
To WILLIAM ROSCOE . New York, 12th month, 15th, 1825. MY DEAR FRIEND, Thy very kind and acceptable favour of 31st
March, came to hand some time ago, and I feel not a
 little mortified that it has remained so long without
acknowledging its receipt; and also thy last publica-
tion on penal jurisprudence which accompanied it,
together with remarks on the report of the commis-
sioners, and the verses on solitary confinement, with
which I was very much delighted. Though the state of society of latter years has been
greatly improved, yet daily experience teaches us,
that we are very far from that degree of perfection
on various subjects, we are capable of attaining; the
work goes on slowly, and mostly imperceptibly to
all human observation; we may, however, rest assu-
red, that all principles and practices, no matter how
long they have been continued and supported by
deep rooted prejudices, founded on the blindness and
wickedness of our species, that are clearly contrary
to the laws of God and our own reason, will come
to an end. The slave trade, and the general aboli-
tion of slavery, is a striking proof in support of this
 sentiment. It is now almost certain that the trade,
and slavery itself, will not exist many years longer.
Equally against the laws of God and right reason, are
all laws relating to crimes and punishments, enacted
 on the principles of a vindictive spirit; such laws are
calculated frequently to violate common justice, and
all distinctions of morality, and, in many cases, tend
to debase the mind, and by the undue severity
 they inflict, aim to make fear the motive of obedi-
ence:—in short, these laws are more calculated for
slaves than freemen, and seem intended to punish
delinquents, rather than to prevent crimes. It is true,
a course of improvement has been commenced of
latter years, which claim the approbation of the just
and the sanction of the wise, but no radical reform
can take place, until the public mind is more fully
convinced of the absurdity and wickedness of vindic-
tive punishment. In proportion as this evil governs
our public laws, so the difficulty is increased in form-
ing wholesome laws for the support of prison disci-
pline, calculated for the government and reformation
of convicts. I am exceedingly mortified to find that
my friend Captain Lindes , keeper of Auburn prison,
advocates (and practices) inflicting corporeal punish-
ment, for violating any part of the prison discipline.
I the more regret that this man should entertain such
sentiments, because, on the general subject of penal
jurisprudence, and the government of a penitentiary,
I esteem him superior to almost any other man that
I ever conversed with:—he formerly was in the army,
and had only had the advantage of a good common
education, but possesses a good share of understand-
ing, great integrity, an amiable disposition, and an
 extensive knowledge of human nature, as regards
the middle and lower classes of society. As a discipli-
narian, it would be difficult to find his equal; owing
to his superior management of the convicts, under
his charge. They love and fear him—they regard
him as their friend and protector—he furnishes them
with plenty of good wholesome provisions—keeps
them constantly employed, but never imposes immo-
derate tasks on them—he holds no conversation with
them except in directing their work, and this course
is strictly pursued by all his subordinate keepers—
he disdains the idle notion, that extreme severity is
the only appropriate mode for the government of a
penitentiary. I never conversed with a person,
whose sentiments as respects the management of
convicts, so cordially met my views, and in my opi-
nion are so well calculated to promote their general
welfare, and produce reformation. It is my opinion,
that there is no prison in the world equal to Auburn
prison, as regards cleanliness, industry, and good
 conduct. The rules and regulations of the prison
are made known to each convict, and the moment
any of them are violated, the offender is punished—
it is owing to the certainty of this, that it is very
rare any punishment is inflicted. I perfectly agree
with him in every particular he advances, except as
to the mode of punishment adopted by him. I have
 in vain urged to him, that whipping is totally incon-
sistent with the principles of that mild system we
wish to establish. I cannot persuade him, that prompt
punishment, by confinement, in a solitary cell on
bread and water, will produce the same effects as
whipping. I allow he will not exercise this power
unless accompanied with a degree of justice, as to
the nature of the offence committed, but certainly
others may abuse it, and therefore it never ought to
be allowed in any prison. I have told him that
during several years, that the New York state prison
was subject to my direction as one of its inspectors,
there never was a single instance of inflicting corpo-
real punishment, and yet perfect order was complete-
ly preserved. He, however, persists in his notion,
that it is impossible to preserve order without whip-
ping. I am firm in the belief, that Captain Lindes 
will, in time, alter his opinions. He is a complete
enthusiast in favour of the penitentiary system, and
has those peculiar qualifications, that will enable
him to carry it to a degree of perfection that it has
never yet attained. The quietness of the prisoners
subject to his care and management is much to be
admired. Some months ago, in company with our
mutual friend, Professor Griscom , I visited Sing Sing,
situated on the Hudson River, about thirty miles from
New York. At this place is erecting a state prison,
within a hundred yards of the margin of the river—
the banks are about one hundred feet high, and con-
tain large and extensive marble quarries, of excellent
quality, which is excavated, and hammered, and
formed for the building, which will contain eight
hundred cells;—the state has purchased about one
hundred and fifty acres of fine land adjoining the
building—the erecting the prison is committed solely
to the care and management of Captain Lindes —the
plan is his own, and, in my opinion, the best in the
world. The flooring, ceiling, and sides of each cell,
are entirely of marble, and the doors iron. He has
with him one hundred and thirty convicts, which he
brought from Auburn prison—besides these, he has
one master carpenter, one mason, and one black-
smith—no other persons except convicts are employed;—
he commenced last spring, and next year the work
 will probably be completed. There is no wood used
in building this prison—it is all of stone. Convicts
are employed in quarrying, burning lime, (from mar-
ble,) forming the stone, mason work, and making
iron doors for the cells, &c. The whole cost of the
building will not exceed $75,000, about £16,500 ster-
ling. The decent order and conduct of the convicts
is wonderful; they are allowed plenty of beef and
pork, and excellent bread, but no other drink than
good water; those employed as smiths never work-
ed at the trade till they came to Sing Sing, and the
neatness and excellence of their work in making the
doors and locks for the cells, are really astonishing.
The mason work appears to be done in the best man-
ner—the men all have a chain about fifteen pounds.
Their first work was to erect sheds with pine boards,
to lodge in at night; they are not allowed to speak
to each other, of course, the whole work is quietly
conducted, without the least noise or confusion; they
have enjoyed remarkable good health, and though
 the summer was uncommonly hot, and they had to
work exposed to the sun, yet, I think, only two have
been sick; they never missed working every day, and
but one has escaped. Six men, each with a musket,
are stationed at equal distances from each other—the
river in the front, serves also to prevent an escape.
When the prison is finished, all the convicts in the
New York state prison in this city, about five to six
hundred, are to be removed, and it is intended to
employ them in making lime, and preparing marble
in various ways to be transported to the city, to be
used for purposes of ornament, building, &c. The
work is admirably calculated to promote good health,
 and so simple, that every man can be employed; all
the marble they can send to this city, and to Albany,
and other places on the Hudson River, will meet
with an immediate sale, and considerable will be
exported to the Southern states. Order, and conse-
quently the important work of reformation, will be
far more certain, than if various trades were pursued.
And here, permit me to observe, that I think thy
remark, that each convict should learn some trade,
does not apply to this country so much as it may to
 England. Some of our convicts have been brought
up to trades, but most of them have been employed
at farming and as labourers. If they are willing to
work, they may readily get employment in the city
as labourers, or in the country as farmers. I agree
with thee in most of the sentiments contained in thy
private remarks, and have handed a copy to the lead-
ing members of our legislature, who, I know, are
heartily disposed to improve our penal code, and
establish the mildest penitentiary system. I have
the fullest confidence, that the most objectionable
parts of the commissioners report will not be adopt-
ed; and, in time, I am satisfied, that confinement in
cells, on bread and water, for breach of prison disci-
pline, will be practised instead of corporeal punish-
ment. The public feeling, and the principles of com-
mon sense, will prevail, and do away the deep rooted
prejudices of our public legislation—the work is slow,
but sure. My friend Hopkins , whose character is
known to thee, is a good man, but the report of the
 commissioners serves to prove, that he has some very
incorrect notions respecting the penitentiary system;
however, I believe his mind is now got to be more
enlightened on the subject. My particular and inti-
mate friend, Cadwallader D. Colden , an eminent
lawyer, and formerly mayor of this city, and now a
member of the Senate of this state, has been closely
united with me for many years, in endeavours for
the improvement of our penal laws and penitentiary
system. He has been uniformly most decided in his
sentiments in favour of the great object we have in
view; and I have full confidence in his judgment,
zeal, and attention to any legislative business, that
may be introduced in the course of the present win-
ter. The prison building in Philadelphia to accommo-
date six hundred convicts, will be finished next year,
and will cost five times as much as ours at Sing Sing,
which will have eight hundred cells. Their plan is,
that a convict sentenced for three, four, or five years,
shall, during the whole period of his sentence, be con-
fined in his cell, at some kind of work; this, they say,
will produce complete reformation, and they are so fixed
in their opinions of the superior efficacy of this plan,
that it is in vain to urge to them that it is cruel and
impolitic. The projectors of this plan, are my par-
ticular friends, of the first rank and respectability in
the city of Philadelphia. I have no doubt but the
experience of one year will convince them of their
error. I cannot be reconciled to think myself deserving
thy very handsome compliment, in attributing to me
having an important share in the establishment of
the reformatory system in this country; the chief
credit is due that truly wise and good man, William
Penn, whose example and hints relating to this
great subject, was acted on and improved by a num-
ber of my valuable friends in Philadelphia, soon after
Pennsylvania was declared an independent state. I have been very much gratified with thy commu-
nications, and most particularly by the several pub-
lications on the subject of penal jurisprudence, and
I do beg, thou wilt be so kind as to favour me, occa-
sionally, with some account of the progress made in
the reformatory system in England, and if any thing
is doing relating to it, on the continent. I remain, yours, &c. THOMAS EDDY .
To WILLIAM ROSCOE , ESQ. Albany, 31st December, 1825. DEAR SIR, I have received your letter of the 27th. Every time
I visit Buffalo, I am fully convinced that the conti-
guity of our settlements is destructive to the frac-
tional or remnant population of the red men, and
that therefore their only salvation lies in removal to
a distance. I have, however, never authorized any
communication through Captain Parrish , or any other
agent, on that point. My rule has been to leave them
to their own volitions. All travellers agree, that in the ratio of their dis-
tance from the white, in that ratio is the prevalence of
 the good qualities of the red men. All experience con-
firms this remark; they acquire our vices without
any of our virtues; and they melt away on our ap-
proach, like snow at the mouth of a furnace. My
kind regards to your family. I am, your friend, DE WITT CLINTON .
MR. THOMAS EDDY , New York. When Doctor Hosack contemplated writing the life
 of his friend, Thomas Eddy , he addressed a note to
Mr. Roscoe , requesting him to furnish any informa-
tion he might have in regard to the philanthropic
 labours of the Howard of America—to which the
Doctor received the subjoined reply. It was dictated
by the accomplished author of the LIVES of the
Medici, and of the Sovereign Pontiff, Leo X., when
the writer could no longer bear the fatigue of writing
a single page with his own hand. It came from a
mind about to depart to a better world, but which
then reflected the images of virtue, sentiment, and
affection, as purely as it did in the prime of his exist-
ence. In the soul of Roscoe there was no sediment;
the last rays of the lamp of life were redolent of taste
and poesy. There was no envy, no aversion, no
repinings breathed from his lips, and his criticisms
have the weight of truth and sincerity, which can
only flow from a pure and exalted spirit. Praise
from such a man, under such circumstances, can
never be forgotten. I could not contract this letter.
I had no right to do it. MY DEAR SIR, Some time previous to the receipt of the letter
with which you honoured me, dated the 29th April,
1829, and accompanying the present of your valua-
ble memoir of Governor Clinton , I had an attack of
paralysis, which had interfered with my usual occu-
pations, and for some time interrupted my correspon-
dence ; and, although by the blessing of God, and by
the aid of repeated depletion, and powerful reme-
dies, I have been restored to such a state of health as
to be able to devote a prescribed portion of my time
to the society of my friends and the perusal of my
books, a result at my time of life (approaching my
78th year) scarcely to be expected ; yet it has not been
till of late that I have been able to undertake the
perusal of so large a work as yours, which I have
now read, not only without any injurious conse-
quences to my health, but with great information
and amusement. At the same, time I have imbibed
a very distinct idea and favourable opinion of the
truly great and good man, whose character you have
so admirably depicted, and whose great and various
merits you have so ably illustrated and explained.
Writing, as I now do, under the immediate impres-
sions derived from the perusal of your noble tribute
to the memory of your friend, it would be unjust in
me to suppress the feelings with which I have been
actuated, or to deny that, highly as I estimate such a
 character in a nation abounding in great men, I con-
sider your production as having shown you worthy
to have been his biographer, and whilst you have
raised an imperishable monument to his fame, to
have given the surest earnest of your own. In addi-
tion to the regret I feel, in not having been able to
reply sooner to your letter, 1 am sorry not to have
transmitted you the few documents requested by you,
respecting my late highly esteemed friend, Thomas
Eddy, of whom I have read several very interesting
memorials in your work; but the same calamity that
 prevented me from writing, also prevented me from
performing this duty, having taken me when my
papers were in such a state of derangement that they
could not, for a long time, be looked into. I am, how-
ever, in some degree, consoled by the consideration,
that you will not have been delayed in your intend-
ed account of Mr. Eddy , by my apparent negligence;
my correspondence with him being only occasional,
 and extending to little more than the interchange of
new publications, although I always entertained a
very high opinion both of his benevolence and his
literary talents. As the indisposition to which I
 have referred, attacked me at a lime when I was en-
gaged in a debate with some of your countrymen,
on the subject of prison discipline, my medical friends
advised me, for a time, not to enter again upon that
 subject, and it is only of late that I have been able to
have the satisfaction of hearing of the system of dis-
cipline recently established at Pennsylvania; whence,
for many years, I have been led to expect the adop-
tion of the horrid punishment of solitary confinement,
 without permitting the convicts to labour; with
which view, the legislature has erected two large and
expensive prisons, intending to confine the criminals
in such a manner that they should be separated, not
only by night but by day, and should be deprived of
the liberty of working, lest it should be an allevia-
tion of their suffering. Against this inhuman and
unchristian-like system, my humble voice has been
 raised, amongst those of many others of more impor-
tance, for several years past; but it is only a few
weeks since that I have learnt, by a communication
of authentic documents from Philadelphia, that the
 legislature have at length given way to the feelings
of humanity, and have determined that the convicts
shall be allowed to labour in the day, and shall be
instructed for that purpose, as well as in whatever
else may be requisite for their reformation. The
commissioners, whom the legislature had appointed
to consider and report to them on this subject, had,
indeed, recommended to them, in their report, that
the convicts should be permitted to labour in compa-
nies, under proper restriction; but with this the legis-
lature would not comply, which I cannot but greatly
regret; although I cannot but rejoice, at the same
time, that so much has been accomplished; consider-
ing the object of labour, or no labour, as being, in fact,
the only question in debate, and being of opinion,
for various reasons, that the legislature will be
obliged to resort to the plan recommended by their
 commissioners. By this decision, I conceive the great
question of prison discipline, as far as regards the
United States, is finally settled; every other place,
except Philadelphia, already adopted that plan, there-
by making crime to counteract itself, and repair, as
far as possible, the evils it has occasioned. In no
country has this principle been so well understood,
or carried so far, as in your own, and the relinquish-
ment of it for the Bastile system of solitary confine-
ment, would have grieved me more than I can express;
but, thank God, my dread of that is over; and I shall
now die in peace, convinced that the time will arrive
when my own country will follow the example. You will not be surprised to hear that our canal
navigations, which have hitherto been very produc-
tive, are depreciated by the completion of our rail-
way from Liverpool to Manchester; which is shortly
expected to be succeeded by one from Liverpool to
London, and by several others in different parts of
the kingdom; but our small dykes bear no propor-
tion to your magnificent aqueducts, which, I suppose,
set all competition from railways at defiance. I send you an account of the Liverpool and Man-
chester road, as just published, by my next neigh-
bour, Mr. H. Booth , the Treasurer of the undertaking,
which, I think, will interest you. I have also added
a copy of my discourse on opening the Liverpool
Institution, and of a work I published some years
since, entitled, Illustrations of the Life of Lorenzo
de Medici, one or both of which you have probably
before seen; but which I beg you will accept, as a
mark of sincere respect and attachment, with which
I am, my dear sir, your very faithful and obliged
friend, W. ROSCOE . I have been obliged to avail myself of the pen of
my youngest daughter, the only one of my family
who at present resides with me, and who desires to
be recorded with me as sincerely attached to a coun-
try where she has already many highly valuable
 friends. W. R. Toxteth Park, near Liverpool,
July 13th, 1830.
DAVID HOSACK , M.D., F.R.S., New York. On the 23d December, 1817, Mr. Eddy lost his son,
 John Hartshorne Eddy . He died in the 34th year of
his age. He was a remarkable young man. At the
age of twelve years, he lost his hearing from the
scarlet fever; he had then only the common and
ordinary instruction of a boy of that age. On his
recovery, he discovered an ardent desire for know-
ledge, and commenced with zeal the process of self-
instruction, and that so successfully, that, at eighteen,
he was far advanced in polite literature, having ac-
quired a good knowledge of the Latin and French
languages. He was accomplished in drawing, botany
painting, and poetry; and, at the same time, pursued,
with assiduity his mathematical studies. We have
known more than one instance, in which the misfor-
tune of deafness has given new acuteness and energy
to the mind. The restlessness that generally attends
this misfortune, drives the mind to examine its own
resources, and to weigh its own powers; and it is
astonishing how much can be done, when we are
obliged to do it, either by motives of advancement,
ambition, or necessity; and no necessity is stronger
than that of preventing the mind from preying upon
itself. The paintings of young Mr. Eddy showed taste
and skill, but he did not choose to follow the art as
a profession; it had too much to do with others to
satisfy him. He painted only for amusement. He
 loved poetry in early life, for it gave him an oppor-
tunity of pouring out his feelings without disguise;
but he found, at a later period, how much excitement
 it costs to make images from nature and truth, to
bathe them in the purest blood of the heart, and
then to send them out to a cold, critical world. At
length, he, in a good measure, gave up his muse, and
devoted his time to the sciences. In the pursuit of
mathematics, geometry, astronomy, and topography,
there are no throes or agonies, and but few difficulties
of any kind in the pathway. To these studies he
gave almost undivided attention. In this almost
pure abstraction, the memory is not busy, and the
heart is still. He pursued his scientific course several
years; and, for exercise and amusement, he made
topographical surveys in every part of the state of
New York, and drew several maps. His large map
of the state, the best that had ever been drawn of it,
was published the year after his death, but it was in
the hands of the engraver before his decease. In his
 tour of topographical surveying, he improved his
knowledge of botany, for there was nothing painful
in this science; for, while the flower and herb give
delight to the senses, they are subjects of soothing
contemplation to the mind. The wonders of nature
are as fully developed in the bumble violet or daisy,
as by the whole forest, and, to the mind of the phi-
losopher, as distinctly prove the existence of a God,
as the astounding cataract or terrific volcano. Mr.
Eddy was ready, with his pen, to perform any ser-
vice to science or the arts. Dr. John W. Francis , to
whose literary taste and talents we are often much
indebted, in a memoir of his friend, written soon
after his decease, says,— Mr. Eddy was the author
of a number of essays which appeared in the news-
papers, on botany and other branches of natural
history; on geography, and the internal improvement
of this state. An essay on geography, which he
intended for publication in this magazine, will pro-
bably shortly appear. He was a member of the New
York Historical Society, and, in 1816, was elected to 
a similar honour in the Literary and Philosophical
Society of New York. To this latter association he
communicated an interesting memoir on the geogra-
phy of Africa. That unfortunate mariner, Captain
James Riley, the narrative of whose sufferings has
awakened so large a portion of public attention, had
applied to Mr. Eddy to draw for him a map of part
of Africa. This gave Mr. Eddy the occasion of
 examining the different accounts that had been pub-
lished by different- travellers, on African geography;
and, without passing sentence of condemnation on
any writer for wilful misrepresentations, he gives
due credit to the statement of Captain Riley . Captain
Riley has, indeed, been pronounced a loose writer by
an anonymous reviewer; but the testimonies to his
worth and veracity are most respectable, and, be-
sides, he is subject to the evidence of living witnesses.
It cannot be denied, that his work contains most
important views of interior Africa; and it is grati-
fying to observe, that a gentleman possessed of the
talents and learning of Hugh Murray , Esq., should,
in his enlarged edition of Leyden's Historical Account
of Discoveries and Travels in Africa, pay the tribute
of high regard to our American narrator. Enough has been said to show, that the strongest
principle of action in John H. Eddy , was the laud-
able desire to be useful; that he was superior to
making a trade of liberal pursuits, and generous in
pecuniary matters, is admitted by those to whom he
was best known. To conclude this hasty sketch, it
is unfortunately too frequently our lot, to lament the
 seemingly untimely departure of aspiring genius and
worth; but it may confidently be said, seldom could
our regret and lamentation be more feelingly be-
stowed, than on the subject of this brief memorial.
Time and talents have rarely been more constantly
or more undeviatingly directed to objects of substan-
tial importance; and it is painful to reflect, that his
fatal illness was prematurely induced, in consequence
of such exertions. Let the qualities of his heart and
his moral excellence command our regard; for the
services he has rendered, let the debt of gratitude be
paid to his memory. W. The following specimens of Mr. Eddy 's poetry are
sufficient to convince any one who reads them, that
he had a cultivated mind, a feeling heart, and a fine
imagination. THE LAMENT on his misfortunes, writ-
ten when the author was only eighteen years of age,
is, beyond all question, an honourable proof of mind
and taste.— In former days how blithe my moments past,
Each New Year's day was happier than the last;
Unknown to sorrow, and serenely gay,
In mirth and frolic passed my harmless day;
Unconscious of the il1 by fate design'd
Fond dreams of glory filled my youthful mind—
Now, sad reverse! though scarce to manhood grown,
Has dire misfortune mark'd me for her own.
No social converse charms my listless ear,
In death-like silence rolls my lonely year,
Lonesome I sit, of every hope despoil'd,
The sons of pleasure shun misfortune's child.
Unfit for me are those whose hours employ
The voice of gladness and the song of joy.
In careless apathy I pass the day
With some dull book to trifle time away,
Or take a lonely walk, or pluck a flower,
Or mark the presage of a coming shower,
Or paint some landscape on the verdant plain,
Or bounding vessel on the wat'ry main,
Or muse in silence on an absent mind
And dream of pleasure that I ne'er shall find,
Or pore upon the news with serious face,
And mark what slaughter Europe's realms deface.
Thus pass my days—but when the evening ray
Smiles in the west, with purple lustre gay,
I mark the moon that skirts the fleecy cloud,
Or veils her beauty in the misty shroud,
While stars unnumbered deck the blue profound,
 Whose sparkling fires her silver throne surround,
Light all the vast expanse, and move sublime
Thro' Heaven's vast concave from the depths of time;
Then shine the streams where silent vessels glide,
And scarce a zephyr curls the glassy tide.
O'er misty vales the mountains rise to sight,
And shadowy grandeur fills the vault of night—
This is reflection's hour—the shining scene
Sheds o'er my pensive mind a soft serene,
In bright succession fancy's visions roll,
And hope, sweet flatterer! soothes my troubled soul:
Perhaps e'en yet, the Almighty's boundless power
May crown my wishes in some happier hour,
May bid misfortune's iron hand forbear,
Or grant me fortitude, my doom to bear;
Perhaps e'en now his cruel seeming will,
By this, restrains me from the paths of ill.
Then cease this strain—these useless plaints give o'er,
What Heaven has done is right, repine no more. The friendly poetical epistle addressed to his
friend, William L. Fisher , after a pleasant visit in
New Bedford, among those enlightened and excel-
lent Friends, the Rodmons and Rotches of that place,
is full of easy and courteous verse. Health to my friend—may Heaven unceasing shed
Its choicest blessings on his youthful head;
Full two long months in one dull round have past,
 From pleasing Bedford since I heard the last.
Whence this delay? but ah! I guess the cause,
'Tis love's soft chain, and powerful beauty draws
Thy thoughts away—and well at beauty's smile
Thou might'st forget an absent friend awhile.
This is the truth—I do not ask defence,
I know thy friendship, and forgive the offence.
I hope she smiles, for well I know the care
And painful hours rejected lovers share.
And can a nymph of Bedford's gentle train,
(The gentlest sure that ever trod the plain,)
The proffer'd hand of faithful love disdain?
In such soft bosoms can the spirit live,
That joys to triumph in the pains they give?
Sweet Bedford! Oft thy scenes I call to view,
And oft the moment when I bade adieu.
Tho' many a day on tedious wings have flown
Since thee I left, and sought the noisy town,
Where vice and folly hold alternate sway,
And care and langour wear my hours away;
Yet oft remembrance, kindly soothing power!
 Recalls the scene of many a happier hour,
The evening walk along the dusky green,
The social circle and the smile serene,
The nymph's soft charms, the aged's various worth
All wake the sigh that pleases more than mirth.
May he, the chief, in length of years grown gray,
Still view with pleasure many a natal day;
His reverend head may dreams from Heaven compose,
And calm contentment and serene repose.
And he whose hospitality I prov'd,
Long may he live, respected and belov'd—
And she with every gentle virtue fraught,
Whose friendly kindness ne'er shall leave my thought,
May every gift, that generous fortune pours,
Gild the calm current of their peaceful hours,
May Heaven direct their steps remote from strife,
And smile serenely on their close of life,
And place, approving, in the realms of rest,
Where virtue triumphs and her sons are blest.
What pleasing visions charm the hours of youth,
When fancy cheats us in the guise of truth,
In life's gay morn, when hope's amusing ray
Shines on the opening mind serenely gay,
 When all is rapture, and no cares control
The voice of nature in the youthful soul;
Hence joys long past in fancy oft we view,
A painful prospect, yet 'tis pleasing too;
Each magic charm of Laura's smile divine,
Each modest virtue in her thoughts that shine:
These wake the glow of sentiment sincere,
Oh! could my verse that sentiment declare;
 But far unequal to the arduous strain
It drops a theme it never can sustain;
May she, sweet nymph, be Heaven's peculiar care,
And be she happy as her form is fair.
Methinks I view each absent friend again,
 Tho' wide the distance, yet 'tis wide in vain,
In vain the mountains rise, the billows roll,
They ne'er can change the feelings of my soul,
 Those finer feelings to the world unknown,
Inspir'd by Bedford's calm delights alone;
Oh! were it mine those calm delights to share,
But fate vindictive disappoints my prayer.
By hard necessity's command I stay,
 Nor tempt the dangers of the wat'ry way
While winter reigns around; but when the spring
Returns with fragrance on the zephyr's wing,
To thee and Bedford's calm delights I'll haste,
And leave the noisy town, true genuine joys to taste.
With wishes for thy health, to thee, my friend,
 From Hudson's bank this careless verse I send.
Accept the wishes of a rhyming swain,
The meanest vot'ry of the muses' train.
In artless numbers flow these careless lays,
Careless of censure, not unpleased with praise.
I write in verse, because in verse I find
I best can tell the feelings of my mind,
And oft the muse with kind assuasive power,
Can steal from sorrow many a pleasing hour.
For on my youthful days misfortune frowns,
And many a joy the stream of sorrow drowns;
And should my verse beguile one pensive sigh,
Or draw the approving glance from friendship's eye,
I'll thank the muse that gave the tuneful strain
 To please my friend, and soothe my mental pain. We have remarked, that Mr. Eddy gave up the
sweet wanderings of literature, for the sciences of
geography, topography, mineralogy, and statistics;
but he never lost his love of botany. He had been
taught this science by Doctor Hosack , and always
felt grateful to his eminent instructor, for the pains
he took in making him acquainted with herb, flower,
and tree, from the hyssop that springeth from the wall,
to the cedar of Lebanon. His mind had a most noble
 scope in the field of science, not confined to those we
have named; for, before he was thirty years of age,
he seemed determined to make himself acquainted
with many things, then but partially known, as may
be seen by the following extract from The American
Monthly Magazine and Critical Review. So long ago as the year 1814, the following queries
were prepared by the late John H. Eddy , of this city.
He had them printed in the form of a circular, and a
number of copies were sent to various gentlemen in
 different parts of the country to which they relate.
Few communications, however, were received in
reply; and the multiplied avocations of Mr. Eddy 
compelled him to postpone the prosecution of his
inquiries to a period of greater leisure. But an
untimely death, arresting him in the midst of his
labours, has torn him from science and his country,
and left the task to other hands. With the view of
reviving inquiry upon this subject, we publish the
circular drawn up by Mr. Eddy , and solicit the atten-
tion of the scientific to the topics therein suggested.
Any communications, addressed to the editors, will
be gladly received, and immediately placed in the
possession of one who will turn them to good account. New York, March 14, 1814. The unexampled progress of cultivation and im-
provement in that part of the state of New York,
lying west of the meridian of the village of Utica,
and the surprising increase of its population and
produce, present a subject of inquiry highly interest-
ing, not only as affording a basis for a correct calcu-
lation of the future advance of our interior settle-
ments to the west, where lands, and the title to it, are
good, and thus affording a glimpse of the scene our
 country is one day, we may hope, destined to pre-
sent; but it has opened to the observation of the
geographer and the geologist, a number of very
curious particulars in its general topography, which
do not, to my knowledge, exist, at least in so remark-
able a degree, or to so great an extent, in any other
part of the United States. To collect facts relative
to these, and by comparing these facts with each
other, and judging by the rules of analogy drawn
from similar appearances in other parts of the globe,
to endeavour to discover the probable cause of the
singular features I have mentioned, has induced me
to take the liberty of addressing you, and to beg the
favour of you to answer the queries inclosed, as far
as your knowledge extends, and as much in detail as
you conveniently can. But before proceeding to the
queries, I will add some conjectures of my own, drawn
from the very limited means of information I at pre-
sent possess. It is well known that there are, at the Little Falls
of the Mohawk river, evident marks of the rocks
having been formerly washed by the waves, or by a
current of water one hundred feet above the present
surface at the head of the falls. Now it appears, by
the levels taken by the surveyors employed by the
commissioners of the Grand Canal, that the surface
of the water at that place, is less than sixty feet
lower than at Rome, therefore it seems to me there
can be no doubt, that when the waters washed the
top of the hill at the falls, the country above, along
the valley of the river, as far as (and much, farther
than) Rome, must once have been the bottom of a
large lake, bounded on each side, at no great distance,
by the uplands, and presenting, in shape, a long nar-
row arm, similar to the present lakes of Cayuga and
 Seneca; and as there is a gradual descent in the
country west of Rome, as far as Three-River Point,
and the elevation from that point to the falls of the
Seneca river near Scawyace, is very inconsiderable,
it seems to me equally undoubted, that the waters
once reached so far, including the present Cayuga,
Cross, Onondaga, and Oneida lakes, the last of which 
I imagine was near the centre. I suppose this great
lake to have been bounded on the east by the hill at
the falls; on the south by the uplands, giving rise to
the head waters of the Susquehannah; on the north
by the elevation of the great step from the lower
falls on Gennesee to Oswego Falls; and on the east,
by the uplands between the head waters of Mud
Creek and Genesee River. Its extent up the valley
of Mud Creek I don't pretend to conjecture, but sup-
pose its length from east to west may have been
about a hundred and twenty miles, and its breadth
in general about twenty. All the country within
these limits is a flat, surrounded by much higher
land, and its soil, and likewise its small and almost
imperceptible horizontal inclination is, I believe,
precisely similar to the muddy bottoms of the lakes
I have mentioned. But the circumstance which
seems to me most strongly to corroborate my opinion,
is the known decrease in the waters of these lakes,
and, of course, diminution in their extent, and the
time probably is approaching when they will be
 entirely drained, and when the land left by the
water is covered with timber, (which would soon be
the case if left to nature,) it will present a country
similar in appearance to that on the south side of
Oneida Lake, the Cayuga marshes, &c., with creeks
meandering through it like the Seneca River, Oneida,
Cowaselon, and Wood Creeks, &c., &c. Please favour me with your ideas on the subject,
when convenient, and send me by mail, as far as may
be in your power, answers to the following queries. JOHN H. EDDY , No. 220 William-street. Do you know of any additional circumstances
confirming the above supposition, such as traces of
water at other places much above its present level,
and near the supposed boundary I have sketched out? Are there any traditions among the Indians,
 that the country was formerly covered with water? Do you know how far the ridge, on which the
ridge road is constructed from Lewistown to the
lower falls of Genesee, extends to the eastward of
Genesee River, and do you know of any other
 remarkable ridge or steps, similar to that which
 occasions the falls of Niagara and Oswego? state its
height, direction, extent and composition. What is the composition of rocks in your
 neighbourhood, and how do they lie?—in strata or
otherwise? inclined or horizontal? What strata are observed in the earth in digging
wells, &c. What shells are found? on the surface or what
depth? are they similar to the shell-fish at present
existing in the adjoining waters, or are they of
unknown species? are they found in the hills, or in
the valleys, or in both? Have any bones of animals been found?—of
what kind?—in the hills, or in
the valleys, or in both? Do you know of any petrifactions in your
neighbourhood?—of what kind? and do they resem-
ble things now existing, or are they of unknown
 substances? are they found in the hills, or in the val-
leys, or in both? What trees or plants are peculiar to the respec-
tive soils of the valley of the lake I have supposed,
and the uplands? (Note, the botanical names of
trees and plants should be mentioned, if in your
power, the English names being applied to very dif-
ferent species in different parts of the country.) Do you know of any means of ascertaining,
or estimating, the age of the forest trees which grow
on the old Indian fortifications? Do you know at what rate per annum the
lakes in your neighbourhood decrease? or how much
have they decreased within your knowledge, or that
of creditable people? Are there any Indian hieroglyphics extant in 
your neighbourhood? can you send me a copy, with
 the meaning, if it can be obtained—or drawings and
plans of any Indian antiquities? I have heard that the Indians on the Missis-
sippi, whose language is totally different, can yet
 understand each other very correctly by means of
signs; is it so with those in your neighbourhood,
and can you describe their method? What effect has the clearing and settling the
 country had on the climate—do the streams dimi-
nish, and in what degree? What is the present variation of the magnetic
 needle with you, and what has it been formerly, and
at what places observed? It has been remarked in Europe that the varia-
tion was effected by an earthquake; can you recol-
lect about the time of the late earthquakes, which
extended (I believe) northeasterly from the Missis-
sippi, about two years ago, that there was any
change in the variation, and how much? Have you ever observed the Aurora Borealis,
or northern lights, in your neighbourhood? when
and where? and describe the phenomena—can you
recollect any change in the variation at the time?
this has been observed in Europe. What do you suppose may be the average ele-
vation of the hills in your neighbourhood above their
base? Send me a description, and (if convenient) a
drawing of any singular and unaccountable natural
feature in the country, or of any extraordinary phe-
nomena. How far can the great step, which occasions
the falls of Niagara, be traced into Canada, and in
what direction—the same of the ledge which occa-
sions the rapids at Black Rock? Latitudes and longitudes of any part of the
country will be very important in constructing a
correct map of the state, and if you can furnish me
with any useful observations, they will be highly
acceptable,—please to describe the observation, and
the instruments used. The mind that could pass from the inspirations of
the Muse to such deep questions of philosophy, was
one of no ordinary range; and, by the very point of
the questions, as well as from his own suggestions,
we conceive a high idea of his powers, and feel dis-
tressed to think, that so laborious and sagacious a
man should have died so young; for much might
 have been expected from a scholar in the prime of
life, pursuing such a course. There are but few in
this country, who had, at the same time, leisure, in-
clination, and talents, to make such philosophical
 examinations. The early education of Mr. Eddy was, as the fact
is given by himself, miscellaneous and scanty. The
most approved schools in his youthful days were very
indifferent, compared with those of modern times,
and but little more than the first elements of educa-
tion could be had in them. He was in a good mea-
sure self-taught, and by observing a right course, he
was constantly at school, while in the course of his
business, and gained a knowledge of the world as he
proceeded in the duties of life. Such knowledge, if
not at first entirely correct, has a self correcting prin-
ciple in it, which is experience. His mind was so well disciplined, that every thing
he gained he kept; and in gathering up his treasures
of knowledge, he always calculated on ulterior views,
which were not then, even to his own mind, fully
 developed. He was ambitious of attainment, but
never suffered his vanity to interfere with the means
of gaining knowledge, for he was at great pains in
 getting the opinion of the wise and good on every
subject; but he never followed the opinions of any
man, until he had studied the subject thoroughly,
and weighed every opinion offered. He compared
all, and, as an optimist, selected for himself. He
never seemed startled at any theory, however singular,
but took the pains to examine it calmly, and if bound
to refute it, did it mildly, but distinctly. In all his
exertions, he always measured the means in regard to
the ends, and was seldom deceived in his calculations;
yet, at times, he was considered as a bold financier,
full of expedients; but the results always justified his
calculations, and there can be no doubt, but that the
opinions which he offered on various subjects to the
corporations to which he belonged, which were not
adopted in the early part of his course, but which
 proved in the end to be the correct ones, gave him a
greater influence afterwards, than if they had pre-
vailed at the time they were given. His mind was quick, shrewd, and logical. He
caught a suggestion with great readiness, but was
slow in making up his judgment. He looked on all
sides of a question with immense care, for he was
early taught precaution, the first ingredient in good
 sense. His combinations, comparisons, parallels, in-
ferences, and arguments, were all familiar to him
before his opinions were promulgated, but when his
 judgments were formed, they were not readily given
up, upon any authority. If, in coming to a conclu-
sion, he was slow and wary, in action he was rapid
and indefatigable. He never wrote until he had arranged his thoughts,
and chosen his language to clothe them; of course,
there is a neatness and fine connexion in his writ-
ing, which, if they do not exalt his style to classical
beauty, make it a much better business vehicle.
There are no extraordinary thoughts, no wonderfully
brilliant sentences, in his productions, that could be
quoted to show his strength of wing or boldness of
flight, but in every work of his there are exhibited
strong leatures, and as a whole, the production is
always effective. A forcible thinker, with only a
fair vocabulary, makes a clear and impressive writer.
Mr. Eddy uses good words in their proper places, and
that always makes a good style for any subject-mat-
ter. His logic has much of the Aristotelian clearness
about it; but being exercised upon the practical affairs
of life, instead of ingenious theories, it is not so
apparent. His time was all his own, for he had no days of
gloom or hypochondriacism to weaken the energies
of his mind, through the pulses of his heart. He
indulged in no morbid views of life, nor suffered
from over strained feelings at human misery, but he
knew all the evils that existed, and had nerve enough
to combat them. He depended for fame on no one
brilliant deed, or no one fortunate occurrence, but on
a life of active benevolence. A command over his
passions, is the first lesson that he who intends to
live for mankind, should learn. It is in this cool sere-
nity that the mind gains its greatest strength and
aptitude for action. When obtained, it gives to youth
the habits and facilities that belong to riper years.
This complacency increases every day by reflection,
and keeps the mind from decrepitude and decay in
more advanced years. In such a state, a man, like
the mariner sailing before the refreshing trade winds,
can calculate almost to a certainty what may be accom-
plished in a given time. When the imagination is
under proper control, and man is guided by expe-
rience, he can correct yesterday's error, if one was
made, by to-day's reasoning. In such a life, where
every thing is accurately measured and surveyed, the
world passes onward, not like the uncertain shadow
upon the dial of life, flitting with every cloud, but
like the heavenly bodies,
Wheeling unshaken through the void immense. The religious order to which Mr. Eddy was attached
by birth and principle, have ever since their rise
been remarkable for self-discipline. This character-
istic gave Penn , and his successors, their influence 
over the Indians, which preserved peace for so many
years in their borders. Such men suffer in turbu-
lent times for not taking part in the bustle, but are
amply repaid for this, in their prosperity in days of
quiet. Mr. Eddy was a firm orthodox Friend, whose
faith was unshaken in the midst of difficulties. The recent separation which has taken place in
the Society of Friends, is a matter of public notoriety,
and it is also pretty generally known, that a differ-
ence of opinion, upon some of the leading doctrines,
was the cause of this unhappy division. Although
this separation did not take place in the society at
New York, until after Mr. Eddy 's death, yet as he,
from the beginning, took such a deep interest in the
controversy, which was carried on for many years
previous to this event, it becomes the duty of his
biographer to allude to it. A late celebrated minister in the society, who, from
his strong natural talents, purity of life, and patri-
archal appearance, had obtained unbounded influence
over a large portion of the members, for many years
previous to Mr. Eddy 's death, was very active and
zealous in propagating his peculiar sentiments upon
the doctrines of the atonement and divinity of our
Saviour. Without meaning, in the least, to call in
question his sincerity, or the purity of his motives,
it must be admitted, that he held opinions on those
important doctrines, and also respecting the holy
scriptures, which differed materially from those held
by Robert Barclay , and the early Quakers. They
ever believed in the divinity of the Saviour, and in
the efficacy of the outward atonement, in conjunc-
tion with spiritual regeneration; whilst he lowered
the character of the Redeemer, to that of a good man,
and holy pattern, and denied the efficacy of the
atonement altogether, relying solely on the regene-
ration, as a means of Salvation. The founders of
the society also, uniformly upheld the authenticity
and inspiration of the scriptures, declaring them to
be the only outward standard for determining the
soundness of their doctrines, and the truth of their
principles; whilst this modern preacher frequently
called in question their divine authority. Mr. Eddy , and other influential members of the
society, took an active part in endeavouring to arrest
the progress, of what they considered heterodox opi-
nions, and they always openly declared, that the
doctrines promulgated by the preacher before men-
tioned, were contrary to the fundamental principles
of the society, and that therefore they could have no
 unity with him. Mr. Eddy was one of the warmest
advocates in favour of orthodox opinions, and one of
the earliest to detect the heterodoxy of the new prin-
ciples. Regardless of worldly consequences, he had
the courage openly and honestly to avow his senti-
ments, and thus became unpopular with those in the
 society, who took the opposite side; but this moved
him not—and he continued, through evil report and
good report, to show his marked disapprobation of
those doctrines, until his death. No cause was so dear to his heart, as the interests
 of the society in which he was born and educated,
and for which he always manifested the most ardent
attachment; he, therefore, most deeply deplored the
 division of sentiment, upon what he considered vital
principles. The yearly meeting of Friends in England, which
may be aptly termed the parent society, has officially
pronounced its condemnation of the novel doctrines
which were promulgated here, and refuses to hold
any intercourse with the Society in this country,
which sanctions those doctrines. So far, therefore, as human authority goes, Mr.
Eddy's opinions have been completely sustained;
and although he did not live to witness the division
 in the Society which now exists, yet he clearly fore-
saw, many years ago, that such must inevitably be
the result of the controversy. The celebrated preacher alluded to, has since fol-
lowed Mr. Eddy to the silent grave;—they are both
removed beyond the sphere of human praise or cen-
sure, and we may safely leave them in the hands of
Him who judgeth righteously, and who alone knoweth
the secrets of all hearts. When the mind is serene, there is nothing of the
value of life lost in pungent regret for hasty conduct
and irritable feelings, and nothing by the intoxica-
ting influence of inordinate joy. To one prepared to
be happy by religious philosophy and self-discipline,
 bent on pursuing the even tenor of his way, curi-
osity, desire of knowledge, and love of fame, the
last infirmity of noble minds, are all subservient to
 happiness. Mr. Eddy had fine powers of conversation. He
was gently animated in speaking in public or pri-
vate, and seemed to proceed with ease and fluency.
If his eloquence had nothing in it of the force of the
rapid stream, or the sweep of the tide, still it was
more difficult to resist; it was like the gentle drop-
pings whose continuance will wear away the stone.
He had no equal in managing a matter before a deli-
berative body. He watched the mollia tempora
fandi, and said no more than just what was wanted
for the occasion. He was unruffled when hardly
 listened to, and sometimes rudely treated; but at the
next interview, it was seen that he had made an im-
pression on him, who had, perhaps, in a moment of
 irritation, turned hastily away. Most minds are to
be won, if the suitor only knows the means, and
notices the proper seasons for his appliances. He was conscious that he was acting for the pub-
lic good, and was therefore always self-possessed. As a neighbour, Mr. Eddy was kind and obliging,
and attentive to all the little courtesies of life, and
was loved and respected by those near him, which
cannot always be said even of those who are striving
to benefit mankind. In the domestic circle he was pleasant and instruc-
tive, and seemed desirous of filling up every hour as
of some value to himself and to others. He seemed
desirous of examining the mind and habits of the
young, in order to assist them in gathering up pro-
per stores of knowledge, and of giving a right direc-
tion to their affections. This communion with
young minds is as beneficial to those in years, as to
the youth who listens to the lessons of age. The
fresh and novel views of the world, coming all unso-
phisticated from the young, awaken the recollections
of youth in the mind of one near the grave, and he
seems to travel back again with pleasure to the days
when every vision was bright, and hope had not
known the companion of her later years—disappoint-
ment. The value of existence will unquestionably
be increased, when we come to understand by the
mental improvements which are going on, how much
good we may do, and of how much happiness we
are susceptible. The person of Mr. Eddy bore no extraordinary
marks to the casual observer. He was about five
feet six inches in height, of a muscular, compact
frame, capable of bearing great fatigue without in-
convenience, and he delighted in corporeal activity as
well as mental exertion. His head was large and
well shaped, the features of his face were strong and
prominent, and his whole physiognomy bold and
striking. The elevation of his eyebrows gave the
whole countenance an air of profound meditation.
He dressed with great uniformity and neatness. If
his face bore deep traces of thought, there were none
of grief. He commemorated the death of his friend
with pious and affectionate propriety, but indulged
in no feverish lamentations at their departure, bow-
ing in humble resignation to the will of heaven.
He had been failing for several months, but at
last his death was as sudden as his life was serene.
He died on the 16th of September, 1827, in the sixty- 
ninth year of his age, of paralysis. He, who had
done so much to alleviate the sufferings of others,
was not doomed to suffer much himself. For him
death had no sting and the grave no victory. The
sweet precepts and holy influence of Christianity had
destroyed both. More than four years previous to Mr. Eddy 's death,
he withdrew himself from the affairs of the New
York Hospital, as appears by the following note, in
order that the institution might have the benefit of
the services of a younger man. To the Governors of the New York Hospital. GENTLEMEN, As the annual election will take place in the
course of this month, it appears to me my duty
respectfully to inform you, that it is my wish not to
be considered as a candidate to serve as one of the
Governors for the ensuing year. Having now been twenty-eight years engaged in
the service of the Hospital, it is with extreme reluc-
tance that I withdraw myself from any longer taking
a part in the management of its concerns, but I con-
sider it not consistent with the strict rules of pro-
priety, to hold a station that might be filled with
much more usefulness by some other person, not so
advanced in life, and more active than myself. I am, with sentiments of the greatest respect and
esteem, Your sincere friend, THOMAS EDDY . New York, 5th mo. 7th, 1823. But notwithstanding the fact that he had retired
from the labours of the Hospital, the Governors had
not forgotten the services of their former President,
and at the next meeting of the Board after his death,
they entered the following resolution on their records: The Secretary of the New York Hospital respect-
fully informs the family of Thomas Eddy , that at a
meeting of the Governors of the New York Hospital,
held 2d instant, the following resolution was passed. Resolved, That this Board has heard with great
regret the decease of their late President, Thomas
Eddy, who, by devoting his time and talents during
a long course of years, to the promotion of objects of
 philanthropy, and of public utility, has deservedly
acquired the esteem of his fellow citizens in general;
and by his many and important services to this In-
stitution, has merited particularly the gratitude of its
Governors, and of all who are interested in its pros-
perity. ROBERT J. MURRAY , Secretary. The periodicals of the day, in their obituary notices,
seemed to vie with each other in paying their tributes
of respect to his memory. Two or three of these
 notices are before us, and demand from their intrinsic
merits, an insertion among the matters contained in
this life of this distinguished philanthropist. New York Daily Advertiser, September, 1827. In the death of Thomas Eddy , which was men-
tioned in our paper of yesterday, the community
have lost a most worthy and benevolent individual,
and the Society of Friends, to which he belonged, a
most respectable and valuable member. A large
portion of a long life has been spent in active useful-
ness, and in promoting, by his efficient aid, almost
every public institution of charity and benevolence.
For a long time he has been concerned in the go-
vernment of the Hospital of this city; and it is, in
a great measure, owing to his exertions, that the
 Lunatic Asylum was established and endowed. He was an early friend and supporter of the Peni-
tentiary system of punishment;—a zealous patron of
 the free schools, he encouraged, to the utmost of
his power, every important project for the extension
of general education; he was a most cordial friend
of freedom, and a most determined opposer of slavery,
wherever it prevailed. Mr. Eddy was, from the establishment of the Ame-
rican Bible Society, a cordial and active friend and
manager of the institution, where his conduct, in
promoting its great objects, was always marked by
the most liberal and orthodox temper and principles.
An extensive correspondence with persons of distinc-
tion in Europe, and particularly in Great Britain,
rendered his name and his character familiar to many
of the great philanthropists of the age; and his
death will be lamented by his friends in that coun-
try, as well as in this, as a public loss. Freedom's Journal, September, 1827. DIED, in this city, on the 16th instant, full of
years, and full of honours, rested from his labours,
that his works might follow him, the Christian,
the patriot, and the Philanthropist, Thomas Eddy ,
Esq. His family and friends are not called upon to
sorrow, as those who have no hope; but, with delight,
may dwell upon the truths of the Gospel, as exem-
plified in the character of the husband, the father,
and the friend. Let me die the death of the right-
eous, and let my last end be like unto his. The name of Thomas Eddy , and the deeds of worth
which filled up his life, will be remembered and
revered by the coloured population of our country,
and their descendants, to the latest generations. Commercial Advertiser, September, 1827. DIED, yesterday morning, in the 70th year of his
age, Thomas Eddy , for many years a highly respect-
able and useful citizen. He was an active member
of most of our charitable institutions, in whose wel-
fare and prosperity he was deeply interested, and in
whose service most of the latter part of his life was
spent. As a governor of the New York Hospital, he
was eminently useful, and by his firmness of character, 
and close application to the interest of the establish-
ment, filled the highest offices therein, to the entire
 approbation of his constituents. He was a firm and
constant advocate of the Lancasterian system of edu-
cation, and of the immense importance of public cha-
rity schools, in whose welfare he felt a deep and lively
 interest. His services as a director of the American
Bible Society, were duly appreciated by his fellow
members, and by them his loss will be deeply regret-
ted. To the descendants of Africa he was a sincere
and valuable friend, deeply sympathizing with them
in their low and degraded state, and endeavouring
by every means in his power, to break the shackles
which bind them to the cruel yoke of their oppressors.
He was an early advocate for internal improvements;
and his name will be found among the first commis-
sioners for the construction of the Erie canal. In short, he was a charitable, a philanthropic, and
a good citizen, a kind father, and a tender husband. His funeral will take place on Tuesday afternoon,
the 18th instant, at 4 o'clock, from his late residence,
424 Broome street. In the death of this gentleman,
whose life has been long dedicated to deeds of cha-
rity and benevolence, our city sustains no common
loss. His friends and connexions, and the members
of the various societies with which he was associated,
are respectfully invited to attend his funeral. National Gazette, Philadelphia. An obituary notice of Thomas Eddy of New York,
was copied into our sheet yesterday, from the New
York papers. It bears a just testimony, which we
were glad to repeat, and to which we would add an
humble tribute on our own part, arising from per-
sonal acquaintance, and a deep impression of the
excellence of his character. Unaffected, inexhausti-
ble goodness; sound sense; extensive information
on the practical interests and objects of society; anx-
ious, indefatigable benevolence—were the leading
traits which gained for him an extraordinary share
of fond esteem and confidence, wherever he was
known. He belonged to the religious denomination
of Friends, and in the modest simplicity of his tone
and habits, and the directness, equanimity, and toler-
ance of his spirit, as well as by the absolute useful-
ness of his pursuits and studies, he seemed to realize
the picture which William Penn himself sketched, as
 that of a genuine disciple, and a true Christian, in
his interpretation of Christianity. There are few, we believe, of the splendid internal
 improvements, of the foundations of social charity,
or the plans for the amelioration of public morals
and education, that have signalized, during the pre-
sent century, the judgment, benevolence, and enter-
prise of New York, with which the name of Thomas
Eddy is not connected, with more or less original
and acknowledged merit. He was among the first
projectors and promoters of the Grand Canal; he
took a principal part in the establishment and admin-
istration of hospitals, penitentiaries, high schools, and
houses of refuge; he entered into all their details
with equal zeal and intelligence; he read, he wrote,
he travelled, almost without intermission, for pur-
poses of common good or special humanity:—he
united the bias and exertions of a Howard and a Bene-
zet, to those propensities and inquiries which imme-
diately advance the trade, agriculture, and gene-
ral comfort and beauty of a state. This is a rare
combination of tastes and endeavours, and in him it
was not in the least ostentatious or officious, but
wore a natural, easy, unobtrusive air, suitable to his
whole mien and style, and never failed to prove effi-
cient, when it had scope and encouragement. So
beneficent a being is now enjoying a rest happier
than that of any of his race, who worshipped at
shrines of false glory, and wearied their powers in
seeking or achieving the triumphs of ambition, vanity,
or avarice. We have seen men of stout hearts, but
kindred dispositions, moved to tears, in first contem-
plating Thomas Eddy after a certain period of sepa-
ration. We never approached him without expe-
riencing a moral refreshment, analogous to the phy-
sical sensation produced by a pure, elastic, balmy
 atmosphere. The same delightful influence is always
shed, in a measure, by veteran, unequivocal, active
virtue; but the artlessness and serenity attending the
source in this instance, the plain dress, the homely
 visage, the kindly eye, the chastened tone, and unso-
phisticated reason, caused it to be felt by more minds
with superior force. It is merely justice to add, that
the individuals and circles with whom this philan-
thropist communed and acted in New York, appre-
ciated and honoured his peculiar worth, and will long
praise and cherish his genial memory. All were
alive to that spontaneous and invariable emanation
of goodness which we have just noticed—all must
be aware of its rarity, and regret its loss in any one
example. The following letter is from his friend, Governor
Clinton. Albany, 18th Sept. 1827. DEAR MADAM, Permit me to mingle my tears with you, and to
offer to you and your family my heartfelt sympathies
on the loss of your excellent husband and my inva-
luable friend: a man who was so much known, and
so invariably engaged in doing good, has left a vacancy
which it will be difficult to fill. His usefulness can
be traced to our institutions of reform, education, and
benevolence. He has followed his excellent coadjutors in the
same glorious cause, Robert Bowne and John Murray,
Jun. to the grave, and I hope to heaven. I am, truly,
Your friend, DE WITT CLINTON .
To Mrs. EDDY . Mr. Eddy left a widow, a son, and two daughters,
to mourn his loss, and to cherish his memory. Mrs.
Eddy died the summer of 1832. She fell a victim to
that scourge of the human race—the cholera. She
was a virtuous woman, highly respected by all who
knew her. She was a helpmate to her spouse, as
far as was proper for her sex, in all his labours of
philanthropy. The silent unobtrusive course of a
good wife, has a wonderful influence on the charac-
ter and fame of her husband. 